HOPE LESLIE.
CHAPTER I.
There's nothing I have done yet o' my conscience,
Deserves a corner: would all other women
Could speak this with as free a soul as I do.
Henry
VIII.
While
Hope Leslie was deeply engaged in the
object of her secret expedition, Governor
Winthrop's
household was thrown into alarm at her
absence.
Jennet was the only member of the family who
did not admit that there was real cause of
uneasiness
.
Miss Hope, she said, was always
like a crazed body of moonlight nights; there was
never any keeping her within the four walls of a
house.
But a moonlight night it soon ceased to be.
The clouds that had been scudding over the
heavens
,
gathered in dark and terrific masses. A
spring storm ensued; a storm to which winter and
summer contribute all their elemental power
rain, lightning, wind, and hail.
Governor Winthrop naturally concluded, (for
all persons not deeply interested are apt to be
rational,) that Miss Leslie had taken refuge under
some safe covert, and he summoned his family to
their evening devotions. Both the Fletchers
excused
themselves, and braved the storm in quest
of their lost treasure; and even old Cradock, in
spite of Mrs. Grafton's repeated suggestions that
he was a very useless person for such an
enterprise
,
sallied forth; but all returned in the space
of an hour to bring their various reports of
fruitless
inquiry and search. Everell remained but
long enough to learn that there were no tidings
of Hope, and was again rushing out of the house,
when he met the object of his apprehensions at
the hall door. Thank heaven! he exclaimed,
on seeing her, you are safe. Where have you
been?we were all in the most distressful alarm
about you.
Hope had, by this time, advanced far enough
into
the entry for Everell to perceive, by the light of
the lantern, that she was muffled in Sir Philip
Gardiner's cloak. His face had kindled with joy
at her appearance; all light now vanished from
it, and he stood eyeing Hope with glances that
spoke, though his lips refused again to move;
while she, without observing or suspecting his
emotion, did not reply to him, and was only
intent
on disengaging herself from the cloak. Do
help me, Everell, she said, impatiently; and he
endeavoured to untie the string that fastened it,
but in his agitation, instead of untying, he
doubled
the knot.
Oh, worse and worse! she exclaimed, and,
without any farther ceremony, she broke the string
1*
and running back to the door, gave the cloak
to Sir Philip, who stood awaiting it, till then
unperceived
by Everell, in the shadows of the
portico.
Everell again looked at Miss Leslie in the
natural
expectation of some explanation, but she
appeared only concerned to escape to her own
apartment without any inquiries from the
family
.
Her face was extremely pale; and her
voice, still affected by recent agitation, trembled
as she said to Everell, be kind enough to tell
your father, and all of them, that I have come in
drenched with the rain, and have gone to my own
roomthat I am wearied, and shall throw off my
wet garments, and get to bed as soon as
possible
;
and then adding, a good night, Everell,
and without awaiting any answer, she was
springing
up the stairs when the parlour-door was
thrown open, and half-a-dozen voices exclaimed,
in the same breath, oh, Hope!Hope
Leslie
!Miss
Hope Leslie! is it you?
Come back, my child, and tell me where you
have been, said Mr. Fletcher.
Yes, Miss Leslie, said Governor Winthrop,
but in a tone of kindness rather than authority,
render an account of thyself to thy rulers.
Yes, come along Hope, said Mrs. Grafton,
and make due apologies to Madam Winthrop.
A pretty hubbub you have put her house in, to be
surethough, I make no doubt, you can show
good reason for it, and also for leaving Sir Philip
and me in that rantipole way, which I must say
was peculiar.
For heaven's sake, said Hope to Esther, who
had just joined her, do go in and make an
apology
for me. Say I am wet and tiredsay any
thing you please, I care not whatwill you?
that's a dear good girl.
No, Hopecome in yourselfaunt Winthrop
looked a little displeasedyou had best comeI
know she will expect it.
Thus beset, Hope dared not any longer hesitate,
and with that feeling, half resolution and half
impatience
to have a disagreeable thing over which
often impelled her, she descended the stairs as
hastily as she had ascended them, and was in the
parlour, confronting all the inquirers, before she
had devised any mode of relieving herself from
the disagreeable predicament of not being able
to satisfy their curiosity.
Verily, verily, exclaimed Cradock, who was
the only one of the groupe, not even excepting
Everell, whose sympathy mastered his curiosity
verily, the maiden hath been in peril; she is as
white as a snow-wreath, and as wet as a drowned
kitten.
Yes, Master Cradock, quite as wet, replied
Hope, rallying her spirits, and with almost as
little discretion left, or I should not have entered
the parlour in this dripping condition. Madam
Winthrop, I beg you will have the goodness to
pardon me for the trouble I have occasioned.
Certainly, my dear, as I doubt not you will
make it plain to us that you had sufficient reason
for what appears so extraordinary, as a young
woman wandering off by herself after nine
o'clock on Saturday night.
Our heroine had never had the slightest
experience
in the nice art of diplomacythat art that
contrives to give such a convenient indistinctness
to the boundary line between truth and falsehood.
After a moment's reflection, her course seemed
plain to her. To divulge the real motive of her
untimely walk, was impossibleto invent a false
excuse, to her, equally impossible. She turned
to Governor Winthrop and said, with a smile,
that Everell, at least, thought might have softened
the elder BrutusI surrender myself to the
laws of the land, having no hope, but from the
mercy of our magistrates. I have offended, I
know; but I should commit a worse offencean
offence against my own conscience and heartif
I explained the cause of my absence.
Governor Winthrop was not accustomed to
have his inquisitorial rights resisted by those of
his own household, and he was certainly more
struck than pleased by Hope's moral courage.
Mrs. Grafton half muttered, half spoke, what
she meant to be an apology for her favourite. It
was not every body, she said, that thought as
the Governor did about Saturday night.
True, true, said Cradock, eagerly, it is a
doubtful point with divines and gifted men.
Master Cradock, said the Governor, thou
art too apt to measure thy orthodoxy by thy
charity
.
Saturday night is allowed to be, and
manifestly
is, holy time; and therefore to be applied,
exclusively, to acts of mercy and devotion. Then
turning to the impatient culprit, he added, I am
bound to say to thee, Hope Leslie, that thou dost
take liberties unsuitable to thy youth, and in
violation
of that deference due to the rule and
observances
of my household, and discreditable to
him who hath been entrusted with thy nurture and
admonition.
Hope received the first part of this reproof with
her eyes rivetted to the floor, and with a
passiveness
that had the semblance of penitence; but
at the implied reproach of her guardian, for whom
she had an affection that had the purity of filial
and the enthusiasm of voluntary love, she raised
her eyestheir mild lustre, for an instant, gave
place to the passage of a flash of indignation
direct
from her heart. Her glance met Everell's
he stood in a recess of the window, leaning his
head against the casement, looking intently
on her. `He too suspects me of evil,' she thought,
and she could scarcely command her voice to say,
as she turned and put her hand in the elder
Fletcher's, I have done nothing to dishonour
you.
You
believe medo you not?
Yes, yes, my dear child; I must believe you,
for you never deceived mebut be not so
impatient
of reproof.
I am not impatient for myself, she said; I
care not how sternlyhow harshly I am judged;
but I see not why my fault, even if I had
committed
one, should cast a shadow upon you.
Madam Winthrop now interposed her good
offices
to calm the troubled waters. There is no
shadow any where, Miss Leslie, if there is
sunshine
in the conscience; and I can answer for the
Governor, that he will overlook the disturbance of
this evening, provided you are discreet in future.
But we are wrong to keep you so long in your
wet garments. Robin, she said, turning to a
servant, light a little fire in the young ladies'
room, and tell Jennet to warm Miss Leslie's bed
let her strew a little sugar in the panan
excellent
thing, Mrs. Grafton, to take soreness out of the
bones.
Madam Winthrop was solicitous to remove the
impression from her guests that Miss Leslie was
treated with undue strictness. Hope thanked her
for her kindness; and protesting that she had no
need of fire, or warming-pan, she hastily bade
good-night, and retired to her own apartment.
Miss Downing lingered a moment after her,
and ventured to say, in a low timid tone, that
she trusted her uncle Winthrop would harbour no
displeasure against her friendshe was sure
that she had been on some errand of kindness;
for, though she might sometimes indulge in a
blameable freedom of speech, she had ever
observed
her to be strict in all duties and offices of
mercy.
You are rightrightmarvellously right, Miss
Downing, cried Cradock, exultingly rubbing his
handsand then added, in a lower tone, a
discerning
young woman, Miss Esther.
Humph! said Mrs. Grafton, I don't see
any thing so
marvellously
right in what Miss
Esther saysit's what every body knows, who
knows Hope, that she never did a wrong thing.
Governor Winthrop suppressed a smile, and
said to the good lady, we should take heed, my
worthy friend, not to lay too much stress on doing
or not doingnot to rest unduly on duties and
performances, for they be unsound ground.
Mrs. Grafton might have thought if she had
enough such ground to stand on, it were terra
firma to her; but, for once, she had the discretion
of silence.
Neither Everell nor his father spoke, probably
because they felt more than all the rest; and
Madam
Winthrop, feeling the awkwardness of the
scene, mentioned the hour, and proposed a
general
dispersion.
Everell followed Miss Downing to the staircase.
One word, Miss Downing, he saidEsther
turned her face towards him, her pale face, for that
instant illuminateddid you, he asked, in
your apology for your friend, speak from
knowledge
or from generous faith?
From faith, she replied, but not generous
faith, for it was founded on experience.
Everell turned, disappointed, away. `Faith,'
he thought, `there might be without sightbut
faith against sight, never.' Trifles light as air
are proverbially momentous matters to lovers.
Everell had too noble a mind to indulge in that
fretful jealousy which is far more the result of
egregious self-love than love of another. But he
had cherished for Hope a consecrating sentiment
he had invested her with a sacredness which
the most refined, the purest, and most elevated
love throws around the object of its devotion.
On magic ground that castle stoode,
And fenc'd with many a spelle.
Were these spelles to be dissolved by the light
of truth? `Why should one,' thought Everell,
`who seemed so pure that she might dwell in
lightso artless, confiding, and fearlesswhy
should she permit herself to be obscured by
mystery
?
If her meeting with Sir Philip Gardiner
was accidental, why not say so?But what
right have I to scan her conduct?What right
to expect an explanation?It is evident she
feels nothing more for me than the familiar
affection
of her childhood. How she talked to me this
evening of Esther Downing!`if she had a
brother
,
she would select her friend from all the
world for his wife'`Esther was not precise, she
was only discreet'`she was not formal, but
timid
.'
Perhaps she sees I love her, and thus
delicately
tries to give a different bent to my
affections
;
but that is impossibleevery hopeevery
purpose has been concentrated in her. My
affections
may be blighted, but they cannot be
transferred
Perhaps
it is true, as some satirists say,
that a woman's heart is wayward, fantastic, and
capricious. This vagrant knight has scarcely
turned his eyes from Hope since he first saw her,
and I know he has addressed the most
presumptuous
flattery to her. Perhaps she favours his
pretensions. I shrink even from his gazing on
her, as if there were something sullying in the
glance of his eye; and yet she violates the
customs
of the countryshe braves severe
displeasure
to
walk alone with himwith him she is
insensible to a gathering storm. He is incapable
of loving herhe is intoxicated with her beauty
he seeks her fortuneHer fortune! I had
forgotten that my father made that a bar
between
us. Fortune!I never thought of any
thing so mean as wealth in connexion with her.
I would as soon barter my soul, as seek any woman
for fortuneand Hope Leslie!oh, I should as
soon think of the dowry of a celestial spirit, as of
your being enriched by the trappings of fortune.
These disjointed thoughts, and many others that
would naturally spring up in the mind of a young
lover, indicated the ardor, the enthusiasm, the
disinterestedness
of Everell's passion, and the
restless
and fearful state into which he had been
plunged by the events of the evening.
While he was pursuing this train of fancies, in
which some sweetness mingled with the bitter,
Esther had followed Hope to her apartment, and
Vol. II. 2
having shut the door, turned on her friend a look
of speaking inquiry and expectation, to which
Hope did not respond, but continued in a
hurried
manner to disrobe herself, throwing her
drenched shawl on one side, and her wet dress on
the other.
Esther took a silver whistle from the toilet,
and was opening the door to summon Jennet with
its shrill call, when Hope, observing her intention,
cried out, If you love me, Esther, don't call
Jennet to-night; I wish at least to be spared her
croaking.
As you please, replied Esther, quietly
reclosing
the door; I thought Jennet had best
come, and take care of your apparel, as, if your
mind was not otherwise occupied, you would not
choose to leave it in such disorder. While
Esther
spoke, she stood by the toilet, smoothing her
kerchief, and restoring it to the laundress' folds.
Yes, said Hope, I prefer any disorder to
the din of Jennet's tongue. I cannot, Esther
I
cannot always be precise.
Precision, I know, is not interesting, said
Esther, with a slight tremulousness of voice; but
if you had a little more of it, Hope, it would save
yourself, and your friends a vast deal of trouble.
Now, do not you reproach me, Esther!that
is the drop too much! said Hope, turning her
face to the pillow, to hide the tears that gushed
from her eyes: I know I am vexed and cross
but I did not mean that you was too precise;I
I do not know what I meant. I feel oppressed
and weariedand I want sympathy, and not
reproof.
Unburthen your heart then, to me, said
Esther
,
kneeling by the bed-side, and throwing her
arm over Hope: most gladly would I pay back
the debt of sympathy I owe you.
And never, dear Esther, did a poor creditor
receive a debt more joyfully than I should this.
But others are concerned in my secret; a sacred
promise requires me to preserve it inviolate. The
Governor, and your aunt, and all of them might
have knownand, most of all, Everellshe
continued
,
raising herself on her elbowthey might
have known, that I should not have been roaming
about such a pitiless night as this, without good
reason;and Everell, I am sure, knows that I
despise the silliness of making a secret out of
nothing. I don't care so much for the rest; but
it was very, very unkind of Everell!I am sure
my heart has been always open as the day to
him.
Perhaps Miss Downing was not quite pleased
with Hope's discriminating between the censure
of Everell, and the rest of the family; for she
said, with more even than her ordinary gravity
There is but one thing, Hope, that ought to
make you independent of the opinion of any of
your friends.
And what is that?
The acquittal of your conscience.
My conscience!Oh, my dear Esther, no
mother Lois, nor grandmother Eunice, ever had
a more quiet conscience than I have at this
moment
;and
I really wish that my tutors,
governors
good
friends allwould not think it
necessary
to keep quite so strict a guard over me.
Hope Leslie, said Esther, you do allow
yourself too much liberty of thought and word:
you certainly know that we owe implicit
deference
to our elders and superiors;we ought to
be guided by their advice, and governed by their
authority.
Esther, you are a born preacher, exclaimed
Hope, with a sort of half sigh, half groan of
impatience
.
Nay, my dear friend, don't look so
horridly solemn: I am sure, if I have wounded
your feelings, I deserve to be preached to all the
rest of my life. But really I do not entirely agree
with you about advice and authority. As to
advice
,
it needs to be very carefully administered,
to do any good, else it's like an injudicious patch,
which, you know, only makes the rent worse;
and as to authority, I would not be a machine, to
be moved at the pleasure of anybody that
happened
to be a little older than myself. I am
perfectly
willing to submit to Mr. Fletcher, for he
neverand she smiled at her own sophistry
he never requires submission. Now, Esther,
don't look at me so, as if I was little better than
one of the wicked. Come, kiss me good night;
and when you say your prayers, Esther,
remember
me, for I need them more than you think.
This last request was made in a plaintive tone,
and with unaffected seriousness, and Esther
turned away to perform the duty, with a deep
feeling of its necessity; for Hope, conscious of
her integrity, had perhaps been too impatient of
rebuke; and if to a less strict judge than Esther,
she seems to have betrayed a little of the spoiled
child, to her she appeared to be very far from that
gracious state, wherein every word is weighed
before
it is uttered, and every action measured
before
it is performed.
2*
CHAPTER II.
Those well seene natives in grave Nature's hests,
All close designs conceal in their deep brests.
Morrell
.
It
would be highly improper any longer to keep
our readers in ignorance of the cause of our
heroine's
apparent aberration from the line of strict
propriety. After her conversation with Everell,
in which we must infer, from its effect on his
mind, that she manifested less art than zeal in her
friend's cause, she was retiring to her own
apartment
,
when on passing through the hall, she saw
an Indian woman standing there, requesting the
servant who had admitted her, to ask the young
ladies of the house if they would look at some
rare moccasins.
Miss Leslie was arrested by the uncommon
sweetness of the stranger's voice; and fixing her
eye on her, she was struck with the singular
dignity
and grace of her demeanor, a certain air
indicating an inborn royalty of soul, that even
the ugly envelope of a blanket did not conceal.
The stranger seemed equally interested in Miss
Leslie's appearance, and fixing her eye intently
on herPray try my moccasins, lady, she said
earnestly.
Oh, certainly, I should of all things like to
buy a pair of you, said Hope, and advancing,
she was taking them from her shoulder, over
which they were slung, when she, ascertaining by
a quick glance that the servant had disappeared,
gently repressed Miss Leslie's hand, saying at the
same time, Tell me thy name, lady.
My name!Hope Leslie. But who art thou?
Hope asked in return, in a voice rendered almost
inarticulate by the thought that flashed into her
mind.
The stranger cast down her eyes, and for an
half instant hesitated, then looking
apprehensively
around, she said, in low distinct accents, Hope
LeslieI am Magawisca.
Magawisca! echoed Hope. Oh, Everell!
and she sprang towards the parlour door to
summon
Everell.
Silencestay, cried Magawisca, with a
vehement
gesture, and at the same time turning
to escape should Hope prosecute her intention.
Hope perceived this, and again approached
her. It cannot then be Magawisca, she said, and
she trembled as she spoke, with doubts, hopes,
and fears.
Magawisca might have at once identified
herself
,
by opening her blanket, and disclosing her
person; but that she did not, no one will wonder
who knows that a savage feels more even than
ordinary sensibility at personal deformity. She
took from her bosom a necklace of hair and gold
entwined together. Dost thou know this? she
asked. Is it not like that thou wearest?
Hope grasped it, pressed it to her lips, and
answered
by exclaiming passionatelyMy sister!
my sister!
Yesit is a token from thy sister. Listen to
me, Hope Lesliemy time is briefI may not
stay here another moment; but come to me this
evening at nine o'clock at the burial place, a
little beyond the clump of pines, and I will give
thee tidings of thy sister; keep what I say in thine
own bosom; tell no one thou hast seen me; come
alone,
and fear not.
Oh, I have no fear, exclaimed Hope,
vehemently
,
but tell metell me.
Magawisca put her finger on her lips in token of
silence, for at this instant the door was again
opened; not by the servant who had before
appeared
,
but by Jennet. Magawisca instantly
recognised
her, and turned as if in the act of
departing
.
Time had indeed wrought little change on
Jennet
,
save imparting a shriller squeak to her
doleful
voice, and a keener edge to her sharp features.
Madam Winthrop, she said, is engaged
now, but says you may call some other time with
your moccasins; and I would advise you to let it
be any other than the fag end of a Saturday; a
wrong season for temporalities.
While Jennet was uttering this superfluous
counsel, Hope sprang off the steps after
Magawisca
,
anxious for some farther light on her
dawning
expectations. Stay, oh stay, she said,
one moment, and let me try your moccasins.
At the same instant Mrs. Grafton appeared
from the back parlour, evidently in a great flurry.
Here, you Indian woman, she screamed, let
me see your moccasins.
Thus beset, Magawisca was constrained to
retrace
her steps, and confront the danger of
discovery
.
She drew her blanket closer over her
head and face, and re-ascending the steps, threw
her moccasins on the floor, and cautiously averted
her face from the light. It was too evident to
her, that Jennet had some glimmering
recollections
;
for while she affected to busy herself with
the moccasins, she turned her inquisitorial gray
eye towards her, with a look of sharp scrutiny.
Once Magawisca with a movement of involuntary
disdain returned her glance. Jennet dropped the
moccasins as suddenly as if she had received a
blow, hemmed as if she were choking, and put
her hand on the nob of the parlour door.
Oh, thought Magawisca, I am lost! but
Jennet, confused by her misty recollections,
relinquished
her purpose, whatever it was, and
returned
to the examination of the moccasins. In the
meanwhile Hope stood behind her aunt and
Jennet; her hands clasped, and her beautiful eyes
bent on Magawisca with a supplicating inquiry.
Mrs. Grafton, as usual, was intent on her traffic.
It was odd enough of Madam Winthrop, she
said, not to let me know these moccasins were
here; she knew I wanted them; at least she
must know I might want them; and if I don't
want them, that's nothing to the purpose. I like
to look at every thing that's going. It is a
diversion
to the mind. A neat article, she continued,
I should like you to have a pair, Hope. Sir
Philip said yesterday, they gave a trig look to a
pretty foot and ankle. How much does she ask
for them?
I do not know, replied Hope.
Do not know! that's peculiar of you, Hope
Leslie; you never inquire the price of any thing.
I dare say, Tawney expects enough for them to
buy all the glass beads in Boston. Ha,
Tawney
?
Mrs. Grafton now, for the first time, turned
from the articles to their possessor: she was struck
with an air of graceful haughtiness in her demeanor,
strongly contrasting with the submiss, dejected
deportment of the natives whom she was in the
habit of seeing, and dropping the moccasins and
turning to Hope, she whisperedBest buy a
pair, dearieby all means buy a pairpay her
any thing she asksbest keep peace with them,
`never affront dogs, nor Indians.'
Hope wanted no urging, but anxious to get rid
of the witnesses that embarrassed her, and quick
of invention, she directed Jennet to go for her
purse, which she would find in a certain basket,
or drawer, or some where else; and reminded
her aunt that she had promised to call in at Mrs.
Cotton's, on her way to lecture, to look at her
hyacinths, and that she had no time to lose.
Jennet obeyed, and Mrs Grafton said, that's
true, and it's thoughtful of you to think of it, Hope;
but, she added, lowering her voice, I would not
like to leave you alone, so I'll just open the
parlour
door.
Before Hope could intercept her, she set the
door ajar, and through the aperture Magawisca
had a perfect view of Everell, who was sitting
musing in the window seat. An involuntary
exclamation
burst from her lips; and then
shuddering
at this exposure of her feelings, she hastily
gathered together the moccasins that were strewn
over the floor, dropped a pair at Hope's feet, and
darted away.
Hope had heard the exclamation and
understood
it. Mrs. Grafton heard it without
understanding
it, and followed Magawisca to the door,
calling after herDo stay and take a little
something; Madam Winthrop has always a bone
to give away. Ah! you might as well call after
the wind; she has already turned the corner.
Heaven send she may not bear malice against us!
What do you think, Hope? Mrs. Grafton turned
to appeal to her niece, but she, foreseeing endless
interrogatories, had made good her retreat, and
escaped to her own apartment.
Jennet, however, came to the good lady's
relief
;
listened to all her conjectures and
apprehensions
,
and reciprocated her own.
Jennet could not say what it was in the woman,
but she had the strangest feeling all the time she
was there; a mysterious beating of her heart that
she could not account for; as to her disappearing
so suddenly, that she did not think much of; the
foresters were always impatient to get to their
haunts; they were like the wild ass, that the
scripture saith, scorneth the multitude of a city.
But we leave Mrs. Grafton and Jennet to their
unedifying conference, to follow our heroine to
the privacy of her own apartment. There, in the
first rush of her newly awakened feelings, till then
repressed, she wept like a child, and repeated
again and again, Oh, my sister! my sister! Her
mind was in a tumult; she knew not what to
believewhat to expectwhat to hope.
But accustomed to diffuse over every
anticipation
the sunny hue of her own happy
temperament
,
she flattered herself that she should even
that night meet her sisterthat she would be for
ever restored to herthat the chord, severed by
the cruel disaster at Bethel, would be refolded
about their hearts. She had but a brief space to
compose herself, and that was passed in fervent
supplications for the blessing of God upon her
hopes. She must go to the lecture, and after
that trust to her ingenuity to escape to the
rendezvous
.
The thought of danger or exposure
never entered her mind, for she was not addicted
to fear; and as she reflected on the voice and
deportment of the stranger, she was convinced she
could be none other than Magawisca, the
heroine
of Everell's imagination, whom he had taught
her to believe, was one of those, who,
Without arte's bright lampe, by nature's eye,
Keep just promise, and love equitie.
Almost as impatient to go to the lecture, as she
was afterwards to escape from it, (we trust our
readers have absolved her for her apparent
indecorum
in the sanctuary,) she had tied and untied
her hat twenty times before she heard the ringing
of the bell for the assembling of the
congregation
.
She refused, as has been seen, the escort
of Everell, for she dared not expose to him,
emotions
which she could not explain.
After the various detentions, which have been
already detailed, she arrived at the appointed
rendezvous
,
and there saw Magawisca, and
Magawisca
alone, kneeling before an upright stake,
planted at one end of a grave. She appeared
occupied in delineating a figure on the stake,
with a small implement she held in her hand,
which she dipped in a shell placed on the ground
beside her.
Hope paused with a mingled feeling of
disappointment
and awe; disappointment that her
sister
was not thereand awe inspired by the
solemnity
of the scene before herthe spirit-stirring
Vol. II. 3
figure of Magawiscathe duty she was
performing
the
flickering lightthe monumental stones
and the dark shadows that swept over them, as
the breeze bowed the tall pines. She drew her
mantle, that fluttered in the breeze, close around
her, and almost suppressed her breath, that she
might not disturb, what she believed to be an act
of filial devotion.
Magawisca was not unconscious of Miss
Leslie's
approach; but she deemed the office in which
she was engaged, too sacred to be interrupted.
She accompanied the movement of her hand with
a low chant in her native tongue; and so sweet
and varied were the tones of her voice, that it
seemed to Hope they might have been breathed
by an invisible spirit.
When she had finished her work, she leaned her
head for a moment against the stake, and then
rose and turned to Miss Leslie; a moonbeam
shot across her face; it was wet with tears, but
she spoke in a tranquil voice. You have come
and alone? she said, casting a searching glance
around her.
I promised to come alone, replied Hope.
Yesand I trusted you; and I will trust you
further, for the good deed you did Nelema.
Nelema then lived to reach you?
She didwasted, faint, and dying, she crawled
into my father's wigwam. She had but scant
time, and short breath; with that she cursed your
race, and she blessed you, Hope Leslie; her day
was endedthe hand of death pressed her throat,
and even then she made me swear to perform her
promise to you.
And you will, Magawisca, cried Hope
impetuously
;
you will give me back my sister.
Nay, that she never promisedthat I cannot
do. I cannot send back the bird that has mated
to its parent nest; the stream that has mingled
with other waters to its fountain.
Oh, do not speak to me in these dark
sayings
,
replied Hope; her smooth brow
contracting
with impatience and apprehension, and her
hurried manner and convulsed countenance
contrasting
strongly with the calmness of Magawisca;
what is it you mean?where is my sister?
She is safeshe is near to youand you
shall see her, Hope Leslie.
But when?and where, Magawisca? Oh, if
I could once clasp her in my arms, she never
should leave meshe never should be torn from
me again.
Those arms, said Magawisca, with a faint
smile, could no more retain thy sister, than a
spider's web. The lily of the Maqua's valley,
will never again make the English garden sweet.
Speak plainer to me, cried Hope, in a voice
of entreaty that could not be resisted. Is my
sister?she paused, for her quivering lips
could not pronounce the words that rose to them.
Magawisca understood her, and replied. Yes,
Hope Leslie, thy sister is married to Oneco.
God forbid! exclaimed Hope, shuddering as
if a knife had been plunged in her bosom. My
sister married to an Indian!
An Indian! exclaimed Magawisca, recoiling
with a look of proud contempt, that showed she
reciprocated with full measure, the scorn
expressed
for her race. Yesan Indian, in whose
veins runs the blood of the strongest, the fleetest
of the children of the forest, who never turned
their backs on friends or enemies, and whose
souls have returned to the Great Spirit, stainless
as they came from him. Think ye that your blood
will be corrupted by mingling with this stream?
Long before Magawisca ceased to pour out her
indignation, Hope's first emotion had given
place to a burst of tears; she wept aloud, and
her broken utterance of, Oh, my sister! my
sister
!My
dear mother! emitted but imperfect
glimpses of the ruined hopes, the bitter feelings
that oppressed her.
There was a chord in Magawisca's heart, that
needed but the touch of tenderness to respond in
harmony; her pride vanished, and her
indignation
gave place to sympathy. She said in a low
soothing voiceNow do not weep thus; your
sister is well with us. She is cherished as the
bird cherishes her young. The cold winds may
not blow on her, nor the fierce sun scorch her;
nor a harsh sound ever be spoken to her; she is
dear to Mononotto as if his own blood ran in her
veins; and OnecoOneco worships and serves
her as if all good spirits dwelt in her. Oh, she is
indeed well with us.
There lies my mother, cried Hope, without
seeming to have heard Magawisca's consolations,
she lost her life in bringing her children to this
wild world, to secure them in the fold of Christ.
Oh God! restore my sister to the christian family.
And here, said Magawisca, in a voice of
deep pathos, here is my mother's grave; think
ye not that the Great Spirit looks down on these
sacred spots, where the good and the peaceful
rest, with an equal eye; think ye not their
children
are His children, whether they are gathered
in yonder temple where your people worship, or
bow to Him beneath the green boughs of the
forest?
There was certainly something thrilling in
Magawisca's
faith, and she now succeeded in
rivetting
Hope's attention. Listen to me, she said;
your sister is of what you call the christian
family. I believe ye have many names in that
family. She hath been signed with the cross by
a holy father from France; she bows to the
crucifix
.
Thank God! exclaimed Hope fervently, for
she thought that any christian faith was better
than none.
Perhaps ye are right, said Magawisca, as if
she read Hope's heart; there may be those that
need other lights; but to me, the Great Spirit is
visible in the life-creating sun. I perceive Him
3*
in the gentle light of the moon that steals in
through the forest boughs. I feel Him here, she
continued, pressing her hand on her breast, while
her face glowed with the enthusiasm of devotion.
I feel Him in these ever-living, ever-wakeful
thoughtsbut we waste time. You must see
your sister.
When, and where? again demanded Hope.
Before I answer you, you must promise me
by this sign, and she pointed to the emblem of her
tribe, an eagle, which she had rudely delineated
on the post, that served as a head-stone to her
mother's grave; you must promise me by the
bright host of Heaven, that the door of your lips
shall be fast; that none shall know that you have
seen me, or are to see me again.
I promise, said Hope, with her
characteristic
precipitancy.
Then, when five suns have risen and set, I
will return with your sister. But hush, she said,
suddenly stopping, and turning a suspicious eye
towards the thicket of evergreens.
It was but the wind, said Hope, rightly
interpreting
Magawisca's quick glance, and the
slight inclination of her head.
You would not betray me? said Magawisca,
in a voice of mingled assurance and inquiry.
Oh, more than ever entered into thy young
thoughts, hangs upon my safety.
But why any fear for your safety? why not
come openly among us? I will get the word of
our good Governor, that you shall come and go
in peace. No one ever feared to trust his word.
You know not what you ask.
Indeed I dobut you, Magawisca, know
not what you refuseand why refuse? are you
afraid of being treated like a recovered prisoner?
Oh no! every one will delight to honour you, for
your very name is dear to all Mr. Fletcher's
friendsmost dear to Everell.
Dear to Everell Fletcher! Does he remember
me? Is there a place in his heart for an Indian?
she demanded, with a blended expression of pride
and melancholy.
Yesyes, Magawiscaindeed is there,
replied
Hope, for now she thought she had touched
the right key. It was but this morning, that
he said he had a mind to take an Indian guide,
and seek you out among the Maquas.
Magawisca
hid her face in the folds of her mantle,
and Hope proceeded with increasing earnestness.
There is nothing in the wide world, there is
nothing that Everell thinks so good, and so noble
as you. Oh, if you could but have seen his
joy, when after your parting on that horrid rock,
he first heard you was living. He has described
you so often and so truly, that the moment I saw
you, and heard your voice, I said to myself, `this
is surely Everell's Magawisca.'
Say no more, Hope Lesliesay no more,
exclaimed Magawisca, throwing back the
envelope
from her face, as if she were ashamed to
shelter emotions she ought not to indulge. I
have promised my fatherI have repeated the
vow here on my mother's grave, and if I were to
go back from it, those bright witnesses, she
pointed to the heavens, would break their
silence. Do not speak to me again of Everell
Fletcher.
Oh, yesonce again, Magawisca; if you will
not listen to me, if you will but give me this brief,
mysterious meeting with my poor sister, at least
let Everell be with me; for his sakefor my sake
for your own sake, do not refuse me.
Magawisca looked on Hope's glowing face for
a moment, and then shook her head with a
melancholy
smile. They tell me, she said, that
no one can look on you and deny you aught;
that you can make old men's hearts soft, and
mould them at your will; but I have learned to
deny even the cravings of my own heart; to
pursue
my purpose like the bird that keeps her wing
stretched to the toilsome flight, though the
sweetest
note of her mate recalls her to the nest.
But ah! I do but boast, she continued, casting
her eyes to the ground. I may not trust myself;
that was a childish scream, that escaped me when
I saw Everell; had my father heard it, his cheek
would have been pale with shame. No, Hope
Leslie, I may not listen to thee. You must come
alone to the meeting, or never meet your sister
will you come?
Hope saw in the determined manner of
Magawisca
,
that there was no alternative but to accept
the boon on her own terms, and she no longer
withheld her compliance. The basis of their
treaty being settled, the next point to be
arranged
,
was the place of meeting. Magawisca had
no objections to venture again within the town;
but then it would be necessary to completely
disguise
Faith Leslie; and she hinted that she
understood
enough of Hope's English feelings, to know
that she would wish to see her sister with the pure
tint of her natural complexion.
Hope had too much delicacy, and too much
feeling, even inadvertently to appear to lay much
stress on this point; but the experience of the
evening made her feel the difficulty of arranging
a meeting, surrounded as she was by vigilant
friends, and within the sphere of their observation.
Suddenly it occurred to her, that Digby, her fast
friend, and on more than one occasion her trusty
ally, had the superintendence of the Governor's
garden, on an island in the harbor, and within
three miles of the town. The Governor's family
were in the habit of resorting thither frequently.
Digby had a small habitation there, of which he
and his family were the only tenants, and indeed
were the only persons who dwelt on the island.
Hope was certain of permission to pass a night
there, where she might indulge in an interview
with her sister of any length, without hazard of
interruption; and having explained her plan to
Magawisca, it received her ready and full
acquiescence
.
Before they separated, Hope said, you will
allow me, Magawisca, to persuade my sister, if I
can, to remain with me.
Oh yesif you canbut do not hope to
persuade
her. She and my brother are as if one
life-chord
bound them together; and besides, your
sister cannot speak to you and understand you as
I do. She was very young when she was taken
where she has only heard the Indian tongue;
some, you know, are like water, that retains no
mark; and others, like the flinty rock, that never
loses a mark. Magawisca observed Hope's look
of disappointment; and in a voice of pity, she
added, your sister hath a face that speaketh
plainly, what the tongue should never speak, her
own goodness.
When these two romantic females had
concerted
every measure they deemed essential to the
certainty and privacy of their meeting,
Magawisca
bowed her head, and kissed the border of
Hope's shawl, with the reverent delicacy of an
oriental salutation; she then took from beneath
her mantle some fragrant herbs, and strewed
them over her mother's grave, then prostrated
herself in deep and silent devotion, feeling (as
others have felt on earth thus consecrated) as if
the clods she pressed were instinct with life.
When this last act of filial love was done, she rose,
muffled herself closely in her dark mantle, and
departed
.
Hope lingered for a moment. Mysteriously,
she said, as her eye followed the noble figure of
Magawisca, till it was lost in the surrounding
darkness
,
mysteriously have our destinies been
interwoven
.
Our mothers brought from a far
distance
to rest together heretheir children
connected
in indissoluble bonds!
But Hope was soon aware that this was no
time for solitary meditation. In the interest of
her interview with Magawisca, she had been
heedless
of the gathering storm. The clouds rolled
over the moon suddenly, like the unfurling of a
banner, and the rain poured down in torrents.
Hope had no light to guide her, but occasional
flashes of lightning, and the candle, whose little
beam proceeding from Mr. Cotton's study
window
,
pierced the dense sheet of rain.
Hope hurried her steps homewards, and as she
passed the knot of evergreens, she fancied she
heard a rattling of the boughs, as if there were
some struggling within, and a suppressed voice
saying, histwhish. She paused, and with a
resolute step, turned towards the thicket; we
have been overheard, she thought, this
generous
creature shall not be betrayed. At this
instant
a thunder-bolt burst over her head, and the
whole earth seemed kindled with one bright
illumination
.
She was terrified, and, perhaps, as
much convinced by her fears, as her reason, that
it was both imprudent, and useless, to make any
further investigation, she again bent her quick
steps towards home. She had scarcely
surmounted
the fence, which she passed more like a
winged
spirit, than a fine lady, when Sir Philip
Gardiner
joined her.
Miss Leslie! he exclaimed, as a flash of
lightning revealed her person. Now, thanks to
my good stars, that I am so fortunate as to meet
you; suffer me to wrap my cloak about you; you
will be drenched with this pitiless rain.
Oh, no, no, she said, the cloak will but
encumber
me. I am already drenched, and I shall
be at home directly, and she would have left
him, but he caught her arm, and gently detained
her, while he enveloped her in his cloak.
It should not be a trifle, Miss Leslie, that has
kept you out, regardless of this gathering storm,
Sir Philip said inquiringly. Miss Leslie made no
reply, and he proceeded. You may have
forgotten
it is Saturday nightor, perhaps, you have
a dispensation.
Neither, replied Hope.
Neither! then I am sure you are abroad in
some godly cause, for you need to be one of the
righteous, who, we are told, are as bold as a lion,
to confront the Governor's family after
trespassing
on holy time.
I have no fears, said Hope.
No fears! that is a rare exemption, for a
young lady; but I would that you possessed one
still more rare; she who is incapable of fear, should
never be exposed to danger; and if I had a
charmed
shield, I would devote my life to sheltering
you from all harmmay notmay not love be
such an one?
It's useless talking, Sir Philip, replied Hope;
if that could be deemed a reply, which seemed
to have rather an indirect relation to the previous
address. It is useless talking in this rattling
storm, your words drop to the ground with the
hail-stones.
And every word you utter, said the knight,
biting his lips with vexation, not only penetrates
my ear, but sinks into my heart; therefore, I pray
you to be merciful, and do not make my heart
heavy.
The hail-stones melt as they touch the ground,
and my words pass away as soon, I fancy, said
Hope, with the most provoking nonchalance.
Sir Philip had no time to reply; they were just
turning into the court in front of Governor
Winthrop's
house, when a flash of lightning, so vivid
that its glare almost blinded them, disclosed the
figure of the mysterious page leaning against the
gate-post, his head inclined forward as if in the
act of listening, his cap in his hand, his dark curls
in wild disorder over his face and neck, and he
apparently unconscious of the storm. They both
recoiledHope uttered an exclamation of pity.
Ha, Roslin! burst in a tone of severe reproach
from Sir Philip; but instantly changing it for one
of kindness, he added, you should not have
waited
for me, boy, in such a storm.
Vol. II. 4
I cared not for the stormI did not feel it,
replied the lad, in a penetrating voice, which
recalled
to Miss Leslie all he had said to her, and
induced her to check her first impulse to bid him
in; she therefore passed him without any further
notice, ascended the steps, and as has been
related
in the preceding chapter, met Everell in the
hall.
It is necessary to state briefly to our readers,
some particulars in relation to the re-appearance
of Magawisca, which events have not as yet
explained.
Her father, from the hour of his expulsion
from his own dominion, had constantly
meditated
revenge. His appetite was not sated at
Bethelthat massacre seemed to him but a
retaliation
for his private wrongs. The catastrophe
on the sacrifice-rock disordered his reason for a
time; and the Indians, who perceived something
extraordinary in the energy of his unwavering
and undivided purpose, never believed it to be
perfectly restored. But this, so far from
impairing
their confidence, converted it to implicit
deference
,
for they, in common with certain oriental
nations, believe that an insane person is inspired;
that the Divinity takes possession of the temple
which the spirit of the man has abandoned.
Whatever Mononotto predicted, was believed
whatever he ordered, was done.
He felt that Oneco's volatile unimpressive
character
was unfit for his purpose, and he
permitted
him to pursue without intermission, his own
pleasureto hunt and fish for his `white bird,' as
he called the little Leslie. But Magawisca was
the constant companion of her father; susceptible
and contemplative, she soon imbibed his
melancholy
,
and became as obedient to the impulse of
his spirit, as the most faithful are to the fancied
intimations of the Divinity. She was the
priestess
of the oracle. Her tenderness for Everell,
and her grateful recollections of his lovely
mother
,
she determined to sacrifice on the altar of
national duty.
In the years 1642 and 1643 there was a
general
movement among the Indians. Terrible
massacres
were perpetrated in the English
settlements
in Virginia; the Dutch establishments in
New-York were invaded, and rumours of secret
and brooding hostility kept the colonies of
New-England
in a state of perpetual alarm.
Mononotto
determined to avail himself of this crisis,
that appeared so favourable to his design, of
uniting
all the tribes of New-England in one
powerful
combination. He first applied to
Miantunnomoh
,
hoping by his personal influence to
persuade
that powerful and crafty chief to sacrifice
to the general good, his private feud with Uncas,
the chief of the Mohegans.
Mononotto eloquently pressed those arguments,
which, as is allowed by the historian of the
Indian
wars, seemed to right reason, not only
pregnant
to the purpose, but also most cogent and
invincible, and for a time, they prevailed over
the mind of Miantunnomoh.
Vague rumours of conspiracy reached Boston;
and the Governor summoned Miantunnomoh to
appear before his court, and abide an examination
there. The chief accordingly, (as has been seen)
came to Boston; but so artfully did he manage
his cause, as to screen from the English every just
ground of offence. Their suspicions, however,
were not removed; for Hubbard says, though
his words were smoother than oil, yet many
conceived
in his heart were drawn swords.
It may appear strange, that while prosecuting
so hazardous and delicate an enterprise,
Mononotto
should have encumbered himself with his
family
.
Magawisca was necessary to him; and he
submitted to be accompanied by Oneco and his
bride, from respect to the dying declaration of
Nelema, that his plans could never be
accomplished
till her promise to Hope Leslie had been
redeemedtill, as she had sworn to her
preserver
,
the sisters had met.
Had the Indians been capable of a firm
combination
,
the purpose of Mononotto might have
been achieved, and the English have been then
driven from the American soil. But the natives
were thinly scattered over an immense tract of
countrythe different tribes divided by petty
rivalships
,
and impassable gulfs of long
transmitted
hatred. They were brave and strong, but it
was brute force without art or arms: they had
ingenuity
to form, and they did form, artful
conspiracies
,
but their best concerted plans were
betrayed
by the timid, or the treacherous.
But to return to our individual concerns.
Mononotto
trusted to his daughter the arrangement
of the meeting of the sisters, which from his
having
a superstitious notion that it was in some
way to influence his political purposes, he was
anxious to promote. Magawisca left her
companions
at an Indian station on the Neponset
river
,
and proceeded herself to Boston, to seek a
private interview with Hope Leslie. The
appearance
of an Indian woman in Boston excited
no observation, the natives being in the habit of
resorting there daily with game, fish, and their rude
manufactures. Aware of the necessity of
disguising
every peculiarity, she unbound her hair from
the braids in which it was usually confined, and
combed it thick over her forehead, after the
fashion of the aborigines in the vicinity of
Boston
,
whom Eliot describes as wearing this `
maiden
veil.' She enveloped herself in a blanket
that concealed the rich dress which it was her
father's pride, (and perhaps her pleasure) that
she should wear. Thus disguised, and favoured
by the kind shadows of twilight, she presented
herself
at Governor Winthrop's, and was, as has
already
appeared, successful in her mission.
4*
CHAPTER III.
I could find in my heart to disgrace my man's apparel,
and to cry like a woman.
As you like it
.
Sir Philip Gardiner,
by the kind offices of
Governor Winthrop, had obtained lodgings at
one Daniel Maud's, the `first recorded
school-master'
in Boston. Thither he went, followed by
his moody page, after receiving his cloak from our
thankless heroine.
Not one word passed between him and his
attendant
;
and after they reached their apartment,
the boy, instead of performing the customary
servile
duties of his station, threw himself on a
cushion, and covering his face with his hands, he
seemed lost in his own sorrowful meditations.
There had been a little fire kindled on the
hearth, on account of the inclemency of the night.
Sir Philip laid the fallen brands together, lighted
the candles, arranged his writing materials on the
table, and without permitting himself to be
interrupted
,
or in the least affected by the sobs that,
at intervals, proceeded from his companion, he
indited the following epistle.
To my good and trusty Wilton,
`In the name of Heaven, what sends you to
New-England?' were your last words to me. I
had not time to answer your question then, and
perhaps, when I have finished, you will say I have
not ability now; but who can explain the motives
of his conduct? Who can always say, after an
action is done, that he had sufficient motive? Not
one of us, Wilton, sons of whim and folly that
we are! But my motives, such as they were, are
at your serviceso here you have them.
I was tired of playing a losing game; even
rats, you know, have an instinct by which they
flee a falling house. I had some compunctious
visitings at leaving my king when he hath such
cruel need of loyal servantsjeer not, Wilton,
I had my scruples. It was a saying of Father
Baretti, that when Lucifer fell, conscience, that
once guided, remained to torment him. My
assertion
thus modestly illustrated, have I not a right
to say, I had scruples? I was wearied with a
series
of ill-luck, and as other men are as good to
fill a ditch, I have retired till dame fortune shall
see fit to give her wheel a turn in my royalmaster's
favour.
Butwhy
come
hither?to submit to `King
Winthrop and all his inventionshis Amsterdam
fantastical ordinanceshis preachings, marryings,
and other abusive ceremonies?'Patience, my
good gossip, and I will tell thee.
You have heard of my old friend and patron,
Thomas Morton of Furnival's Inn; and you know
he was once master of a fine domain here, at
Mount Wollaston, for which his revels obtained
the name of the `Merry Mount.' The ruling
saintships of this New-English Canaan were so
scandalized, because forsooth, he avowed and
followed
the free tastes of a gentleman, that they
ejected him from his own territory.
He once well-nigh obtained redress from the
king, and a decree in his favour passed the
privy-seal
,
but the influence of his enemies finally
prevailed
.
He has had the consolation of sundry
retaliations on his opponents; now, as he said,
`uncasing Medusa's head, and raising the old ghost
of Sir F. George's patent,' and then thrusting home
the keen point of his satiric verse. However,
though this was a bitter draught to his
adversaries
,
it was but lean satisfaction to him; and
having
become old, and poor, and lost his spirit, he
came hither once more, last winter, in the hope
of obtaining an act of oblivion of all past
grievances
,
and a restitution of his rights.
Immediately after his arrival, he wrote to me
that `
Joshua
had promised to restore to him, and
to his tribe, their lot in the inheritance of the
faithfulthat he was again to be king of the
revels
on the `merry mount,' where he invited me
to live with him, his prime minister, and heir
apparent
.'
The letter came to hand at a moment
when I was wearied with a bootless service, and
willing to grasp any novelty; and accordingly I
closed with the offer, but lo! on my arrival, I
found that Morton, instead of being reinstated at
Mount Wollaston, is in jail, and in honest opinion,
is reputed crazyas, doubtless, he is! Laugh at
me, Wilton, even as the foul fiends laugh when
their master is entangled in his own meshesI
defy your laugh; for though a dupe, I am not a
victim; and Csar and his fortunes shall yet
survive
the storm.
I have done with Morton; no one here knows
or suspects our former alliance. My name is not
like to reach his ear, and if it should, who would
take the word of a ruined man, against an
approved
candidate for membership with the
congregation
,
for such even, am Ia `brother,' in
this community of saints.
Luckily, Morton, with that cunning
incident
to madness, cautioned me against appearing
in this camp without the uniform of the
church-militant
,
alleging, that we must play the part of
pilgrims, till we were quite independent of the
favour
of the saints. Accordingly, I assumed the
puritan habit, bearing, and language that so much
amused you at our last meeting. But why, you
will ask, prolong this dull masquerade? For an
object, my good Wilton, that would make you
or me, saint or devil, or any thing else
whereby
we might secure itthe most provoking,
bewitching
,
and soul-moving creature that ever
appeared
in the form of woman, is my tempter.
She is the daughter and sole heir of Sir Walter
Leslie, who you may remember was noted for his
gallantry in that mad expedition of Buckingham
to the Isle of Rhe.
Is it not a shame that youth and beauty should
be thrown away upon these drivelling, canting,
preaching, praying, liberty-loving, lecture-going,
pilgrims!
Would it not be a worthy act to tear
this scion of a loyal stock from these crabs of the
wilderness, and set her in our garden of England?
And would it not be a knightly feat to win the
prize against a young gallant, a pink of courtesy,
while the unfledged boy is dreaming of love's
elysium?
Marvel as you please, Wilton, goodly prospects
are dawning on mefortune smiles, as if inclined
to pay the good turn she has so long owed me.
I am in prime credit with guardians and
governors
the
beau-ideal of duenna-aunts and
serving
maids. Time and chance favour mebut
but there is always some devilish cross upon my
line of luck.
Rosa came with me to this barbarous land
a fit Houri, you will say, for a Mahometan saint,
but an odd appendage to a canting roundhead
even so she is, but what was to be done! She
had no shelter but my protection. I had still
some lingering of love for her, and pity (don't
scoff!); and besides, Morton's representations had
led me to believe that she would not be an
inconvenient
member of the household at Merry Mount,
so I permitted her to disguise herself, and come
over the rough seas with me. She is a
fantastical
wayward child, and a true woman withal.
She loves me to distraction, and would sacrifice
any to me but the ruling passion of her sex, her
vanity; but in spite of my entreaties and
commands
,
she persists in wearing a velvet Spanish
hat, with a buckle and feathers, most
audaciously
cocked on one side; and indeed her whole
apparel
would better suit a Queen's page, than the
humble serving-boy of a self-denying puritan.
Luckily she is sad and dumpish, and does not
incline to go abroad, but whenever she does
appear
I perceive, she is eyed with curiosity and
suspicion
;
and suspicion once thoroughly awakened,
discovery is inevitable, for you know her face gives
the lie to her doublet and hose.
Diana's lip is not more smooth and rubious,
Her small pipe is as the maiden's organ, sound and shrill;
And all is semblative a woman's part.
If we should be detected, I know not what
punishment may be inflicted by the Draco-laws
of these saintsa public whipping of poor
Rosacropping of my earsimprisonmentper
haps death, if peradventure some authority
therefor
should be found in the statutes of the land
that is to say, in the old Jewish records.
But why expose myself to such peril? Ah!
Wilton, you would not ask why if you could see
my enchantressbut without seeing her, no man
knows better than you, that
Love is a sweet intice,
'Gainst whom the wisest wits as yet
Have never found devise.
If I could but persuade Rosa to be prudent
till we may both cast off these odious disguises;
but she disdains all caution, and fears nothing but
being supplanted in my favour.
She is still in the fever of loveall eye and
earirritable, jealous, watchful, and suspicious.
One moment passionate, and the next dissolved
in tears. So intense a flame must purify or
consume
the sentiment her beauty inspiredit
cannot
be purified andthe alternativeit is
consumed
.
I cannot rid myself of herI cannot control
her, and in this jeopardy I stand; but I abandon
all to my destiny. Even Jupiter, you know, was
ruled by fate. It is folly to attempt to shape the
events of life; as easily might we direct the
course of the starsthose very stars, perhaps,
govern the accidents of our being. The stars
destinyProvidence, what are they all but
various
terms for the same invisible, irresistible
agency! But Heaven forbid I should lose
myself
in the bewildering mazes of these high
speculations
!
It is a enough for me that I am a knight
of the holy sepulchre, that I wear my crucifix,
pray to all the saints and eat no flesh on Fridays.
By the way, on the very first day of my arrival
here, I came nigh to winning the crown of
martyrdom
by my saintly obedience to the canons of
holy church. The Leslie, in simplicity or
mischief
,
remarked on my confining myself to fish on
Fridayrebel conscience, in spite of me tinged
my cheeks, but thanks to my garb of hypocrisy,
panoply of steel never did better service,the
light thrust glanced off and left me unharmed.
You and I, Wilton, are too old to make, like
dreaming boys, an Eldorado of our future, and you
will ask me what are my rational chances of
success
in my present enterprise. I will not remind
you of success on former similar occasions, for
my vanity has been abated of its presumption
this very evening by the indifference, real or
affected
,
of this little sprite.
Ladies must have loversidols must have
worshippers, or they are no longer idols. I have
but one rival here, and he, I think, is appointed by
his wise guardians to another destiny; and being
a right dutiful youth, he, no doubt, with
management
,
and good fortune on my part, may be made
to surrender his preference, (which by the way is
quite obvious) and pass under the yoke of
authority
.
Besides, the helpmate selected by these
Judges in Israel, for the good youth might be, if
she were a little less saint and more woman, a
queen of love and beauty. But she is not to my
taste. I covet not smiles cold as a sun-beam on
arctic snows. Nothing in life is duller than
mathematical
virtuenothing more paralyzing to
the imagination than unaffected prudery. I
detest
a woman like a walled city, that can never
Vol. II 5
be approached without your being reminded that
it is inaccessiblea woman whose measured
premeditated words sound always like the
sentinel-cry
,
`all is well!'
Now the Leslie has a generous rashness, a
thoughtless impetuosity, a fearlessness of the
sanctimonious
dictators that surround her, and a noble
contempt of danger that stimulates me at least,
to love and enterprise.
My hope is bold, Wiltonmy ambition is to
win her heartmy
determination
to possess her
hand; by fair means, if I can, but if fortune is
adverse
,
if, as I sometimes fear, when I shrink from
the falcon glance of her bright eye, as if the
spear of Ithuriel touched me, if she has already
penetrated my disguise, and persists in
disregarding
my suit, why then, Necessity! parent of all
witty inventions, come thou to my aid.
Our old acquaintance Chaddock is riding in
the harbour here, owner and commander of a
good pinnace. I have heard him spoken of in
the godly companies I frequent, as a `notorious
contemner of ordinances,' from which I infer he
is the same bold desperado we knew him. My
word for it, it does not require more courage to
march up to the cannon's mouth, than to claim the
independence of a gentleman in this pharasaic
land. Now I think if I should have occasion to
smuggle any precious freight, and convey it over
the deep waters, convenient opportunity and fit
agents will not be wanting. Time will ripen or
blast my budding hopes; if ripen, why then I will
cast my slough here, and present my beautiful
bride to my royal master, or if, perchance, royalty
should be in eclipse in England, there are, thank
heaven, other asylums for beauty and fortune.
Farewell, Wilton, yours in good faith,
Gardiner
.
As Sir Philip signed his name to this epistle,
he felt Rosa's head drop upon his shoulder, an
action that indicated, too truly, that she had been
looking over the last paragraphs, at least, of his
letter.
Fury flashed from his eyes, and he raised his
hand to strike her, but before he had executed
the unmanly act, she burst into a wild hysteric
laugh, that changed his resentment to fear.
RosaRosa, he said, in a soothing tone, for
Heaven's sake be quietyou will be overheard
you will betray all.
She seemed not to hear him, but wringing her
hands, she repeated again and again, I wish I
were dead! I wish I were dead!
Hush! foolish, mad child, or you will be
discovered
,
and may indeed bring death upon
yourself
.
Death! I care not; death would be heaven's
mercy to what I suffer; what is death to shame!
to guilt! to the bitterness of disappointment!to
the rage of jealousy!why should not I die! she
continued, overpowering Sir Philip's vain
attempts
to calm her; why should not I die?
there is nobody to care for me if I liveand
there is nobody to weep for me if I die.
Patiencepatience, Rosa.
Patience! my patience is worn out; I am
tired of this dreary world. Oh, that Lady Lunford
had left me in my conventI should have been
happy there. She did not love me. Nobody has
loved me since I left the good nunsnobody but
my poor little Canary bird, Mignonne; and she
always loved me, and would always sing to me,
and sing sweetest when my lady was cruellest.
Cruel as my lady was, her cruelty was kindness to
thine, Sir Philip. Oh, that you had left me with
her!
You came to me with your own good-will,
Rosa.
Ay, Sir Philipand will not the innocent
babe stretch its arms to the assassin if he does
but smile on it? You told me you loved me, and
I believed you. You promised always to love me,
and I believed that too; and there was nobody
else that loved me, but Mignonne; and now I am
all alone in the wide world, I do wish I were
dead. She sunk down at Sir Philip's feet, laid
her head on his knee, and sobbed as if her heart
were breaking. Oh, what shall I do, she said,
where shall I go! if I go to the good, they will
frown on me, and despise me; and I cannot go to
the wicked,they have no pity.
Sir Philip's heart, depraved as it was, felt some
motions of compassion as he looked on this
young and beautiful creature, bowed to the earth
with remediless anguish; some touches of remorse
and pity, such as Milton's fallen angel felt, when
he contemplated those millions of spirits, for his
fault amerc'd of Heav'n. Poor child! he
said, laying his hand on her smooth brow, would
to God you had never left your convent!
Rosa felt the blistering tears that flowed from
the relicts of his better nature, drop on her cheek.
She raised her heavy lids, and a ray of pleasure
shot from her kindling eye. Then you do love
me, she said, you would not weep only for pity
you do love me still?
Sir Philip perceived the eagerness with which
she caught at the first glimmering of returning
tenderness, and well knew how to draw his
advantage
from it. He soothed her with caresses
and professions, and when he had restored her to
composure, he endeavoured to impress her with
the necessity, for both their sakes, of more
prudent
conduct. He convinced her that their
happiness
,
their safety, and perhaps their lives,
depended
on their escaping detection; and after
explaining the defeat of his hopes in relation to
Morton, he averred that the part of his letter
relating
to Miss Leslie, was mere badinage, written
for his friend's amusement; and he concluded
with reiterated promises, that he would return
with her in the first ship bound to England.
5*
Rosa was credulousat least, she wished to
believeshe was grateful for restored tenderness;
and without daring to confess how nearly she
had already betrayed him to Miss Leslie, she
promised
all the circumspection that Sir Philip
required
.
CHAPTER IV.
I should have been more strange I must confess,
But that thou overheard'st me, ere I was 'ware
My love's true passion: therefore, pardon me,
And not impute this yielding to light love.
Romeo And Juliet
.
The
week that succeeded Hope Leslie's
interview
with Magawisca, was one of anxiety to most
of the members of Governor Winthrop's family.
The habitual self-possession of the Governor
himself seemed somewhat disturbed; he was
abstracted
and thoughtful; frequently held secret
conferences with Sir Philip Gardiner in his study;
and in relation to this stranger, he appeared to
have departed from his usual diplomatic caution,
and to have admitted him to the most
confidential
intimacy. There were frequent private
meetings
of the magistrates; and it was quite evident
from the external motions of these guardians of
the colony, that some state secret was heaving
in their bosoms.
The Governor was in the habit of participating
with his wife his most secret state-affairs; moved
to this confidence, no doubt, by his strict views
of her rights as his help-mate; for it cannot be
supposed, even for a moment, that one of the
superior
sex should find pleasure in telling a secret.
But in this instance, he communicated nothing
to his trust-worthy partner, excepting some
obscure
intimations, that might be gathered from
the significant utterance of such general truths
as, that it was impossible for human foresight
to foresee every thing; that those who stood at
the helm of state could not be too vigilant;
that ends were often brought about by unexpected
means; and similar truisms, which, enunciated
by grave and dignified lips, are invested with
importance
from the source whence they proceed.
Madam Winthrop was happily too much
absorbed
with the feminine employment of
watching
the developement of her niece's affairs, to
have much curiosity in relation to cabinet secrets.
She naturally concluded that some dangerous
adherent
of that arch-heretic Gorton, had been
discovered
;
or, perhaps, some new mode of faith
had demanded magisterial interference;
whatever
her mental conclusions were, it is certain
her thoughts all ran in another channel. In all
ages of the world, in every condition, and at every
period of life, a woman's interest in the progress of
a love affair, masters every other feeling.
Esther Downing was a favourite of her aunt;
and as it had been urged by Mr. Downing, as an
objection to his removal to New-England, that his
daughters would have small chance of being
eligibly
married there, it became a point of honour
with Madam Winthrop, after he had been
persuaded
to overlook this objection, to prove to him
that it was unfounded.
Madam Winthrop was too upright,
intentionally
to do a wrong to any one; but, without being
herself conscious of it, she was continually setting
off the lights of her niece's character, by what she
deemed the shades of Hope Leslie's. Our
heroine's
independent temper, and careless gaiety of
heart, had more than once offended against the
strict notions of Madam Winthrop, who was of
the opinion, that the deferential manners of youth,
which were the fashion of the age, had their
foundation
in immutable principles.
Nothing was farther from Miss Leslie's
intention
,
than any disrespect to a woman whom she
had been taught to venerate; but unfortunately,
she would sometimes receive what Madam
Winthrop
meant for affability, as if it were simply the
kindness of an equal; she had been seen to gape
in the midst of the good lady's most edifying
remarks
;
and once she ran away to gaze on a
brilliant
sunset, at the moment Madam Winthrop
was condescendingly relating some very
important
particulars of her early life. This was
certainly
indecorous; but her offences were trifling,
and were probably forgotten by Madam
Winthrop
herself, long before their effects were
effaced
from her mind.
Esther was always respectful, always patient;
always governed by the slightest intimation of
her aunt's wishes; and it must be confessed, that
even to those who were less partial and prejudiced
than Madame Winthrop, Miss Downing
appeared
far more lovely than our heroine during the
week, when she was suffering the extremes of
anxiety
and apprehension. No one, who did not
know that there was a secret and sufficient
cause for her restlessness, her seeming
indifference
to her friends, and to every thing about her,
could have escaped the conclusion, that forced
itself on Everell's mind; that fortune, and beauty,
and indulgence, had had their usual and fatal
effect
on Hope Leslie. In the bitterness of his
disappointment
,
he wished he had never returned to
have the vision of her ideal perfection expelled
from his imagination by the light of truth.
With the irritable feeling of a lover, he
watched
the devoted attentions of Sir Philip Gardiner
to Hope, which she, almost unconscious of them,
received passively, but as Everell thought,
favourably
.
Utterly engrossed in one object, she never
reflected that there had been any thing in her
conduct to excite Everell's distrust; and feeling
more than ever, the want of that sympathy and
undisguised
affection which she had always received
from him, she was hurt at his altered conduct; and
her manner insensibly conforming to the coldness
and constraint of his, he naturally concluded that
she designed to repel him, and he would turn
from her, to repose in the calm and twilight quiet
that was shed about the gentle Esther, whom he
knew to be pure, disinterested, humble, and
devoted
.
Poor Hope, the subject of his unjust
condemnation
,
was agitated, not only by impatience for
the promised meeting with her unfortunate sister,
but by fear that some unforeseen circumstance
might prevent it. She was also harassed with a
sense of conflicting duties. She sometimes
thought that the duty of restoring her sister to the
condition in which she was born, was paramount
to the obligation of her promise to Magawisca.
She would waver and resolve to disclose her
secret
appointment; but the form of Magawisca
would rise to her recollection with its expression
of truth and sweetness and confidence, as if to
check her treacherous purpose.
A thousand times she condemned herself for
the rashness of her promise to Magawisca, by
which she had reduced herself, surrounded as she
was by wise and efficient friends, to act without
their counsel and aid. Had Everell treated her
with his accustomed kindness, the habitual
confidence
of their intercourse might have led her to
break through the restriction of her promise, but
she dared not deliberately violate her word so
solemnly pledged. Oppressed with these
anxieties
,
the hours rolled heavily on; and when
Friday
,
the appointed day arrived, it seemed to
Hope that an age had intervened since her
interview
with Magawisca.
She had taken care previously to propose an
excursion on Friday to the Governor's garden;
and contrary to usual experience, when a long
projected pleasure is to be realized, every
circumstance
was propitious. The day was propitious,
one of nature's holidaysthe governor too was
propitious, and even promoted the party with
unprecedented
zeal.
After various delays, which, however trifling,
had increased Hope's nervous impatience, they
were on the point of setting forth, when Madam
Winthrop, who was not one of the party, came
into the parlour, and said, after a slight hesitation,
I am loath, my young friends, to interfere with
what you seem to have set your hearts onbut
really,she paused.
Really what, Ma'am? asked Hope
impatiently
.
Madam Winthrop was not inclined to be
spurred by Miss Leslie, and she answered very
deliberately, I have a feeling as if something
were to happen to-day. I am a coward on the
water, at all times, more than becomes one who
fully realizes that the same Providence that
watches over us on the land, follows us on the
great deep.
But your fears, Madam, said Sir Philip, did
not prevent your crossing the stormy Atlantic.
Nay, Sir Philip, and I know not what metal
that woman is made of, that would not go hand
in hand with her husband in so glorious a cause
as ours.
Are we not all ready? asked Hope, anxious to
escape before Madam Winthorp proposed, as she
apprehended she was about to do, a
postponement
of the party.
Yes, all ready, I believe, Miss Leslie, but not
all
too impatient to await a remark I was about
to make, namely, Sir Philip, that a party of
pleasure
is very different from a voyage of duty.
Certainly, madam, replied Sir Philip, who
trusted that assent would end the conversation,
widely different.
It is not necessary for me, resumed Madam
Winthrop, to state all the points of
difference
.
Oh! not in the least, Ma'am, exclaimed
Hope.
Miss Leslie! said Madam Winthrop, in a
tone of surprise, and then turning her eye to
Everell
,
who was standing next Esther, she said,
resuming
her measured tone, my responsibility is
so great to my brother DowningI had an
uncommon
dream about you, Esther, last night
and if any thing should happen to you
If it is me, you are concerned about, aunt,
said Esther, untying her bonnet, I will remain
at home,do not let me detain you, she added,
turning to Hope, another moment.
Nothing seemed to Hope of any importance,
in comparison with the prosecution of her plans,
Vol. II. 6
and nodding a pleased assent to Esther, she took
her aunt's arm in readiness to depart.
How changed, thought Everell, as his eye
glanced towards her, thus selfishly and
impatiently
to pursue her own pleasure without the
slightest
notice of her friend's disappointment. His
good feelings were interested to compensate for
the indifference of Hope. If, he said to
Madam
Winthrop, you will commit Miss Downing
to my care, I will promise she shall encounter no
danger that my caution may avoid, or my skill
overcome.
Madam Winthrop's apprehensions vanished.
If she is in your particular charge, Mr. Everell,
she said, I shall be greatly relieved. I know, I
am of too anxious a make. Go, my dear Esther,
Mr. Everell will be constantly near you; under
Providence, your safe-guard. I believe it is not
right to be too much influenced by dreams. See
that she keeps her shawl round her, Mr. Everell,
while on the water. I feel quite easy in confiding
her to your care.
Everell bowed, and expressed his gratitude
for Madam Winthrop's confidence, and Esther
turned on him a look of that meek and pleased
dependence, which it is natural for woman to feel,
and which men like to inspire, becauseperhaps
it seems to them an instinctive tribute to their
natural superiority.
Miss Leslie has become so sedate of late,
continued Madam Winthrop, with a very
significant
smile, that I scarcely need request that no
unwonted sounds of revelry and mirth may
proceed
from any member of the governor's family,
which ever has been, as it should be, a pattern
of gospel sobriety to the colony.
Mrs. Grafton dropped a bracelet she was
clasping
on her niece's arm, but Madam Winthrop's
remarkhalf reproof, and half admonition,
excited
no emotion in Hope, whose heart was
throbbing
with her own secret anxieties, and who was
now in some measure relieved, by Sir Philip
making a motion for their departure, by adroitly
availing himself of this first available pause, and
offering her his arm.
As soon as they were fairly out of the house,
revelry and mirth, exclaimed Mrs. Grafton, as
if the words blistered her tongue, revelry and
mirth indeed! I think poor Hope will forget how
to laugh, if she stays here much longer. I
wonder
,
Sir Philip, if it is such a mighty offence to
use one's laughing faculties, what they were
given for?
I believe, madam, replied the knight, with
well sustained gravity, that ingenious
theologians
impute this convulsion of the muscles to
some disorganization occasioned by Adam's
transgression
,
and in support of their hypothesis, they
maintain that there is no allusion to laughter in
scripture. Madam Winthrop, I fancy, intends
that her house shall be a little heaven on
earth.
Honest Cradock, who had taken his favourite
station at Miss Leslie's side, replied, without in
the least suspecting the knight's irony. Now,
Sir Philip, I marvel whence you draw that opinion.
I have studied all masters in theology, from the
oldest down to the youngest, and, greatest of all,
Master Calvin, with whose precious sentences I
`sweeten my mouth always before going to bed,'
yet did I never see that strange doctrine
concerning
laughter. To me it appearsthe Lord
preserve me from advancing noveltiesbut to
me it appears, that there is no human sound so
pleasant and so musical as the laugh of a little
childand of such are the kingdom of heaven.
I have heard the walls at Bethel ring with bursts
of laughter from Miss Hope, and the thought
came to me, (the Lord forgive me, if I erred
therein,) that it was the natural voice of
innocence
,
and therefore, pleasing to him that made
her.
Hope was touched with the pure sentiment of
her good tutor, and she involuntarily slipped her
arm into his. Sir Philip was also touched, and for
once, speaking without forethought, he said, I
would give a kingdom for one of the laughs of my
boyhood.
I dare say, Sir Philip, said Cradock, for
truly there is no heart-work in the transgressor's
laugh.
Sir! exclaimed Sir Philip angrily.
The simple man started as if he had received
a blow, and Hope said, you did not mean to
call Sir Philip a transgressor.
Oh, certainly not, in particular, certainly not;
Sir Philip's professions are great, and I doubt not,
practice correspondent; but all of us add daily
transgression to transgression, which, I doubt
not, Sir Philip will allow.
Yes, said Hope archly, it is far easier, as
is said in one of your good books, Master
Cradock
,
`to subscribe to a sentence of universal
condemnation
,
than to confess individual sins.'
What blessed times we have fallen on,
retorted
Sir Philip, when youthful beauties, instead
of listening to the idle songs of troubadours, or
the fantastic flatteries of vagrant knights, or
announcing
with their ruby lips the rewards of
chivalry
,
are exploring the mines of divinity with
learned theologians like Master Cradock, and
bringing forth such diamond sentences, as the
pithy saying Miss Leslie has quoted.
Heaven preserve us! Sir Philip, exclaimed
Mrs. Grafton, Hope Leslie study theology! you
are as mad as a March hareall her theology
she has learned out of the Bible and common
prayer-book, which should always go together, in
spite of what the Governor says. It is peculiar
that a man of his commodity of sense, should
bamboozle himself with that story he told at
breakfast
.
Oh, you was not there, Sir Philipwell, he
says, that in his son's library, there are a
thousand
books, and among them, a Bible and
prayerbook
6*
bound togetherone jewel in the dung-hill
but that is not what he saysit seems this
unlucky
prayer-book is gnawed to mince-meat by
the mice, and not another book in the library
touched.
1
1.
A fact gravely stated in Governor Winthrop's journal.
I longed to commend the instinct of
the little beasts, that knew what good food was;
but every body listened with such a solemn air,
and even you, Hope Leslie, who are never afraid
to smile, even you, did not move your lips.
I did not hear it, said Hope.
Did not hear it! that is peculiarwhy it was
just when Robin was coming in with the rolls
just as I had taken my second cupjust as
Everell gave Ester Downing that bunch of
rose-buds
;
did you take notice of that?
Yes, replied Hope, and a deep blush suffused
her cheek. She had noticed the offering with
pain, not because her friend was preferred, but
because it led her mind back to the time when
she was the object of all Everell's little favors,
and impressed her with a sense of his altered
conduct.
The tell-tale blush did not escape the watchful
eye of Sir Philip, and determined to ascertain if
the bolt of Cupid, had fallen on this little
western flower, he said, I perceive Miss Leslie
is aware that rose-buds, in the vocabulary of
lovers, are made to signify a declaration of the
tender passion.
Secret springs of the heart are sometimes
suddenly
touched, and feelings disclosed, that have
been hidden even from our own self-observation.
Hope had been moved by Miss Downing's story,
and taking a generous interest in her happiness,
she had, with that ardent feeling with which she
pursued every object that interested her, resolved
to promote it in the only mode by which it could
be attained. But now, at the first intimation that
her romantic wishes were to be fulfilled, strange
to tell, and still stranger to her to feel, there was
a sudden rising in her heart of disappointmenta
sense of loss, and, we shrink from recording it, but
the truth must be told, tears, honest tears, gushed
from her eyes. Oh, pardon her, all ye youthful
devotees
to secret self-immolation!all ye youthful
Minervas, who hide with an impenetrable shield
of wisdom and dignity, the natural workings of your
hearts! Make all due allowance for a heroine
of the seventeenth century, who had the
misfortune
to live before there was a system of
education
extant, who had not learned, like some young
ladies of our enlightened days, to prattle of
metaphysics
to
quote Reid, and Stewart, and Brown,
and to know (full as well as they perhaps) the
springs of human actionthe mysteries of mind
still profound mysteries to the unlearned.
Hope Leslie was shocked, not that she had
betrayed her feelings to her companions, but at
her own discovery of their existencenot that
they had appeared, but that they were. The
change had been so gradual, from her childish
fondness for Everell, to a more mature sentiment,
as to be imperceptible even to herself. She made
no essay to explain her emotion. Mrs. Grafton,
though not remarkably sagacious, was aware of
its obvious interpretation, and of the pressing
necessity of offering some ingenious reading.
What a miserable nervous way you have fallen
into, Hope, she said, since you was caught out
in that storm; she must have taken an inward
cold, Sir Philip.
The symptoms, replied the knight
significantly
,
would rather, I should think, indicate an
internal heat.
Heat or cold, Hope, continued Mrs. Grafton,
I am determined you shall go through a regular
course of medicine; valerian tea in the morning,
and lenitive drops at night. You have not eaten
enough for the last week to keep a humming-bird
alive. Hope has no kind of faith in medicine,
Sir Philip, but I can tell her it is absolutely
necessary
,
in the spring of the year, to sweeten the
blood.
Sir Philip looked at Hope's glowing face, and
said, he thought such blood as mantled in Miss
Leslie's cheek, needed no medical art to sweeten
it.
Hope, alike insensible to the good natured
efforts
of her aunt, and the flatteries of Sir Philip,
was mentally resolving to act most heroically; to
expel every selfish feeling from her heart, and to
live for the happiness of others.
The experienced smile sorrowfully at the
generous
impulses, and fearless resolves of the young,
who know not how costly is the sacrifice of
self-indulgence
how
difficult the ascent to the
heights of disinterestedness; but, let not the
youthful
aspirant be discouraged; the wing is
strengthened
by use, and the bird that drops in its first
flutterings about the parent nest, may yet soar to
the sky.
Our heroine had rallied her spirits, by the time
she joined her companions in the boat that was
awaiting them at the wharf; and in the effort to
veil her feelings, she appeared to Everell
extravagantly
gay; and he, being unusually pensive,
and seeing no cause for her apparent excitement,
attributed it to Sir Philip's devotiona cause that
certainly had no tendency to render the effect
agreeable to him.
When they disembarked, they proceeded
immediately
to the single habitation on the island
Digby's neat residence. The faithful fellow
welcomed
Everell with transports of joy. He had
a thousand questions to ask, and recollections
to recall; and while Everell lingered to listen, and
Hope and Esther, from a very natural sympathy,
to witness the overflowings of the good fellow's
affectionate heart, their companions left them to
stroll about the island.
As soon as his audience was thus reduced
it seems but a day, he said, since you, Mr.
Everell, and Miss Leslie, were but children.
And happy children, Digby, were we not?
said Everell with a suppressed sigh, and
venturing
a side glance at Hope; but her face was
averted, and he could not see whether Digby had
awakened any recollections in her bosom
responding
to his own.
Happy! that were you, replied Digby, and
the lovingest, he continued, little thinking that
every word he uttered was as a talisman to his
auditors
;
the lovingest that ever I saw. Young folks
for the most part, are like an April day, clouds
and sunshine: there are my young ones, though
they look so happy, now they have your English
presents, Mr. Everell, yet they must now and then
fall to their little battles; show out the natural
man, as the ministers say; but with you and Miss
Hope, it was always sunshine: it was not strange
either, seeing you were all in all to one another,
after that terrible sweep off at Bethel. It is odd
what vagaries come and go in a body's mind;
time was, when I viewed you as good as mated
with Magawisca; forgive me for speaking so, Mr.
Everell, seeing she was but a tawny Indian after
all.
Forgive you, Digby! you do me honour, by
implying that I rightly estimated that noble
creature
;
and before she had done the heroic deed,
to which I owe my lifeYes, Digby, I might have
loved hermight have forgotten that nature had
put barriers between us.
I don't know but you might, Mr. Everell, but
I don't believe you would; things would naturally
have taken another course after Miss Hope came
among us; and many a time, I thought it was well
it was as it was, for I believe it would have broken
Magawisca's heart, to have been put in that
kind of eclipse by Miss Leslie's coming between
you and her. Now all is as it should be; as your
motherblessed be her memorywould have
wished, and your father, and all the world.
Digby seemed to have arranged every thing in
his own mind, according to what he deemed
natural
and proper; and too self-complacent at the
moment, to receive any check to his garrulity,
from the silence of his guests, he proceeded.
The tree follows the bent of the twig; what
think you, Miss Esther, is not there a wedding a
brewing? Miss Downing was silentDigby
looked
round and saw confusion in every face, and
feeling that he had ventured on forbidden ground,
he tried to stammer out an apology. I declare
now, he said, it's oddit's a sign I grow old;
but I quite entirely forgot how queer young
people
feel about such things. I should not have
blundered on so, but my wife put it into my head;
she is equal to Nebuchadnezar for dreaming
dreams; and three times last night she waked me,
to tell me about her dreaming of a funeral, and
that, she said, was a sure forerunner of a wedding,
and it was natural I should go on thinking whose
wedding was comingwas not it, Miss Esther?
Everell turned away to caress a chubby boy.
Miss Downing fidgetted with her bonnet strings,
threw back her shawl, and disclosed the
memorable
knot of rose-buds. If they had a meaning,
they seemed also to have a voice, and they roused
Hope Leslie's resolution. Some pride might have
aided her, but it was maidenly pride, and her
feelings were as near to pure generosity as our
infirm nature can approach.
Digby, she said, it was quite natural for
you both to think and speak of Mr. Everell's
wedding; we are to have it, and that right soon,
I hope; you have only mistaken the bride; and
as neither of the parties will speak to set you
right, and she glanced her eyes from Esther to
Everell, why, I must.
Esther became as pale as marble. Hope flew
to her side, took her hand, placed it in Everell's,
threw her arm around Esther, kissed her cheek,
and darted out of the house. Digby half
articulated
an expression of disappointment and
surprise
,
and impelled by an instinct that told him
this was not a scene for witnesses, he too
disappeared
.
Never were two young people left in a more
perplexing predicament. To Everell, it was a
moment of indescribable confusion and
embarrassment
.
To Esther, of overwhelming
recollections
,
of apprehension, and hope, and above all,
shame.
She would gladly have buried herself in the
depths of the earth. Everell understood her
feelings
.
There was no time for deliberationand
with emotions that would have made
self-immolation
at the moment easy, and impelled, as it
seemed to him, by an irresistible destiny, he said
something about the happiness of retaining the
hand he held.
Miss Downing confused by her own feelings,
misinterpreted his. She was, at the moment,
incapable
of estimating the disparity between his
few, broken, disjointed, half-uttered words, and
the natural, free, full expressions of an ardent and
happy lover. She only spoke a few words, to
refer
him to her aunt Winthrop; but her hand,
passive in his, her burning cheeks, and throbbing
heart, told him what no third person could tell,
and what her tongue could not utter.
Thus had Hope Leslie, by rashly following her
first generous impulses, by giving to an
unproportioned
thought its act, effected that, which
the avowed tenderness of Miss Downing, the
united instances of Mr. Fletcher and Governor
Winthrop, and the whole colony and world
beside
,
could never have achieved. Unconscious of
the mistake by which she had put the happiness
of all parties concerned in jeopardy, she was
exulting
in her victory over herself, and
endeavouring
to regain in solitude the tranquillity which
she was surprised to find had utterly forsaken her;
and to convince herself that the disorder of her
spirits, which in spite of all her efforts, filled her
Vol. II. 7
eyes with tears, was owing to the agitating
expectation
of seing her long-lost sister.
The eastern extremity of the island being
sheltered
by the high ground on the west, was most
favourable for horticultural experiments, and had,
therefore been planted with fruit trees and grape
vines; here Hope had retired, and was flattering
herself she was secure from interruption and
observation, when she was startled by a
footstep
,
and perceived Sir Philip Gardiner
approaching
.
I am fortunate at last, he said. I
have just been vainly seeking you, where I most
unluckily broke in upon the lovers, at a moment
of supreme happiness, if I may judge from the
faces of both parties; but what are you doing
with that vine, Miss Leslie? he continued, for
Hope had stooped over a grape vine, which she
seemed anxiously arranging.
I am merely looking at it, she said; it seems
drooping.
Yesand droop and die it must. I am
amazed that the wise people of your colony
should hope to rear the vine in this cold and
sterile
land; a fit climate it is not for any delicate
plant.
The knight's emphasis and look gave a
particular
significance to his words; but Miss Leslie,
determined to take them only in their literal sense,
coldly replied, that it was not the part of
wisdom
to relinquish the attempt to cultivate so
valuable
a production, till a fair experiment had been
made.
Very true, Miss Leslie. The Governor
himself
could not have spoken it more sagely. Pardon
me for smilingI was thinking what an
admirable
illustration of your remark, your friend, Miss
Downing, afforded you. Who would have hoped
to rear such a hot-bed plant as love, amidst her
frosts and ice? Nay, look not so reproachfully.
I admit there are analogies in naturein my
rambles in the Alpine country, I have seen her
bage and flowers fringing the very borders of
perpetual
snows.
Your analogy does not suit the case, Sir
Philip
,
replied Miss Leslie coldly, but I marvel not
at your ignorance of my friend; the waters
gushed
from the rock only at the prophet's touch
Hope hesitated; she felt that her rejoinder was
too personal, and she added, in a tone of calmer
defence, surely she who has shown herself
capable
of the fervour of devotion, and the tenderness
of friendship, may be susceptible of an inferior
passion.
Most certainly; and your philosophy, fair
reasoner
,
agrees with experience and poetry. An
old French lay well sets forth the harmony
between
the passions; thus it runs, I thinkand
he trilled the following stanzas.
Et pour verit vous record
Dieu et amour sont d'un accord,
Dieu aime sens et honorance,
Amour ne l'a pas en viltance;
Dieu hait orgueil et fausset,
Et Amour aime loyaut
Dieu aime honneur et courtoisie
Et bonne Amour ne hait-il mie;
Dieu coute belle prire
Amour ne la met pas arrire.
Sir Philip dropped on his knee, and, seizing
Hope's hand, repeated,
Dieu coute belle prire
Amour ne le met pas en arrire.
At this moment, when Hope stood stock still
from surprise, confusion, and displeasure, Everell
crossed the walk. The colour mounted to his
cheeks and temples, he quickened his footsteps,
and almost instantly disappeared. This
apparition
,
instead of augmenting Miss Leslie's
embarrassment
,
restored all her powers. Reserve
your gallantries, Sir Philip, she said, quietly
withdrawing her hand, and your profane verses
for some subject to whom they are better suited;
if you have aught of the spirit of a gentleman in
you, you must feel that I have neither invited the
one, nor provoked the other.
Sir Philip rose mortified and disconcerted, and
suffered Miss Leslie to walk slowly away from
him without uttering a word to urge or defend
his suit. He would have been better pleased
if he had excited more emotion of any sort;
he thought he had never seen her, on any
occasion
,
so calm and indifferent. He was
piqued, as a man of gallantry, to be thus
contemptuously
repelled; and he was vexed with
himself that by a false step, he had retarded,
perhaps
endangered, the final success of his projects.
He had been too suddenly elated by the removal
of his rival; he deemed his path quite clear; and
with due allowance for natural presumption and
self-love, it was not perhaps strange that an
accomplished
man of the world should, in Sir
Philip's
circumstances, have counted sanguinely on
success.
He remained pulling a rose to pieces, as a sort
of accompaniment to his vexed thoughts, when
Mrs. Grafton made an untimely appearance
before
him. Ah ha! she said, picking up a
bracelet Hope had unconsciously dropped, I see
who has been hereI thought sobut, Sir Philip,
you look downcast. Sir Philip, accustomed as
he was to masquerade, had not been able to veil
his feelings even from the good dame, whose
perceptions
were neither quick nor keen; but what
was defective in them, she made up in abundant
good nature. Now, Sir Philip, she said,
there is nothing but the wind so changeful as a
woman's mind; that's what every body says, and
there is both good and bad in it: for if the wind
is dead ahead, we may look for it to turn.
Sir Philip bowed his assent to the truism, and
secretly prayed that the good lady might be just
in her application of it. Mrs. Grafton continued,
Now, what have you been doing with that rose,
Sir Philip? one would think it had done you an
7*
ill turn, by your picking it to pieces; I hope you
did not follow Everell's fashion; such a way of
expressing one's ideas should be left to boys.
Sir Philip most heartily wished that he had left
his sentiments to be conveyed by so prudent and
delicate an interpreter; but, determined to give
no aid to Mrs. Grafton's conjectures, he threw
away the rose-stem, and plucking another,
presented
it to her, saying, that `he hoped she would
not extend her proscription of the language of
flowers so far as to prevent their expressing his
regard for her.'
The good lady curtsied, and said, `how much
Sir Philip's ways did remind her of her dear
deceased
husband.'
The knight constrained himself to say, `that he
was highly flattered by being thus honourably
associated in her thoughts.'
And you may well be, Sir Philip, she
replied
,
in the honesty of her heart, for my poor
dear Mr. Grafton was called the most elegant
man of his time; and the best of husbands he
proved: for, as Shakspeare says, he never let the
winds of heaven visit me. She paused to wipe
away a genuine tear, and then continued, it was
not for such a man to be disheartened because a
woman seemed a little offish at first. Nil
desperandum
was his motto; and he, poor dear man,
had so many rivals! Here, you know, the case is
quite different. If any body were to fall in love
with any bodyI am only making a supposition,
Sir Philipthere is nobody here but these
stiff-starched
puritansa thousand pardons, Sir
Philip
I
forgot you was one of them. Indeed, you
seem so little like them, that I am always
forgetting
it.
Sir Philip dared not trust Mrs. Grafton's
discretion
so far as to cast off his disguises before
her, but he ventured to say that `some of his
brethren
were over zealous.'
Ay, ay, quite too zealous, aren't they? a
kind of mint, anise, and cummin Christians.
Sir Philip smiled`he hoped not to err in that
particular; he must confess a leaning of the heart
towards his old habits and feelings.'
Quite natural; and I trust you will finally
lean so far as to fall into them againall in good
timebut as I was sayingskittishness isn't a bad
sign in a young woman. It was a long, long time
before I gave poor dear Mr. Grafton the first
token
of favour; and what do you surmise that was,
Sir Philip? Now just guessit was a trick of
fancy, really worth knowing.
Sir Philip was wearied beyond measure with
the old lady's garrulity, but he said, with all the
complaisance he could assume, `that he could
not guessthe ingenuity of a lady's favour
baffled
conjecture.'
I thought you would not guess; well, I'll tell
you. There's a little history to it, but, luckily,
we've plenty of time on hand. Well, to begin at
the beginning, you must know I had a fana
French fan, I think it wasthere were two
cupids
painted on it; and exactly in the middle,
between them, a figure of hopeI don't mean
Hope Leslie, she continued, for she saw the
knight's eye suddenly glancing towards the head
of the walk, past which Miss Leslie was just
walking
,
in earnest conversation with Everell Fletcher.
Sir Philip felt the urgent necessity, at this
juncture of affairs, of preventing, if possible, a
confidential communication between Miss Leslie
and Fletcher; and his face expressed
unequivocally
that he was no longer listening to Mrs.
Grafton
.
Do you hear, Sir Philip, she continued, I
don't mean Hope Leslie.
So I understand, Madam, replied the knight,
keeping his face towards her, but receding
rapidly
in the direction Miss Leslie had passed, till
almost
beyond the sound of her voice, he laid his
hand on his heart, bowed, and disappeared.
Well, that is peculiar of Sir Philip,
muttered
the good lady; then suddenly turning to
Cradock
,
who appeared, making his way through
some snarled bushesWhat is the matter now,
master Cradock? she asked. Cradock replied
by informing her that the tide served for their
return
to town, and that the Governor had made it
his particular request that there might be no
delay
.
Mrs. Grafton's spirit was always refractory to
orders from head-quarters; but she was too
discreet
or too timid for any overt act of
disobedience
,
and she gave her arm to Cradock, and
hastened to the appointed rendezvous.
When Sir Philip had emerged from the walk,
he perceived the parties he pursued at no great
distance from him, and was observed by Hope,
who immediately, and manifestly to avoid him,
motioned to Everell to take a path which diverged
from that which led to the boat, to which they
were now all summoned by a loud call from the
boatmen.
We must leave the knight to digest his
vexation
,
and follow our heroine, whose face could
now claim nothing of the apathy that had
mortified
Sir Philip.
You are then fixed in your determination to
remain on the island to-night? demanded
Fletcher.
Unalterably.
And is Digby also to have the honour of Sir
Philip's company?
Everell! exclaimed Hope, in a tone that
indicated
surprise and wounded feeling.
Pardon me, Miss Leslie.
Miss Leslie again! Everell, you are unkind;
you but this moment promised you would speak
to me as you were wont to do.
I would, Hope: my heart has but one
language
for you, but I dare not trust my lips. I
mayI
must
now speak to you as a brother; and
before we part, let me address a caution to you,
which that sacred, and, thank God, permitted
love, dictates. My own destiny is fixedfixed
by your act, Hope; heaven forgive me for
saying
so. It is done. For myself, I can endure
any thing, but I could not live to see you the
prey of a hollow-hearted adventurer. The truth
flashed on Hope; she was belovedshe loved
againand she had rashly dashed away the
happiness
within her grasp. Her head became
dizzy
;
she stopped, and gathering her veil over her
face, she leaned against a tree for support.
Everell
grievously misunderstood her agitation.
Hope, he said, with a faltering voice, I
have been slow to believe that you could thus
throw away your heart. I tried to shut my eyes
against that strange Saturday night's walk
that mysterious, unexplained assignation with a
strangerknowing, as I did, that his
addresses
had received the Governor's full
approbation
my
father's, my poor father's reluctant
assent; I still trusted that your pure heart
would have revolted from his flatteries. I
believe
he is a heartless hypocrite. I would have
told you so, but I was too proud to have my
warning attributed, even for a moment, to the
meanness of a jealous rival. I have been
accused
of seeking you frominterested motives,
he would have added; but it seemed as if the
words blistered his tongue, and he concluded,
it matters not now; now I may speak freely,
without distrusting myself, or being distrusted by
others. Hope, you have cast away my earthly
happiness, trifle not with your own.
Hope perceived that events, conspiring with
her own thoughtless conduct, had rivetted
Everell's
mistakebut it was now irremediable. There
was no middle path between a passive submission
to her fate, and a full, and now useless
explanation
.
She was aware that plighted friendship and
troth were staked on the resolution of the
moment
;
and when Everell added, Oh, I have
been convinced against my willagainst my
hopeswhat visions of possible felicity have you
dispersedwhat dreams!
Dreamsdreams all, she exclaimed,
interrupting
him, and throwing back her veil, she discovered
her face drenched with tears. Harkthey call you;
let the past be forgotten; and for the futurethe
future, Everellall possible felicity does await
you, if you are true to yourself; true to her
voice faltered, but she articulated, Esther, and
turning away, she escaped from his sight, as she
would have rushed from the brink of a precipice.
Oh! thought Everell, as his eye and heart
followed her, with the fervid feeling of love, Oh,
that one, who seems all angel, should have so
much of woman's weakness! while he lingered
for a moment to subdue his emotion, and obtain
a decent composure to fit him to appear before
Esther, and less interested observers, Sir Philip
joined him, apparently returning from the boat.
Your friends stay for you, sir, he said, and
passed on.
Then he does remain with her, concluded
Everell; and the conviction was forced more
strongly than ever on his mind, that Hope had lent
a favourable ear to Sir Philip's suit. The
illusion
must be transient, he thought; vanity
cannot have a lasting triumph over the noble
sentiments
of her pure heart. This was the
language
of his affection; but we must confess, that
the ardor of his confidence was abated by Miss
Leslie's apparently wide departure from delicate
reserve, in permitting (as he believed she had) her
professed admirer to remain on the island with
her.
He now hastened to the boat, in the hope that
he should hear some explanation of this
extraordinary
arrangement; but no such consolation
awaited him. On the contrary, he found it the
subject of speculation to the whole party.
Faithful
Cradock expressed simple amazement. Mrs.
Grafton was divided between her pleasure in the
probable success of her secret wishes, and her
consciousness of the obvious impropriety of her
niece's conduct, and her flurried and half
articulated
efforts at explanation, only served, like a
feeble light, to make the darkness visible; and
Esther's downcast and tearful eye intimated her
concern and mortification for her friend.
CHAPTER V.
The sisters' vows, the hours that we have spent,
When we have chid the hasty-footed time.
For parting usOh, and is all forgot?
Midsummer Night's Dream
.
On
quitting Everell, our heroine, quite
unconscious
that she was the subject of painful
suspicion
or affectionate anxiety, sought a sequestered
spot, where she might indulge and tranquilize
her feelings.
It has been said that the love of a brother and
sister is the only platonic affection. This truth,
(if it be a truth) is the conviction of an
experience
far beyond our heroine's. She had seen in
Esther the pangs of repressed and unrequited
love, and mistaking them for the characteristic
emotions of that sentiment, it was no wonder that
she perceived no affinity to it, in the joyous
affection
that had animated her own soul. After a
little while, she said, I shall feel as I did when
we lived together in Bethel; if all that I love are
happy, I must be happy too. If the cold and
selfish laugh to scorn what they think the
reasoning
of ignorance and inexperience, it is because
they have never felt, that to meditate the
happiness
Vol. II. 8
of others, is to enter upon the ministry,
and the joy of celestial spirits. Not one envious
or repining thought intruded into the heaven of
Hope Leslie's mind. Not one malignant spirit
passed the bounds of that paradise, that was
filled with pure and tender affections, with
projects
of goodness, and all their cheerful train.
Hope was longer absorbed in her reverie than
perhaps was quite consistent with her
philosophy
;
and when she was roused from it by Digby's
voice, she blushed from the consciousness that
her thoughts had been too long withdrawn from
the purpose of her visit to the island. Digby
came to say that his wife's supper-table was
awaiting Miss Leslie. Hope embraced the
opportunity
,
as they walked together towards his
dwelling, to make her arrangements for the
evening
.
Digby, she said, I have something to
confide to you, but you must ask me no
questions
.
That's crossing human nature, replied the
good fellow; but I think I can swim against the
current for you, Miss Hope.
Thank you, Digby. Then, in the first place,
you must know, I expect some friends to meet me
here this evening; all that I ask of you is, to
permit
me to remain out unmolested as long as
I may choose. You may tell your wife that I like
to stroll in the garden by moonlightor to sit and
listen to the waves breaking on the shoreas you
know I do, Digby.
Yes, Miss Hope, I know your heart always
linked into such things; but it it will be heathen
Greek to my wifeso you must make out a better
reason for her.
Then tell her, that I like to have my own
way.
Ah, that will I, replied Digby chuckling,
that is what every woman can understand. I
always said, Miss Hope, it was a pure mercy you
chose the right way, for you always had yours.
Perhaps you think, Digby, I have been too
headstrong in my own way.
Oh, no! my sweet mistressnowhy this
having our own way, is what every body likes;
it's the privilege we came to this wilderness
world for; and though the gentles up in town
there, with the Governor at their head, hold a
pretty tight rein, yet I can tell them, that there
are many who think what blunt Master Blackstone
said, `that he came not away from the
Lordsbishops
,
to put himself under the
Lord's-brethren
.'
No, no, Miss Hope, I watch the motions
of the strawsI know which way the wind blows.
Thought and will are set free. It was but the
other day, so to speak, in the days of good queen
Bess, as they called her, when, if her majesty did
but raise her hand, the parliament folks were all
down on their knees to her; and now, thank God,
the poorest and the lowest of us only kneel to
Him who made us. Times are changedthere
is a new spirit in the worldchains are broken
fetters are knocked offand the liberty set forth
in the blessed word, is now felt to be every man's
birth-right. But shame on my prating tongue,
that wags so fast when I might hear your
nightingale
voice.
Hope's mind was pre-occupied, and she found
it difficult to listen to Digby's speculations with
interest, or to respond with animation; but she
was too benignant to lose herself in sullen
abstraction
,
and when they arrived at the cottage,
she roused her faculties to amuse the children,
and to listen to the mother's stories of their
ominous smartness. She commended the good
wife's milk and cakes, and sat for an half hour
after the table was removed, talking of the past,
and brightening the future prospects of her good
friends, with predictions of their children's
prosperity
and respectabilitypredictions, which,
Digby afterwards said, the sweet young lady's
bounty brought to pass.
Suddenly she sprang from her chairDigby,
she exclaimed, I think the east is lighting up
with the rising moonis it not?
If it is not, it soon will, replied Digby,
understanding
and favouring her purpose.
Then, said Hope, I will take a walk round
the island, and do not you, Betsy, sit up for me.
Betsy, of course, remonstrated. The night air
was unwholesome; and though the sky overhead
was clear, yet she had heard distant thunder; the
beach birds had been in flocks on shore all the
day; and the breakers on the east side of the
island made a boding sound. These, and other
signs, were urged as arguments against the
unseasonable
walk. Of course they were unheeded
by our heroine, who, declaring that with shelter
so near she was in no danger, muffled herself
in her cloak, and sallied forth. She bent her
steps around the cliff which rises at the western
extremity of the island, leaving at its base a few
yards of flat rocky shore, around which the
waters
of the bay sweep, deeply indenting it, and
forming a natural cove or harbour for small boats.
As Hope passed around a ledge of rocks, she
fancied
she saw a shadow cast by a figure that
seemed
flying before her. They are here already,
she thought, and hastened forward, expecting to
catch a glimpse of them as soon as she should
turn the angle of the rockbut no figure
appeared
;
and though Hope imagined she heard stones
rattling, as if displaced by hurried steps, she was
soon convinced the sound was accidental. Alive
only to one expectation, she seated herself,
without
any apprehension, to await in this solitude
the coming of her sister.
The moon rose unclouded, and sent her broad
stream of light across the beautiful bay, kindling
in her beams the islands that gemmed it, and
disclosing
,
with a dim indefinite light, the distant
town rising over this fair domain of sea and
landhills, heights, jutting points, and islands,
then unknown to fame, but now consecrated in
8*
domestic annals, and illustrious in the patriot's
story.
Whatever charms the scene might have
presented
to our heroine's eye at another moment,
she was now only conscious of one emotion of
feverish
impatience. She gazed and listened till
her senses ached; and at last, when anticipation
had nearly yielded to despair, her ear caught the
dash of oars; and at the next moment, a canoe
glanced around the headland into the cove; she
darted to the brink of the watershe gazed
intently
on the little barkher whole soul was in
that look. Her sister was there. At this first
assurance
,
that she really beheld this loved, lost
sister, Hope uttered a scream of joy; but when,
at a second glance, she saw her in her savage
attire
,
fondly leaning on Oneco's shoulder, her
heart died within her; a sickening feeling came
over her, an unthought of revolting of nature;
and instead of obeying the first impulse, and
springing forward to clasp her in her arms, she
retreated to the cliff, leaned her head against it,
averted her eyes, and pressed her hands on her
heart, as if she would have bound down her
rebel
feelings.
Magawisca's voice aroused her. Hope
Leslie
,
she said, take thy sister's hand.
Hope stretched out her hand, without lifting
her eyes; but when she felt her sister's touch, the
energies of nature awoke, she threw her arms
around her, folded her to her bosom, laid her
cheek on hers, and wept as if her heart would
burst in every sob.
Mary (we use the appellative by which Hope
had known her sister,) remained passive in her
arms. Her eye was moistened, but she seemed
rather abashed and confounded, than excited;
and when Hope released her, she turned towards
Oneco with a look of simple wonder. Hope
again threw her arm around her sister, and
intently
explored her face for some trace of those
infantine features that were impressed on her
memory
.
It isit is my sister! she exclaimed,
and kissed her cheek again and again. Oh!
Mary, do you not remember when we sat together
on mother's knee? Do you not remember, when
with her own burning hand, the very day she
died, she put those chains on our necks? Do you
not remember when they held us up to kiss her
cold lips? Mary looked towards Magawisca
for an explanation of her sister's words. Look
at
me,
Maryspeak to
me,
continued Hope.
No speak Yengees, replied Mary, exhausting
in this brief sentence, all the English she could
command.
Hope, in the impetuosity of her feelings, had
forgotten that Magawisca had forewarned her
not to indulge the expectation that her sister
could speak to her; and the melancholy truth,
announced by her own lips, seemed to Hope to
open a new and impassable gulf between them.
She wrung her hands; Oh what shall I do!
what shall I say? she exclaimed.
Magawisca now advanced to her, and said in
a compassionate tone, Let me be thy
interpreter
,
Hope Leslie; and be thou more calm. Dost
thou not see thy sister is to thee as the feather
borne on the torrent?
I will be more calm, Magawisca; but
promise
me you will interpret truly for me.
A blush of offended pride overspread
Magawisca's
cheek. We hold truth to be the health
of the soul, she said: thou mayest speak,
maiden
,
without fear that I will abate one of thy
words.
Oh, I fear nothing wrong from you,
Magawisca
forgive
meforgive meI know not
what I say or do. She drew her sister to a
rock, and they sat down together. Hope knew
not how to address one so near to her by nature,
so far removed by habit and education. She
thought that if Mary's dress, which was
singularly
and gaudily decorated, had a less savage
aspect
,
she might look more natural to her; and she
signed to her to remove the mantle she wore,
made of birds' feathers, woven together with
threads of the wild nettle. Mary threw it aside,
and disclosed her person, light and agile as a
fawn's, clothed with skins, neatly fitted to her
waist and arms, and ambitiously embellished with
bead work. The removal of the mantle, instead
of the effect designed, only served to make more
striking the aboriginal peculiarities; and Hope,
shuddering and heart-sick, made one more effort
to disguise them by taking off her silk cloak and
wrapping it close around her sister. Mary
seemed
instantly to comprehend the language of the
action, she shook her head, gently disengaged
herself
from the cloak, and resumed her mantle. An
involuntary exclamation of triumph burst from
Oneco's lips. Oh tell her, said Hope to
Magawisca
,
that I want once more to see her in the
dress of her own peopleof her own familyfrom
whose arms she was torn to be dragged into
captivity
.
A faint smile curled Magawisca's lip, but she
interpreted faithfully Hope's communication, and
Mary's reply, `she does not like the English
dress,' she says.
Ask her, said Hope, if she remembers the
day when the wild Indians sprung upon the family
at Bethel, like wolves upon a fold of lambs?
If she remembers when Mrs. Fletcher and her
innocent little ones were murdered, and she
stolen away?
She says, `she remembers it well, for then it
was Oneco saved her life.'
Hope groaned aloud. Ask her, she
continued
with unabated eagerness, if she remembers
when we played together, and read together, and
knelt together at our mother's feet; when she
told us of the God that made us, and the Saviour
that redeemed us?
She remembers something of all this, but
she says, `it is faint and distant, like the
vanishing
vapour on the far-off mountain.'
Oh, tell her, Magawisca, if she will come
home and live with me, I will devote my life to
her. I will watch over her in sickness and health.
I will be mother, sister, friend to hertell her,
that our mother, now a saint in heaven, stoops
from her happy place to entreat her to return to
our God, and our father's God.
Mary shook her head in a manner indicative of
a more determined feeling than she had before
manifested, and took from her bosom a crucifix,
which she fervently pressed to her lips.
Every motive Hope offered was powerless,
every mode of entreaty useless, and she leaned her
head despondently on Mary's shoulder. The
contrast
between the two faces thus brought
together
,
was most striking. Hope's hat had slipped
back, and her rich brown tresses fell about her
neck and face; her full eye was intently fixed on
Mary, and her cheek glowing with impassioned
feeling. She looked like an angel touched with
some mortal misery; while Mary's face, pale and
spiritless, was only redeemed from absolute
vacancy
by an expression of gentleness and
modesty
.
Hope's hand was lying on her sister's lap,
and a brilliant diamond ring caught Mary's
attention
.
Hope perceived this, and instantly drew
it from her own finger and placed it on Mary's;
and here is anotherand anotherand
another
,
she cried, making the same transfer of
all her rings. Tell her, Magawisca, if she will
come home with me, she shall be decked with
jewels from head to foot, she shall have feathers
from the most beautiful birds that wing the air,
and flowers that never fadetell her that all I
possess shall be hers.
Shall I tell her so? asked Magawisca, with a
mingled expression of contempt and concern, as
if she herself despised the lure, but feared that
Mary might be caught by it, for the pleased girl
was holding her hand before her, turning it, and
gazing with child-like delight on the gems, as
they caught and reflected the moon-beams.
Shall I ask your sister to barter truth and love,
the jewels of the soul, that grow brighter and
brighter in the land of spirits, for these poor
perishing trifles?Oh, Hope Leslie, I had better
thoughts of thee.
I cannot help it, Magawisca; I am driven to
try every way to win back my sistertell her, I
entreat you, tell her what I have said.
Magawisca faithfully repeated all the motives
Hope had urged, while Hope herself clasped her
sister's hand, and looked in her face with a mute
supplication, more earnest than words could
express
.
Mary hesitated, and her eye turned
quickly
to Oneco, to Magawisca, and then again
rested
on her sister. Hope felt her hand tremble in
hers. Mary, for the first time, bent towards her,
and laid her cheek to Hope's. Hope uttered a
scream of delight, Oh, she does not refuse, she
will stay with me, she exclaimed. Mary
understood
the exclamation, and suddenly recoiled,
and hastily drew the rings from her fingers. Keep
themkeep them, said Hope, bursting into
tears, if we must be cruelly parted again, they
will sometimes speak to you of me.
At this moment, a bright light as of burning
flax, flamed up from the cliff above them, threw
a momentary flash over the water, and then
disappeared. Oneco rose, I like not this light,
he said, we must begone, we have redeemed
our promise, and he took Hope's cloak from
the ground, and gave it to her as a signal that
the moment of separation had arrived.
Oh, stay one moment longer, cried Hope.
Oneco pointed to the heavens, over which black
and threatening clouds were rapidly gathering, and
Magawisca said, do not ask us to delay, my
father has waited long enough. Hope now for
the first time observed there was an Indian in
the canoe, wrapped in skins, and listlessly
waiting
in a recumbent position the termination of
the scene. Is that Mononotto? said she,
shuddering
at the thought of the bloody scenes with
which he was associated in her mind; but
before
her inquiry was answered, the subject of it
sprang to his feet, and uttering an exclamation
of surprise, stretched his hand towards the town.
All at once perceived the object towards which
he pointed. A bright strong light streamed
upward
from the highest point of land, and sent a
ruddy glow over the bay. Every eye turned
inquiringly
to Hope. It is nothing, she said to
Magawisca, but the light that is often kindled on
Beacon-Hill to guide the ships into the harbour.
The night is becoming dark, and some vessel is
expected inthat is all, believe me.
Whatever trust her visitors might have reposed
in Hope's good faith, they were evidently alarmed
by an appearance which they did not think
sufficiently
accounted for; and Oneco hearing, or
imagining he heard, approaching oars, said in his
own language to Magawisca, we have no time
to loseI will not permit my white bird to
remain
any longer within reach of the net.
Magawisca assented: We must go, she said;
we must not longer hazard our father's life.
Oneco sprang into the canoe, and called to Mary
to follow him.
Oh, spare her one single moment! said Hope,
imploringly to Magawisca, and she drew her a few
paces from the shore, and knelt down with her,
and in a half articulate prayer, expressed the
tenderness
and sorrow of her soul, and committed
her sister to God. Mary understood her action,
and feeling that their separation was for ever,
nature for a moment asserted her rights; she
returned
Hope's embrace, and wept on her bosom.
While the sisters were thus folded in one
another's
arms, a loud yell burst from the savages;
Magawisca caught Mary by the arms, and Hope
Vol. II. 9
turning, perceived that a boat filled with armed
men, had passed the projecting point of land, and
borne in by the tide, it instantly touched the beach,
and in another instant Magawisca and Mary were
prisoners. Hope saw the men were in the
uniform
of the Governor's guard. One moment
before
she would have given worlds to have had her
sister in her power; but now, the first impulse of
her generous spirit, was an abhorrence of her
seeming treachery to her friends. Oh, Oneco,
she cried, springing towards the canoe, I did
notindeed I did not know of it. She had
scarcely uttered the words, which fell from her
neither understood nor heeded, when Oneco
caught her in his arms, and shouting to
Magawisca
to tell the English, that as they dealt by Mary,
so would he deal by her sister; he gave the canoe
the first impulse, and it shot out like an arrow,
distancing and defying pursuit.
Oneco's coup-de-main seemed to petrify all
present. They were roused by Sir Philip
Gardiner
,
who, coming round the base of the cliff,
appeared
among them; and learning the cause of
their amazement, he ordered them, with a burst of
passionate exclamation, instantly to man the boat,
and proceed with him in pursuit. This, one
and all refused. Daylight, and calm water,
they said, would be necessary to give any hope
to such a pursuit, and the storm was now
gathering
so fast, as to render it dangerous to
venture
out at all.
Sir Philip endeavoured to alarm them with
threats of the Governor's displeasure, and to
persuade
them with offers of high reward; but they
understood too well the danger and hopelessness
of the attempt to risk it, and they remained
inexorable
.
Sir Philip then went in quest of Digby,
and at the distance of a few paces met him.
Alarmed by the rapid approach of the storm, he
was seeking Miss Leslie; when he learned her
fate from Sir Philip's hurried communication,
he uttered a cry of despair. Oh! I would
go after her, he said, if I had but a cockle
shell; but it seems as if the foul fiends were at
work: my boat was this morning sent to town to
be repaired. And yet what could we do? He
added, shuddering, the wind is rising to that
degree
,
that I think no boat could live in the bay;
and it is getting as dark as EgyptOh, God
save my precious young lady!God have mercy
on her! he continued. A sudden burst of
thunder
heightened his alarmman can do nothing
for her. Why in the name of heaven, he
added
,
with a natural desire to appropriate the blame
of misfortune, why must they be for ever
meddling
;
why not let the sisters meet and part in
peace?
`Oh! why not?' thought Sir Philip, who would
have given his right hand to have retraced the
steps that had led to this most unlooked for and
unhappy issue of the affair. They were now
joined by the guard with their prisoners. Digby
was requested to lead them instantly to a shelter.
He did so; and, agitated as he was with fear and
despair for Miss Leslie, he did not fail to greet
Magawisca, as one to whom all honour was due.
She heeded him notshe seemed scarcely
conscious
of the cries of Faith Leslie, who was
weeping
like a child, and clinging to her. The
treachery
that had betrayed her wrapt her soul in
indignation
,
and nothing roused her but the blasts
of wind and flashes of lightning, that seemed to
her the death-knell of her father.
The storm continued for the space of an hour,
and then died away as suddenly as it had
gathered
.
In another hour, the guard had safely
landed at the wharf, and were conveying their
prisoners to the Governor. He, and his
confidential
counsellors, who had been awaiting
at his house, the return of their emissaries,
solaced themselves with the belief that all parties
were safely sheltered on the island; and
probably
would remain there during the night. While
they were whispering this conclusion to one
another
,
at one extremity of the parlour, Everell sat
beside Miss Downing, in the recess of a window,
that overlooked the garden. The huge
projecting
chimney formed a convenient screen for the
lovers. The evening was warmthe
window-sash
thrown up. The moon had come forth, and
shed a mild lustre through the dewy
atmosphere
;
the very light that the young and
sentimental
and
above all, young and sentimental
lovers, most delight in. But in vain did Everell
look abroad for inspiration; in vain did he turn
his eyes to Esther's face, now more beautiful than
ever, flushed as it was with the first dawn of
happiness
;
in vain did he try to recall his truant
thoughts, to answer words to her timid but bright
glances; he would nothe could not say what he
did not feel; and the few sentences he uttered
fell on his own ear like the cold abstractions of
philosophy. While he was in this durance his
father
was listeningif a man stretched on a rack
can be said to listento Madam Winthrop's
whispered and reiterated assurances of her entire
approbation of her niece's choice.
This was the position of all parties, when a
bustle was heard in the court, and the guard
entered
.
The foremost advanced to the Governor
and communicated a few sentences in a low tone.
The Governor manifested unusual emotion,
turned
round suddenly, and exclaimed, here, Mr.
FletcherEverell; and then motioning to them
to keep their places, he said in an under voice to
those near to him, we must first dispose of our
prisonercome forward, Magawisca.
Magawisca! echoed Everell, springing at
one bound into the hall. But Magawisca shrunk
back, and averted her face. Now God be
praised! he exclaimed, as he caught the first
glance of a form never to be forgottenit is
it is Magawisca! She did not speak, but drew
away, and leaned her head against the wall.
9*
What means this? he said, now for the first
time espying Faith Leslie, and then looking round
on the guard, what means it, sir? he
demanded
,
turning somewhat imperiously to the
Governor
.
It means, sir, replied the Governor coldly,
that this Indian woman is the prisoner of the
Commonwealth.
It means that I am a prisoner, lured to the
net, and betrayed.
You a prisonerhere, Magawisca! Everell
exclaimedimpossible; justice, gratitude,
humanity
,
forbid it. My fatherGovernor
Winthrep
,
you will not surely suffer this outrage.
The elder Fletcher had advanced, and scarcely
less perplexed and agitated than his son, was
endeavouring
to draw forth Faith Leslie, who had
shrunk behind Magawisca. Governor Winthrop
seemed not at all pleased with Everell's
interference
.
You will do well, young Mr. Fletcher,
to bridle your zeal; private feelings must yield to
the public good; this young woman is suspected
of being an active agent in brewing the
conspiracy
forming against us among the Indian tribes;
and it is somewhat bold in you to oppose the
course of justiceto intermeddle with the public
welfareto lift your feeble judgment against the
wisdom of Providence, which has led by peculiar
means, to the apprehension of the enemy.
Conduct
your prisoner to the jail, he added, turning
to the guard; and bid Barnaby have her in
close and safe keeping, till further orders.
For the love of God, sir, cried Everell, do
not this injustice. At least suffer her to remain
in your own house, on her promisemore secure
than the walls of a prison. Governor Winthrop
only replied by signing to the guards to proceed
to their duty.
Stay one moment, exclaimed Everell;
permit her, I beseech you, to remain here;
place her in any one of your apartments, and I
will remain before it, a faithful warder, night and
day. But do notdo not, I beseech you, sully
our honour by committing this noble creature to
your jail.
Listen to my son, I entreat you, said the
elder
Fletcher, unable any longer to restrain his
own feelingscertainly we owe much to this
woman.
You owe much, undoubtedly, replied the
Governor, but it yet remains to be proved, my
friend, that your son's redeemed life is to be put
in the balance against the public weal.
Esther, who had observed the scene with an
intense
interest, now overcame her timidity so far,
as to penetrate the circle that surrounded the
Governor, and to attempt to enforce Everell's
prayer. May not Magawisca, she said, share
our apartment, Hope's and mine; she will then,
in safe custody await your further pleasure.
Thanks, Estherthanks, cried Everell, with
an animation that would have rewarded a far
more difficult effort; but all efforts were
unavailing
but not useless, for Magawisca said to
Everell
you have sent light into my darkened soul
you have truth, and gratitude, and for the rest, they
are but what I deemed them. Send me, she
continued
, proudly turning to the Governor, to
your dungeonall places are alike to me, while I
am your prisoner; but for the sake of Everell
Fletcher, let me tell you, that she, who is dearer
to him than his own soul, if indeed she has lived
out the perils of this night, must answer for my
safe keeping.
Hope Leslie! exclaimed Everell; what has
happenedwhat do you mean, Magawisca?
She was the decoy bird, replied Magawisca
calmly; and she too is caught in the net.
Explain, I beseech you! The Governor
answered Everell's appeal by a brief explanation.
A bustle ensuedevery other feeling was now
lost in concern for Hope Leslie; and Magawisca
was separated from her weeping and frightened
companion, and conducted away without further
opposition; while the two Fletchers, as if life and
death hung on every instant, were calling on the
Governor to aid them in the way and means of
pursuit. But as we hope our readers sympathise
in their apprehensions, we must leave them to
return
to our heroine.
CHAPTER VI.
But, oh, that hapless virgin, our lost sister,
Where may she wander now, whither betake her?
Comus
.
Hope Leslie,
on being forced into the canoe,
sunk down, overpowered with terror and despair.
She was roused from this state by Oneco's loud
and vehement appeals to his father, who only
replied
by a low inarticulate murmur, which
seemed
rather an involuntary emission of his own
feelings
,
than a response to Oneco. She understood
nothing but the name of Magawisca, which he
often repeated, and always with a burst of
vindictive
feeling, as if every other emotion were
lost in wrath at the treachery that had wrested
her from him. As the apparent contriver, and
active agent in this plot, Hope felt that she must
be the object of detestation, and the victim of
vengeance; and all that she had heard or
imagined
of Indian cruelties, was present to her
imagination
;
and every savage passion seemed to
her to be embodied in the figure of the old chief,
when she saw his convulsed frame and features,
illuminated by the fearful lightning that flashed
athwart him. It is possible, she thought, that
Oneco may understand me; and to him she
protested her innocence, and vehemently besought
his compassion. Oneco was not of a cruel
nature
,
nor was he disposed to inflict unnecessary
suffering on the sister of his wife; but he was
determined
to retain so valuable a hostage, and his
heart was steeled against her, by his conviction
that she had been a party to the wrong done him;
he, therefore, turned a deaf ear to her entreaties,
which her supplicating voice and gestures
rendered
intelligible, though he had nearly forgotten
her language. He made no reply by word or
sign, but continued to urge on his little bark with
all his might, redoubling his vigorous strokes as
the fury of the storm increased.
Hope cast a despairing eye on her receding
home, which she could still mark through the
mirky atmosphere, by the lurid flame that blazed
on Beacon-hill. Friends were on every side of
her, and yet no human help could reach her.
She saw the faint light that gleamed from Digby's
cottage-window, and on the other hand, the dim
ray that, struggling through the misty atmosphere,
proceeded from the watch-tower on Castle-Island.
Between these lights from opposite islands, she
was passing down the channel, and she inferred
that Oneco's design was to escape out of the
harbour
.
But heaven seemed determined to
frustrate
his purpose, and to show her how idle were
all human hopes and fears, how vain to cast the
fashion of uncertain evils.
The wind rose, and the darkness deepened at
every moment; the occasional flashes of
lightning
only serving to make it more intense. Oneco
tasked his skill to the utmost to guide the canoe;
he strained every nerve, till exhausted by useless
efforts, he dropped his oars, and awaited his
resistless
fate. The sublime powers of nature had
no terrors for Mononotto. There was something
awe-striking in the fixed, unyielding attitude of
the old man, who sat as if he were carved in
stone, whilst the blasts swept by him, and the
lightnings played over him. There are few who
have not at some period of their lives, lost their
consciousness of individualitytheir sense of this
shrinking, tremulous, sensitive being, in the dread
magnificencethe holy mystery of nature.
Hope, even in her present extremity, forgot her
fear and danger in the sublimity of the storm.
When the wild flashes wrapped the bay in light,
and revealed to sight the little bark leaping over
the yesty waves, the stern figure of the old
man, the graceful form of Oneco, and Hope
Leslie
,
her eye upraised, with an instinctive
exaltation
of feeling, she might have been taken for
some bright vision from another sphere, sent to
conduct her dark companions through the last
tempestuous passage of life. But the triumphs of
her spirit were transient; mortal danger pressed on
life. A thunderbolt burst over their heads. Hope
was, for a moment, stunned. The next flash
showed the old man struck down senseless.
Oneco shriekedraised the lifeless body in his
arms, laid his ear to the still bosom, and chafed
the breast and limbs. While he was thus striving
to bring back life, the storm abatedthe
moonbeams
struggled through the parting clouds, and
the canoe, driven at the mercy of the wind and
tide, neared a little island, and drifted on to the
beach. Oneco leaped out, dragged his father's
lifeless
body to the turf, and renewed and redoubled
his efforts to restore him; and Hope, moved by
an involuntary sympathy with the distress of his
child, stooped down and chafed the old man's
palms. Either from despair, or an impulse of
awakened hope, Oneco suddenly uttered an
exclamation
,
stretched himself on the body, and
locked his arms around it. Hope rose to her
feet, and seeing Mononotto unconscious, and
Oneco entirely absorbed in his own painful
anxieties
and efforts, the thought occurred to her, that
she might escape from her captors.
She looked at the little bark: her strength,
small as it was, might avail to launch it again;
and she might trust the same Providence that had
just delivered her from peril, to guide her in
safety
over the still turbulent waters. But a danger
just escaped, is more fearful than one untried;
and she shrunk from adventuring alone on the
powerful element. The island might be
inhabited
.
If she could gain a few moments before she
was missed by Oneco, it was possible she might
find protection and safety. She did not stop to
deliberate; but casting one glance at the
brightening
heavens, and ejaculating a prayer for aid,
and ascertaining by one look at Oneco that he
did not observe her, she bounded away. She
fancied
she heard steps pursuing her; but she
pressed
on without once looking back, or faltering,
till she reached a slight elevation, whence she
perceived, at no great distance from her, a light
placed on the ground; and on approaching a
little
nearer, she saw a man lying beside it; and at
a few paces from him several others stretched
on the grass, and, as she thought, sleeping. She
now advanced cautiously and timidly, till she was
near enough to conclude that they were a
company
of sailors, who had been indulging in a
lawless
revel. Such, in truth, they were; the crew
belonging to the vessel of the notorious
Chaddock
.
The disorders of both master, and men,
had given such offence to the sober citizens of
Boston, that they had been prohibited from
entering
the town; and the men having been on this
occasion allowed by their captain to indulge in a
revel on land, they had betaken themselves to an
uninhabited island, where they might give the
reins to their excesses, without dread of restraint
or penalty. As they now appeared to the eye of
our heroine, they formed a group from which a
painter might have sketched the triumphs of
Bacchus.
Fragments of a coarse feast were strewn about
them, and the ground was covered with wrecks
Vol. II 10
of jugs, bottles, and mugs. Some of them had
thrown off their coats and neck-cloths in the heat
of the day, and had lain with their throats and
bosoms bared to the storm, of which they had
been unconscious. Others, probably less
inebriated
,
had been disturbed by the vivid flashes of
lightning, and had turned their faces to the earth.
While Hope shuddered at the sight of these
brutalized
wretches, and thought any fate would be
better than
To meet the rudeness and swilled insolence
Of such late wassailers.
One of them awoke, and looked up at her. He
had but imperfectly recovered his senses, and he
perceived her but faintly and indistinctly, as one
sees an object through mist. Hope stood near
him, but she stood perfectly still; for she knew
from his imbecile smile, and half articulated
words, that she had nothing to fear. He laid
his hand on the border of her cloak, and
muttered
,
St. George's coloursDutch flag
no, dn me, Hanse, I saySt. George'sSt.
George'snail them to the mast headI say,
Hanse, St. George'sSt. George'sand then
his words died away on his tongue, and he
laughed in his throat, as one laughs in sleep.
While Hope hesitated for an instant, whether
again to expose herself to the thraldom from
which she had with such joy escaped, one of
the other men, either aroused by his comrade's
voice, or having outslept the fumes of the
liquor
,
started up, and, on perceiving her, rubbed
his eyes, and stared as if he doubted whether she
were a vision of his sleep or a reality. Hope's first
impulse was to fly; but, though confused and
alarmed, she was aware that escape would be
impossible if he chose to pursue, and that her
only alternative was to solicit his compassion.
Friend, she said, in a fearful, tremulous
voice, I come to beg your aid.
By the lord Harry, she speaks, exclaimed
the fellow, interrupting hershe is a woman
wake boyswake!
The men were now roused from their
slumbers
:
some rose to their feet, and all stared
stupidly
,
not one, save him first awakened, having
the perfect command of his senses. If ye
have the soul of a man, said Hope
imploringly
,
protect meconvey me to Boston. Any
reward
that you will ask or take shall be given to
you.
There's no reward could pay for you, honey,
replied the fellow, advancing towards her.
In the name of God, hear me! she cried;
but the man continued to approach with a
horrid leer on his face. Then save me, heaven!
she screamed, and rushed towards the water.
The wretch was daunted; he paused but for
an instant, then calling on his comrades to join
him, they all, hooting and shouting, pursued
her.
Hope now felt that death was her only
deliverance
;
if she could but reach the waves that she
saw heaving and breaking on the shoreif she
could but bury herself beneath them. But though
she flew as if she were borne on the wings of the
wind, her pursuers gained on her. The
foremost
was so near, that she expected at every
breath his hand would grasp her, when his foot
stumbled, and he fell headlong, and as he fell,
he snatched her cloak. By a desperate effort she
extricated herself from his hold, and again
darted
forward. She heard him vociferate curses,
and understood he was unable to rise. She cast
one fearful glance behind hershe had gained on
the horrid crew. `Oh! I may escape them,'
she thought; and she pressed on with as much
eagerness to cast away life, as ever was felt to
save it. As she drew near the water's edge, she
perceived a boat attached to an upright post that
had been driven into the earth at the extremity of
a narrow stone pier. A thought like inspiration
flashed into her mind: she ran to the end of
the pier, leaped into the boat, uncoiled the rope
that attached it to the post, and seizing an oar,
pushed it off. There was a strong tide; and the
boat, as if instinct with life, and obedient to her
necessities
,
floated rapidly from the shore. Her
pursuers
had now reached the water's edge, and finding
themselves foiled, some vented their spite in jeers
and hoarse laughs, and others in loud and bitter
curses. Hope felt that heaven had interposed for
her, and sinking on her knees, she clasped her
hands, and breathed forth her soul in fervent
thanksgivings. Whilst she was thus absorbed, a
man, who had been lying in the bottom of the
boat, unobserved by her, and covered by various
outer garments, which he had so disposed as to
shelter himself from the storm, lifted up his
head, and looked at her with mute amazement.
He was an Italian, and belonged to the same
ship's company with the revellers on the shore;
but not inclining to their excesses, and thinking,
on the approach of the storm, that some judgment
was about to overtake them, he had returned to
the boat, and sheltered himself there as well as
he was able. When the tempest abated, he had
fallen asleep, his imagination probably in an
excited
state; and on awaking, and seeing Hope in
an attitude of devotion, he very naturally mistook
her for a celestial visitant. In truth, she
scarcely
looked like a being of this earth: her hat and
gloves were gone; her hair fell in graceful
disorder
about her neck and shoulders, and her white
dress and blue silk mantle had a saint-like
simplicity
.
The agitating chances of the evening had
scarcely left the hue of life on her cheek; and her
deep sense of the presence and favour of heaven
heightened her natural beauty with a touch of
religious
inspiration.
Hail, blessed virgin Mary! cried the catholic
Italian, bending low before her, and crossing
himself: Queen of heaven!Gate of paradise!
10*
and Lady of the world!O most clement!
most pious! and most sweet virgin Mary! bless
thy sinful servant. He spoke in his native
tongue, of which Hope fortunately knew enough
to comprehend him, and to frame a phrase in
return
.
The earnestness of his countenance was a
sure pledge of his sincerity; and Hope was half
inclined to turn his superstition to her own
advantage
;
but his devotion approached so near to
worship, that she dared not; and she said,
with the intention of dissipating his illusion,
I am not, my friend, what you imagine me to
be.
Thou art not, thou art not, holy queen of
virgins, and of all heavenly citizensthen most
gracious lady, which of all the martyrs and saints
of our holy church art thou? Santa Catharina of
Siena, the blessed bride of a holy marriage?
Hope shook her head. Santa Helena then, in
whose church I was first signed with holy water?
nay, thou art not?then art thou, Santa Bibiani?
or Santa Rosa? thy beauteous hair is like that
sacred lock over the altar of Santa Croce.
I am not any of these, said Hope with a
smile, which the catholic's pious zeal extorted from
her.
Thou smilest! he cried exultingly; thou art
then my own peculiar saintthe blessed lady
Petronilla. Oh, holy martyr! spotless mirror of
purity! and he again knelt at her feet and
crossed
himself. My life! my sweetness! and my
hope! to thee do I cry, a poor banished son of
Evewhat wouldst thou have thy dedicated
servant
,
Antonio Batista, to do, that thou hast, oh,
glorious lady! followed him from our own sweet
Italy to this land of heathen savages and heretic
English?
This invocation was long enough to allow our
heroine time to make up her mind as to the
course she should pursue with her votary. She
had recoiled from the impiety of appropriating
his address to the holy mother, but protestant as
she was, we hope she may be pardoned for
thinking
that she might without presumption, identify
herself with a catholic saint. Good Antonio,
she said, I am well pleased to find thee faithful,
as thou hast proved thyself, by withdrawing from
thy vile comrades. To take part in their excesses
would but endanger thine eternal welfarebear
this in mind. Now, honest Antonio, I will put
honour on thee; thou shalt do me good service.
Take those oars and ply them well till we reach
you town, where I have an errand that must be
done.
Oh, most blessed lady! sacred martyr, and
sister of mercy! who, entering into the heavenly
palace, didst fill the holy angels with joy, and men
with hope, I obey thee, he said, and then taking
from his bosom a small ivory box, in which, on
opening it, there appeared to be a shred of linen
cloth, he added, but first, most gracious lady.
vouchsafe to bless this holy relic, taken from
the linen in which thy body was enfolded, when,
after it had lain a thousand years in the grave, it
was raised therefrom fresh and beautiful, as it
now appeareth to me.
Our saint could not forbear a smile at this
startling fact in her history, but she prudently
took the box, and unclasping a bracelet from her
arm, which was fastened by a small diamond
cross, she added it to the relic, whose value though
less obvious, could not be exceeded in Antonio's
estimation. I give thee, this, she said,
Antonio
,
for thy spiritual and temporal necessities, and
shouldst thou ever be in extreme need, I permit
thee to give it into the hand of some cunning
artificer
,
who will extract the diamonds for thee,
without marring that form which thou rightly
regardest
as blessed. Antonio received the box as
if it contained the freedom of Paradise, and
replacing
it in his bosom, he crossed himself again
and again, repeating his invocations till his saint,
apprehensive that in his ecstasy he would lose all
remembrance of the high office for which she had
selected him, gently reminded him that it was the
duty of the faithful to pass promptly from
devotion
to obedience; on this hint he rose, took up
the oars, and exercised his strength and skill with
such exemplary fidelity, that in less than two
hours, his boat touched the pier which Hope
designated
as the point where she would
disembark
.
Before she parted from her votary, she said, I
give thee my blessings and my thanks, Antonio,
and I enjoin thee, to say nought to thy wicked
comrades, of my visitation to thee; they would
but jeer thee and wound thy spirit by making
thy lady their profane jest. Reserve the tale,
Antonio
,
for the ears of the faithful who marvel not
at miracles.
Antonio bowed in token of obedience, and as
long as Hope saw him, he remained in an
attitude
of profound homage.
Our heroine's elastic spirit, ever ready to rise
when pressure was removed, had enabled her to
sustain her extempore character with some
animation
,
but as soon as she had parted from Antonio,
and was no longer stimulated to exertion by the
fear that his illusion might be prematurely
dissipated
,
she felt that her strength had been
over-taxed
by the strange accidents and various perils
of the evening. Her garments were wet and
heavy, and at every step, she feared another
would be impossible. Her head became giddy,
and faintness and weariness, to her, new and
strange sensations, seemed to drag her to the
earth. She looked and listened in vain for some
human being to call to her assistance: the streets
were empty and silent; and unable to proceed, she
sunk down on the steps of a warehouse, shut
her eyes, and laid down her head to still its
throbbings.
She had not remained thus many minutes, when
she was started by a voice saying, Ha! lady, dost
thou
too wander alone?is
thy
cheek pale
thy
head sick
thy
heart fluttering?yet thou art not
guilty nor forsaken!
Hope looked up, and perceived she was
addressed
by Sir Philip Gardiner's page. She had
repeatedly seen him since their first meeting, but
occupied as she had been with objects of intense
interest to her, she thought not of their first
singular
interview, excepting when it was recalled by
the supposed boy's keen, and as she fancied, angry
glances. They seemed involuntary, for when his
eye met hers, he withdrew it, and his cheek was dyed
with blushes. There was now a thrilling
melancholy
in his tone; his eye was dim and sunken;
and his apparel, usually elaborate, and somewhat
fantastical, had a neglected air. His vest was
open; his lace ruff, which was ordinarily
arranged
with a care that betrayed his consciousness
how much it graced his fair delicate throat, had
now been forgotten, and the feathers of his little
Spanish hat dangled over his face. Hope Leslie
was in no condition to note these particulars; but
she was struck with his haggard and wretched
appearance, and was alarmed when she saw him
lay his hand on the hilt of a dagger that gleamed
from beneath the folds of his vest.
Do not shrink, lady, he said, the pure should
not fear death, and I am sure the guilty need not
dread itthere is nothing worse for them than
they may feel walking on the fair earth with the
lights of heaven shining on them. I had this
dagger of my master, and I think, he added with
a convulsive sob, he would not be sorry, if I used
it to rid him of his troublesome page.
Why do you not leave your master, if he is
of this fiendish disposition towards you? asked
Hope, leave him and return to your friends.
Friends!friends! he exclaimed; the rich
the goodthe happythose born in honour,
have friends. I have not a friend in the wide
world.
Poor soul! said Hope, losing every other
thought in compassion for the unhappy boy; and
some notion of his real character and relation to
Sir Philip darting into her mind, then leave this
wretched man, and trust thyself to heaven.
I am forsaken of heaven, lady.
That cannot be. God never forsakes his
creatures
:
the miserable, the guilty, from whom every
human face is turned away, may still go to him,
and find forgiveness and peace. His compassions
never fail.
Yesbut the guilty must forsake their sinful
thoughts, and I cannot. My heart is steeped in
this guilty love. If my master but looks kindly
on me, or speaks one gentle word to me, I again
cling to my chains and fetters.
Oh, this is indeed foolish and sinful; how can
you love him, whom you confess to be so
unworthy
?
We must love something, replied the boy in
a faint voice, his head sinking on his bosom.
My master did love me, and nobody else ever
loved me. I never knew a mother's smile,
lady, nor felt her tears. I never heard a father's
voice; and do you think it so very strange that I
should cling to him who was the first, the only
one that ever loved me? He paused for a
moment
,
and looked eagerly on Hope, as if for some
word of encouragement; but she made no reply,
and he burst into a passionate flood of tears, and
wrung his hands, saying, Oh, yes, it isI know
it is foolish and sinful, and I try to be penitent.
I say my pater-nosters, he added, taking a
rosary
from his bosom, and my ave-maries, but I
get no heart's ease; and betimes my head is wild,
and I have horrid thoughts. I have hated you,
lady; you who look so like an angel of pity on
me; and this very day, when I saw Sir Philip
hand you into that boat, and saw you sail away
with him over the bright water so gay and
laughing
,
I could have plunged this dagger into your
bosom; and I made a solemn vow that you should
not live to take the place of honour beside my
master, while I was cast away a worthless thing.
These are indeed useless vows, and idle
thoughts, said Hope. I cannot longer listen
to you now, for I am very sick and weary; but do
not grieve thus,come to me to-morrow, and
tell me all your sorrows, and be guided by me.
Oh, not to-morrow! exclaimed the boy,
grasping her gown as she rose to depart; not
to-morrowI hate the light of dayI cannot go
to that great houseI have no longer courage to
meet the looks of the happy, and answer their
idle questions; stay now, lady, for the love of
heaven! my story is short.
Hope had no longer the power of deliberation,
she did not even hear the last entreaty. At the
first movement she made, the sensation of
giddiness
returned, every object seemed to swim before
her, and she sunk, fainting, into Roslin's arms.
The page had now an opportunity to gratify his
vindictive passions if he had any; but his mad
jealousy was a transient excitement of feelings in
a disordered, almost a distracted state, and soon
gave way to the spontaneous emotions of a
gentle
and tender nature. He carefully sustained
his burden, and while he pressed his lips to
Hope's cold brow, with an undefinable sensation
of joy that he might thus approach angelic
purity
,
he listened eagerly to the sound of footsteps,
and as they came nearer, he recognised the two
Fletchers, with a company of gentlemen, guards,
and sailors, whom, with the Governor's
assistance
,
they had hastily collected to go in pursuit
of our heroine.
Everell was the first to perceive her. He sprang
towards her, and when he saw her colourless face,
and lifeless body, he uttered an exclamation of
horror
.
All now gathered about her, listening eagerly
to Roslin's assurance that she had just fainted,
complaining
Vol. II. 11
of sickness and extreme weariness. He,
as our readers well know, could give no further
explanation of the state in which Miss Leslie was
found; indeed, her friends scarcely waited for any.
Everell wrapped her in his cloak, and assisted by
his father, carried her in his arms to the nearest
habitation, whence she was conveyed, as soon as
a carriage could be obtained, to Governor
Winthrop's
.
CHAPTER VII.
He that questions whether God made the world, the
Indian
will teach him. I must acknowledge I have received in
my converse with them, many confirmations of those two great
points; first, that `God is;' second, `that he is a rewarder of
all them that diligently seek him.'
Roger Williams
.
Our
readers' sagacity has probably enabled
them to penetrate the slight mystery, in which
the circumstances that led to the apprehension of
Magawisca have been shrouded. Sir Philip
Gardiner
,
after attending Mrs. Grafton home on the
Saturday night, memorable in the history of our
heroine, saw her enter the burial-place. Partly
moved by his desire to ascertain whether there
was any cause for her running away from him
that might soothe his vanity, and partly, no doubt,
by an irresistible attraction towards her; he
followed
at a prudent distance, till he saw her
meeting with Magawisca; he then secreted
himself
in the thicket of evergreens, where he was
near enough to hear and observe all that passed;
and where, as may be remembered, he narrowly
escaped being exposed by his dog.
Sir Philip had heard the rumour of a
conspiracy
among the natives; and when he saw
Magawisca's
extreme anxiety to secure a clandestine
interview with Miss Leslie, the probable reason
for her secresy at once occurred to him. If he
conjectured rightly, he was in possession of a
secret that might be of value to the state, and of
course, be made the means of advancing him in
the favour of the Governor. But might he not risk
incurring Miss Leslie's displeasure by this
inter-position
in her affairs, and thus forfeit the object
of all his present thoughts and actions? He
believed
not. He saw that she yielded reluctantly,
and because she had no alternative, to
Magawisca's
imposition of secresy. With her romantic
notions, it was most probable that she would hold
her promise inviolate; but would she not be
bound in everlasting gratitude to him, who by an
ingenious manuvre should, without in the least
involving her honour, secure the recovery of her
sister? Thus he flattered himself he should, in
any event, obtain some advantage. To Miss
Leslie he would appear solely actuated by zeal
for her happiness; to the Governor, by devotion
to the safety and welfare of the commonwealth.
Accordingly, on the following Monday morning,
he solicited a private interview with the
magistrates
,
and deposed before them, that on
returning
to his lodgings on Saturday night, he had
seen Miss Leslie enter the burying-ground alone;
that believing she had gone to visit some spot
consecrated by the interment of a friend, and
knowing the ardent temper of the young lady, he
feared she might forget, in the indulgence of her
feelings, the lateness of the hour. He had,
therefore
,
with the intention of guarding her from all
harm, without intruding on her meditations,(which
though manifestly unseasonable, might, he
thought, tend to edifying by withdrawing her
thoughts from worldly objects,) followed her, and
secluded himself in the copse of evergreens,
where, to his astonishment, he had witnessed her
interview with the Indian woman. The
particulars
of their conversation he gave at length.
Unfortunately for Magawisca, Sir Philip's
testimony
coincided with the story of a renegado
Indian, formerly one of the counsellors and
favourites
of Maintunnomoh. This savage, stung by
some real or fancied wrongs, deserted his tribe,
and vowing revenge, he repaired to Boston, and
divulged to the Governor the secret hostility of
his chief towards the English; which, he said,
had been stimulated to activity by the old Pequod
chief, and the renowned maiden Magawisca.
He stated also, that the chiefs of the different
tribes, moved by the eloquence and arguments of
Mononotto, were forming a powerful combination.
Thus far the treacherous savage told the truth;
but he proceeded to state plots and underplots,
and artfully to exaggerate the number and power
of the tribes. The magistrates lent a believing
ear to the whole story. They were aware that
the Narragansetts, ever since they had witnessed
the defeat and extinction of their ancient enemies
11*
the Pequods, had felt a secret dread and jealousy
of the power and encroachments of the English,
and that they only waited for an opportunity to
manifest their hostility. Letters had been
recently
received from the magistrates of
Connecticut
,
expressing their belief that a general rising
of the Indians was meditated. All these
circumstances
combined to give importance to Sir
Philip's and the Indian's communications. But
the Governor felt the necessity of proceeding
warily.
Miantunnomoh had been the faithful friend
and ally of the English. He is described by
Winthrop
,
as a sagacious and subtle man, who
showed
good understanding in the principles of
justtice
and equity, and ingenuity withal. Such a
man it was obviously the policy of the English
not unnecessarily to provoke; and the Governor
hoped, by getting possession of the Pequod
family
,
to obtain the key to Miantunnomoh's real
designs
,
and to crush the conspiracy before it was
matured.
We have been compelled to this digression,
in order to explain the harsh reception and
treatment of Magawisca; to account for the
zeal with which the Governor promoted the party
to the garden; and for the signal which guided
the boat directly to the Pequod family, and which
Sir Philip remained on the island to give. The
knight had now gotten very deep into the councils
and favour of the magistrates, who saw in him
the selected medium of a special kindness of
Providence
to them.
He took good care,
That all his circling wiles should end
In feigned religion, smooth hypocrisy;
and by addressing his arts to the predominant
tastes and principles of the honest men whom he
deluded, he well sustained his accidental
advantage
.
It would be vain to attempt to describe the
various
emotions of Governor Winthrop's family
at the return of Hope Leslie. Madam
Winthrop
,
over excited by the previous events of
the evening, had fortunately escaped any further
agitation by retiring to bed, after composing her
nerves with a draught of valerian tea. Mrs.
Grafton, who had been transported with joy at
the unlooked for recovery of Faith Leslie, was
carried to the extreme of despair, when she saw
the lifeless body of her beloved niece borne to
her apartment. Poor old Cradock went like the
bird of poetic fame, up stairs and down stairs,
wringing his hands, and sobbing like a whipt boy.
The elder Fletcher stood bending in mute agony
over the child of his affections, whom he loved
with even more than the tenderness of a parent.
His tears, like those of old and true Menenius,
seemed salter than a younger man's, and
venemous
to his eyes; and his good friend Governor
Winthrop, when he saw his distress, secretly
repented
that he had acquiesced in a procedure that
had brought such misery upon this much
enduring
man. Jennet bustled about, appearing to
do every thing, and doing nothing; and hoping
`to goodness' sake, the young lady would come
to herself, long enough, at least, to tell what had
befallen her'`she always thought, she did, what
her harem-scarem ways would bring her to at
last.' Miss Downing, without regarding, or even
hearing, these and many other similar mutterings,
proceeded with admirable presence of mind to
direct and administer all the remedies that were
at hand; while Everell, almost distracted, went
in quest of medical aid.
A delirious fever succeeded to
unconsciousness
;
and for three days Hope Leslie's friends
hung over her in the fear that every hour would
be her last. For three days and nights, Esther
Downing never quitted her bedside, except to go
to the door of the apartment to answer Everell's
inquiries. Her sweet feminine qualities were now
called into action: she watched and prayed over
her friend; and, though her cheek was pale, and
her eye dim, she had never appeared half so
lovely to Everell, as when in her simple linen
dressing gown, she for an instant left the invalid
to announce some favourable symptom. On the
fourth morning, Hope's fever abated; her
incoherent
ravings ceased, and she sunk, for the first
time, into a tranquil sleep. Esther sat perfectly
still by her bedside, fearing to move, lest the
slightest noise should disturb hershe heard
Everell
walking in the entry, as he had done
incessantly
,
and stopping, at every turn, to listen at the
door. Till now, all her faculties had been in
requisition
her
mind and body devoted to her
friendshe had not thought of herself; and if
sometimes the thought of Everell intruded, she
blushed at what she deemed the unsubdued
selfishness
of her heart. Alas! she said, I am
far from that temper which leads us to `weep with
those that weep,' if I suffer thoughts of my own
happy destiny to steal in when my friend is in this
extremity. But these were but transient
emotions
:
her devotion to Hope was too sincere and
unremitting to afford occasion of reproach even to
her watchful and accusing conscience. But now,
as she listened to Everell's perturbed footsteps,
a new train of thoughts passed through her mind.
Everell has scarcely quitted that station. With
what eagerness he has hung on my words when I
spoke of Hope! What a mortal paleness has
overspread his face at every new alarm! It would
not, perhaps, have been rightbut, methinks, it
would have been naturalthat he should have
expressed some concern for meI cannot
remember
that he has. How often has he said to
me, `dear Esther, you will not leave her?' and,
`for the love of heaven, trust her not a moment
to the discretion of her aunt'`do not confide
in Jennet'`Madam Winthrop has too many
cares for so delicate a chargeall depends on
you, dear Esther.' Yeshe said
dear
Esther;
but how many times he has repeated it, as if his
life were suspended by the same thread as hers.
If I were in Hope's condition, would he feel thus?
I could suffer death itself for such proofs of
tenderness
.
Sinful worm that I am, thus to doat on
any creature. The serenity of her mind was
disturbedshe rose involuntarilyas she rose,
her gown caught in her chair, and overthrew it.
The chair fell against a little stand by the bedside,
covered with phials, cups, and spoons, and all
were overthrown, with one of those horrible
clatters
,
that are as startling in a sick-room as the
explosion of a magazine at midnight.
Everell, alarmed by the unwonted noise,
instinctively
opened the doorHope awoke from
her profound sleep, and drew aside the curtain
she looked bewildered; but it was no longer the
wildness of fever: thronging and indistinct
recollections
oppressed her; but after an instant, a
perfect consciousness of the past and the present
returned; she covered her eyes, and sunk back
on the pillow, murmuring, thank God! and
tears of gratitude and joy stole over her cheeks.
Esther lost every other emotion in unmixed
joy. She went to the door to Everell, who was
still standing there, as if he were transfixed. It
is as you see, she said, the danger is pastshe
has slept sweetly for three hours, and was now
only disturbed by my carelessness; go to your
father
with the good news; your face will tell it
even if your lips refuse, as they do now, to move.
They did now move, and the joy of his heart
broke forth in the exclamation, You are an
angel
,
Esther! my father owes to you the
preservation
of his dearest treasure; and IImy life,
Esther, shall prove to you my sense of what
I owe you.
There was an enthusiasm in his manner, that
for the first time satisfied Esther's feelings; but
her religious sentiments habitually predominating
over every other, I have been a poor but
honoured
instrument, she said; let us all carry
our thansgivings to that altar where they are
due. Then, after allowing Everell to press her
hand to his lips, she closed the door, and
returned
to Hope's bedside. Hope again put aside the
bed-curtainIs not my sister here? she
asked
;
she must be here, and yet I can scarcely
separate my dreams from the strange accidents of
that night.
She is here, safe and well, my dear Hope;
but for the present, you must be content not to
see her; you have been very ill, and need perfect
rest.
I feel that I need it, Esther, but I must first
know how it has fared with Magawisca; she
came on my solemn promiseI trust she has been
justly dealt byshe has been received as she
deserved
,
Esther?
Esther hesitatedbut seeing Hope's lip
quivering
with apprehension, and fearing the effects, in
her weak state, of any new agitation, she, for the
first time in her life, condescended to an
equivocation
,
solacing herself with thinking that she
ought to believe that perfectly right which her
uncle Winthrop appointed: she said,
Magawisca
has had a merited receptionnow ask no
more questions, Hope, but compose yourself
again to sleep. If Hope had had the will, she
had not the power to disobey, for nature will not
be rifled of her dues. But we must leave her to
the restoring influence of the kindest of all
nature's
provisions, to visit one from whom care and
sorrow banished sleep.
At an advanced hour of the following evening,
Sir Philip Gardiner repaired to the town jail, and
was admitted by its keeper, Barnaby Tuttle.
The knight produced a passport to the cell of
Thomas Morton, and pointing to the Governor's
signature and seal, you know that, friend, he
said.
As well as my own face; but I am loath to
lead a gentleman of your bearing to such an
unsavory
place.
Scruple not, honest master Tuttle, duty takes
no note of time and place.
You shall be served, sir; and with the better
will, since you seem to be, as it were, of a
God-serving
turn,but walk in, your worship, and sit
down in my bit of a place; which, though a
homely one, and within the four walls of a jail, is,
I thank the Lord, like that into which Paul and
Silas were thrust, a place where prayers and
praises are often heard.
Barnaby now lighted a candle, and while Sir
Philip was awaiting his dilatory preparations, he
could not but wonder that a man of his
appearance
should have been selected for an office that
is usually supposed to require a muscular frame,
strong nerves, and a hardy spirit. Barnaby
Tuttle
had none of these; but, on the contrary, was
a man of small stature, meagre person, and a
pale and meek countenance, that bespoke the
disposition that lets I dare not, wait upon I
would.
Have you been long in this service of jailer?
asked Sir Philip.
Six years, an please your worship, come the
10th day of next October, at 8 o'clock of the
morning. I had been long a servant in the
Governor's
own household; and he gave me the
office
,
as he was pleased to say, because he knew
me trust worthy, and a merciful man.
But mercy, master Barnaby, is not held to be
a special qualification for those of your calling.
It is not sir? Well, I can tell your honour,
there's no place it's more wanted; and here, in
our new English colony, we have come, as it
were, under a new dispensation. Our prisoners
are seldom put in for those crimes that fill the
jails in Old England. Since I have been keeper
six years next October, as I told you it isI
Vol. II. 12
have had but few in for stealing, and one for
murder
;
and that was a disputed case, there being
no clear testimony; but as he was proved to have
lived an atheist life, he was condemned to die,
and at the last confessed many sore offences,
which, as Mr. Cotton observed in his sermon,
preached the next Lord's day, were each and all
held worthy of death by the laws of Moses. No
sir, our prisoners are chiefly those who are led
astray of the devil into divers errors of opinions,
or those who commit such sins as are named at
length in the Levitical law.
Ah, said Sir Philip, with a well pitched
groan, the depravity of man will find a channel:
stop it at one place and it will out at another.
But come, friend Barnabytime is going on
I'll follow you. The jailer now led the way
through a long narrow passage, with doors on
each side, which opened into small apartments.
Hark! said Barnaby, laying his hand on Sir
Philip's armhear you that? It's Gorton
praying
;
he and his company are all along in these
wards; and betimes I hear them calling on the
Lord, like Daniel in the lion's den, for hours
together
.
I hope it's not a sin to feel for such
woful
heretics, for I have dropped salt tears for them.
Does not your honour think our magistrates may
have some way opened up for their pardon?
I see not how they can, master Barnaby,
unless
these sore revilers should renounce their
heresies
,
orhe added, with an involuntary sneer,
fortunately for him, unobserved by his simple
companion
,
or, their title to the Indian lands.
They had now arrived at one extremity of the
passage, and Barnaby selected a key from his
bunch; but before putting it in the lock, he said,
Morton is in a little room within the Indian
woman's
,
taken the other day.
So I understand; and by your leave, master
Tuttle, I would address a private admonition to
this Indian woman, who, as report saith, is an
obstinate
heathen.
I suppose she is, your honour; they that
should know, say so. But she hath truly a
discreet
and quiet way with her, that I would was
more common among Christian women. But as
you say you wish to speak in private, I must beg
your honour's pardon for turning my bolt on you.
I will give you the light, and the key to the inner
room; and when you desire my attendance, you
have but to pull a cord that hangs by the frame
of the door inside, and rings a bell in the passage
one word more, your honourbe on your guard
when you go into Morton's cell. He raves,
betimes
,
as if all the fiends possessed him; and then
again, he sings and dances, as if he were at his
revels on the merry mount; and betimes he cries
the poor old manlike a baby, for the
twentyfour
hours round; so that I cannot but think a
place in the London hospital would be fitter for
him than this.
Your feelings seem not to suit with the humour
of your profession, Master Tuttle.
May be not, sir; but there is a pleasure in a
pitiful feeling, let your outward work be ever so
hard, as, doubtless, your worship well knows.
Sir Philip felt that conscience sent a burning
blush to his hardened cheek; and he said, with
an impatient tone, I have my instructionslet
me pass in, master Tuttle. Barnaby unlocked
the door, gave him the candle, and then turned
the bolt upon him.
Magawisca was slowly pacing the room, to and
fro; she stopped, and uttered a faint exclamation
at the sight of her visitor, then turned away, as if
disappointed, and resumed her melancholy step.
Sir Philip held up his candle to survey the
apartment
.
It was a room of ordinary size, with one
small grated window; and containing a flock-bed,
and a three-legged stool, on which stood a plate
of untasted provisions.
Truly, said he, advancing into the room,
generous entertainment this, for a hapless
maiden
.
Magawisca made no reply, and gave no
heed to him, and he proceeded, a godly and
gallant
youth, that Everell Fletcher, to suffer one
who risked her life, and cast away a precious limb
for him, to lie forgotten here. Methinks if he
had a spark of thy noble nature, maiden, he
would burn the town, or batter down this prison
wall, for you. An irrepressible groan escaped
from Magawisca, but she spoke not.
He leaves you here alone and helpless to await
death, continued the knight; thus venting his
malignity against Everell, though he saw that
every word was a torturing knife to the innocent
maiden. Death, the only boon you can expect
from these most christian magistrates, while he,
with a light heart and smirking face, is dancing
attendance on his lady love.
On whom? interrupted Magawisca, in a
tone of fearful impatience.
On her who played so faithfully the part of
decoy-pigeon to thee.
Hope Leslie!my father then is taken, she
screamed.
Nay, nay, not so; thy father and brother,
both, by some wondrous chance escaped.
Dost thou speak truth? demanded
Magawisca
in a thrilling voice, and looking in Sir
Philip's face as if she would penetrate his soul
I doubt thee.
The knight opportunely bethought himself of
having heard Magawisca during her interview
with Hope Leslie, allude to the Romish religion; he
took a crucifix from his bosom and pressed it to
his lips. Then by this holy sign, he said, of
which if you know aught, you know that to use it
falsely would bring death to my soul, I swear I
speak truly.
Magawisca again turned away, and drawing
her mantle, which, in her emotion, had fallen back,
close over her shoulders, she continued to pace
the apartment, without bestowing even a look on
Sir Philip, who felt himself in an awkward
predicament
,
12*
and found it difficult to rally his spirits
to prosecute the object of his visit. But
habitually
confident, and like all bad men, distrusting
the existence of incorruptible virtue, he soon
shook off his embarrassment, and said, I doubt,
maiden, you would breathe more freely in the
wild wood than in this stifling prison; and sleep
more quietly on the piled leaves of your forests,
than on that bed that christian love has spread for
you. Magawisca neither manifested by word or
sign that she heard him, and he proceeded more
explicitly,Do you sigh for the freedom of
nature
?would
you be restored to it?
Would I! would the imprisoned bird return
to its nestlings? she now stopped, and looked
with eager inquiry on Sir Philip.
Then listen to me, and you shall learn by
what means, and on what terms you may escape
from this prison, and beyond the reach of your
enemies. Here, he continued, producing from
beneath his cloak, a rope-ladder, and a file and
wrench, here are instruments by which you can
remove those bars, and by which you may safely
descend to the ground.
Tell me, cried Magawisca, a ray of joy
lighting
her eyes, tell me how I shall use them.
Sir Philip explained the mode, enjoined great
caution, and then proceeded to say,By
tomorrow
night at twelve you can remove the
bars; the town will then be still; proceed
directly
to the point where you last landed, and a boat
shall there be in readiness, well manned, to
convey
you beyond danger.
Wellwell, she replied, with breathless
eagerness, now tell me what I am to do; what
a poor Indian prisoner can do to requite such a
favour as this?
Sir Philip began a replystammered, and
paused. He seemed to turn and turn his
purpose
,
and endeavoured to shelter it in some
drapery
that should hide its ugliness; but this was
beyond his art, and summoning impudence to his
aid, he said, I have a young damsel with me,
who for silly love followed me out of England. Now
you foresters, maiden, who live according to the
honesty of nature, you could not understand me, if
I were to tell you of the cruel laws of the world,
which oblige this poor girl to disguise herself in
man's apparel, and counterfeit the duties of a page,
that she may conceal her love. She hath become
somewhat troublesome to me: all that I ask as
the price of your liberty is, that she may be the
companion of your flight.
Doth she go willingly?
Nay, not willingly; but she is young, and like
a tender twig, you can bend her at will; all I ask
is, your promise that she return not.
But if she resist?
Act your pleasure with her; yet I would not
that she were harmed. You may give her to your
brother in the place of this fair-haired damsel
they have stolen from him; or, he added, for
he saw that Magawisca's brow contracted, or,
if that suits not you, nor him, you may take her to
your western forests, and give her to a Romish
priest, who will guide her to the Hotel Dieu,
which our good lady of Bouillon has established
in Canada. Magawisca dropped at his feet
the instruments which she had grasped with
such delight. Nay, nay, bethink you, maiden,
it is a small boon to return for liberty and life; for,
trust me, if you remain here, they will not spare
your life.
And dost thou think, she replied, that I
would make my heart as black as thine, to save
my life?life! Dost thou not know, that life can
only be abated by those evil deeds forbidden by
the Great Master of life?The writing of the
Great Spirit has surely vanished from thy
degraded
soul, or thou wouldst know, that man cannot
touch life! Life is nought but the image of the
Great Spiritand he hath most of it, who sends
it back most true and unbroken, like the perfect
image of the clear heavens, in the still lake.
Sir Philip's eye fell, and his heart quailed
before
the lofty glance, and unsullied spirit of the
Indian maiden. Once he looked askance at her,
but it was with such a look as Satan eyed the sun
in his high meridian tower. With a feeling
of almost insupportable meanness he collected,
and again concealed beneath his cloak the ladder
and other instruments, which he had been at no
small pains to procure, and was turning to
summon
Barnaby by ringing the bell, when he suddenly
recollected, that Thomas Morton had been the
ostensible motive of his visit, and that it was but
a prudent precaution to look in upon him for an
instant; and feeling too, perhaps, a slight
curiosity
to see the companion of his former excesses, he
changed his purpose, turned to Morton's door,
unlocked and opened it.
The old man seemed to have shrunk away as
if frightened, and was gathered up almost into a
ball in one corner of his miserable little squalid
den. A few remnants of his garments hung like
shreds about him. Every particle of his hair had
dropped out; his grisly beard was matted
together
;
his eyes gleamed like sparks of fire in utter
darkness. Sir Philip was transfixed. `Is this,'
he thought, `Morton! the gentlemanthe
gallant
cavalierthe man of pleasureGood God!
the girl hath truly spoken of life!' While he
stood thus, the old man sprang on him like a cat,
pulled him within the door, and then, with the
action of madness, swift as thought, he seized the
key, locked the door on the inside, and threw the
key through the bars of the window without the
prison. The candle had fallen and was
extinguished
,
and Sir Philip found himself immured
with his scarcely human companion in total
darkness
,
without any means of rescue, excepting
through Magawisca. His first impulse was to
entreat her to ring the bell, but he delayed for a
moment, lest he should heighten the old man's
paroxysm of madness.
In this interval of silence, Magawisca fancied
she heard a sound against her window, and on
going to it, perceived, though the night was
extremely
dark, a ladder resting against the bars;
she listened and heard a footstep ascending; then
there was a wrestling in Morton's room; and
screamsHe'll kill mering the bell. Again
all was still, and she heard from the ground
below
,
Come down, Mr. Everell, for the love of
heaven come down. The words were uttered
in a tone hardly above a whisper.
Hush, Digby, I will not come down.
Then you are lost; those cries will certainly
alarm the guard.
Hush! the cries have ceased. Everell
mounted
quite to the window, quick as if he had risen
on wings.
`He is true!' thought Magawisca, and it
seemed to her that her heart would burst with joy,
but she could not speak. He applied an
instrument
to one of the iron bars, and wrenched it off.
Repeated and louder cries of murder!help
ring the bell! now proceeded from Gardiner, and
the old maniac seemed determined to outroar
him. Again the noise ceased, and again Digby
spoke in a more agitated voice than before. Oh,
they are stirring in the yardcome away, Mr.
Everell.
I will notI had rather diestand fast,
Digby
one
bar more, and she is free; and again
he applied the instrument.
Are you mad? exclaimed Digby, in a more
raised and eager voice; I tell you the lights are
coming; if you do not escape now, nothing can
ever be done for her.
This last argument had the intended effect:
Everell felt that all hope of extricating
Magawisca
depended on his now eluding discovery; and
with an exclamation of bitter disappointment, he
relinquished the enterprise for the present, and,
descending a few rounds of the ladder, leaped to
the ground, and, with Digby, disappeared before
the guard reached the spot of operations.
Magawisca
saw two of the men go off in pursuit,
while the other remained picking up the
implements
that Everell had dropped, and muttering
something of old Barnaby sleeping as if he slept
his last sleep.
Relieved from the sad conviction of Everell's
desertion and ingratitude, Magawisca seemed for
a moment to float on happiness, and in her
exultation
to forget the rocks and quicksands that
encompassed
her. Another outcry from Sir Philip
recalled
her thoughts, and obeying the first impulse
of humanity, she rang the bell violently.
Barnaby
soon appeared with a lamp and keys, and
learning the durance of Sir Philip, he hastened to
his relief. A key was found to unlock the door,
and on opening it, the knight's terror and distress
were fully explained. Morton had thrown him
on his back, and pinned him to the floor, by
planting
his knee on Sir Philip's breast, and had
interrupted
his cries, and almost suffocated him, by
stuffing his cloak into his mouth. At the sight of
his keeper, the maniac sprang off, and with a sort
of inarticulate chattering and laughing, resumed
his old station in the corner, apparently quite
unconscious
that he had moved from it.
Sir Philip darted out and shut the door, as if
he were closing a tiger's cage; and then, in wrath
that overswelled all limits, he turned upon poor
Barnaby, and, shaking him till his old bones
seemed
to rattle in their thin casement, he poured out
on him curses deep and loud, for leading him into
that `devil's den.' Magawisca interposed, but
instead of calming his wrath, she only drew it on
herself. He swore `he would be revenged on her,
dd Indian that she was, to stand by and not lift
her hand, when she knew he was dying by
torture
.'
Magawisca did not vouchsafe any other
reply to this attack, than a look of calm disdain;
and Barnaby, now recovering from the fright and
amazement into which Sir Philip's violence had
thrown him, held up his lamp, and reconnoitring
the knight's face and person, It is the same, he
said, resolving his honest doubts, the same I let
incircumstances alter casesand men too, I
think; why, I took him for as godly a seeming
man as ever I laid my eyes on; a yea and nay
pilgrim; but such profane swearing exceedeth
Chaddock's men, or Chaddock either, or the
master
they serve.
Prate not, you canting villain; why did not
you come when you heard my cries? or where
was you that you heard them not?
Just taking a little nap in my rocking chair;
and I said to myself, as I set myself down, `now
Barnaby, if you should happen to fall out of your
meditation into sleep, remember to wake at the
ringing of the bell;' and, accordingly, at the very
first touch of it I was on my feet, and coming
hitherward
.
Sir Philip's panic and wrath had now so far
subsided, that he perceived there was an
alarming
discordance between his extempore conduct,
and his elaborate pretensions; and re-assuming
his mask, with an awkward suddenness, he said,
Well, well, friend Barnaby, we will both forgive
and forget. I will say nothing of your sleeping
soundly at your post, when you have such
dangerous
prisoners in ward, that the Governor has
thought it necessary to give you a guard; and
you, good Barnaby, you will say nothing of my
having for a moment lost the command of my
reason
;
though being so sorely bestead, and having
but a poor human nature, I think I should not be
hardly judged by merciful men.
As to forgiving and forgetting, your worship,
replied the good-natured fellow, that I can do
as easily as another man, but not from any dread
of your tale-bearing; for I think the Governor
Vol. II. 13
hath sent the guard here partly in consideration
of my age and feebleness; and I fear not undue
blame. Therefore, not for my own by-ends will I
keep close, but that I hold it not neighbourly to
speak to another's hurt; and I well know it is but
the topmost saints that are always in the exercise
of grace. But I marvel, your worship, that ye
spoke those evil words so glibly: it seemed like
one casting away stilts, and going on his own
natural
feet again.
All the fault of an ungodly youth, worthy
master Tuttle, replied Sir Philip, rolling up his
eyes sanctimoniously, and he who ensnared my
soul, thy miserable prisoner there, is now reaping
the Lord's judgments therefor.
I think it is not profitable, said the simple
man, as he led the way out of the prison, to cast
up judgments at any one; we are allas your
worship has just suddenly and wofully experienced
we are all liable to falls in this slippery world;
and I have always thought it a more prudent and
Christian part, to lend a helping hand to a fallen
brother, than to stand by, and laugh at him, or
flout him.
Sir Philip hurried away; every virtuous
sentiment
fell on his ear like a rebuke. Even in an
involuntary comparison of himself with the
simple
jailer, he felt that genuine goodness, dimmed
and sullied though it may be by ignorance and
fanaticism, like a good dull guinea, rings true at
every trial; while hypocrisy, though it show a
face fair and bright, yet, like a new false coin,
betrays
at every scratch the base metal.
Perhaps no culprit ever turned his back on a
jail with a more thorough conviction that he
deserved
there to be incarcerated, than did Sir
Philip
.
Detection in guilt is said marvellously to
enlighten
men's consciences: there may be a
kindred
virtue in disappointment in guilty projects.
The knight had become impatient of his tedious
masquerade. He was at first diverted with a
new, and, as it seemed to him, a fantastical state
of society; and amused at the success with which
he played his assumed character. He soon
became
passionately enamoured of Hope Leslie,
and pursued her with a determined, unwavering
resolution, that, vacillating as he had always been,
astonished himself. In the eagerness of the chase,
he underrated the obstacles that opposed him,
and above all, the insuperable obstacle, the
manifest
indifference of the young lady; which his
vanity (must we add, his experience) led him to
believe was affectation, whim, or accidentany or
all of these might be successfully opposed and
overcome. He had tried to probe her feelings in
relation to Everell, and though he was puzzled
by the result, and knew not what it meant, he
trusted it did not mean love. But if it did, what
girl of Hope Leslie's spirit, he asked himself,
would remain attached to a drivelling fellow,
who, from complaisance to the wishes of prosing
old men, had preferred to her such a statue of
formality
and puritanism as Esther Downing? and
Everell removed, Sir Philip feared no other
competitor
;
for he counted for nothing those
gentlemen
who might aspire to Miss Leslie's hand, but
whose strict obedience to the canons of
puritanism
left them, as he thought, few of the qualities
that were likely to interest a romantic
imagination
.
For himself, determined not to jeopard his
success by wearing his sanctimonious mask to
Hope, he played the magician with two faces, and
to her he was the gay and gallant chevalier; his
formality, his preciseness, and every badge and
insignia
of the puritan school, were dropped, and he
talked of love and poetry like any carpet knight
of those days, or drawing-room lover of our own.
But this was a dangerous game to play, and must
not be protracted. Some untoward accident
might awaken the guardians of the colony from
their credulous confidence; and to this danger his
wayward page continually exposed him.
As our readers are already acquainted with the
real character of this unhappy victim of Sir Philip's
profligacy, it only remains to give the few untold
circumstances of her brief history. She was the
natural child of an English nobleman. Her
mother was a distinguished French actress, who,
dying soon after her birth, committed the child to
some charitable sisters of the order of St.
Joseph
.
Her father on his death bed, seized with
pangs of remorse, exacted a promise from his
sister, the Lady Lunford, that she would receive
the orphan under her protection. The lady
performed the promise  la lettre, and no more.
She withdrew the unfortunate Rosa from her safe
asylum, but she kept from her, and from all the
world, the secret of their relationship, and made
the dependence and desolateness of the poor
orphan
,
a broad foundation for her own tyranny.
Lady Lunford was a woman of the worlda
waning
;
Rosa, a ripening beauty. Her house was
the resort of men of fashion. Sir Philip paid his
devotions there ostensibly to the noble mistress,
but really to the young creature, whose melting
eyes, naivet, and strong and irrepressible
feelings
,
enchanted him. Probably Lady Lunford
found the presence of the young beauty
inconvenient
.
She certainly never threw any obstacle in
Sir Philip's way; indeed, he afterwards cruelly
boasted to Rosa, that her patroness had
persuaded
him to receive her; but this was long after;
for many months he treated her with the fondest
devotion; and she, poor credulous child, was first
awakened from dreams of love and happiness by
pangs of jealousy.
From her own confessions, Sir Philip learned
how far she had divulged her sorrows to Hope
Leslie; and from that moment, he meditated some
mode of secretly and suddenly ridding himself of
her; and finally, determined on the project which,
as we have seen, was wofully defeated; and he
was compelled to retreat from Magawisca's
prison
,
with the tormenting apprehension that he
might himself fall into the pit he had digged.
13*
Let those who have yet to learn in what
happiness
consists, and its actual independence of
external
circumstances, turn from the gifted and
accomplished
man of the world, to the Indian
prisoner
;
from the baffled tempter, to the victorious
tempted. Magawisca could scarcely have been
made happier if Everell had achieved her
freedom
,
than she was by the certain knowledge of
his interposition for her. The sting of his
supposed
ingratitude had been her sharpest sorrow.
Her affection for Everell Fletcher had the
tenderness
,
the confidence, the sensitiveness of woman's
love; but it had nothing of the selfishness, the
expectation, or the earthliness of that passion.
She had done and suffered much for him, and she
felt that his worth must be the sole requital for
her sufferings. She felt too, that she had received
much from him. He had opened the book of
knowledge to herhad given subjects to her
contemplative
mind, beyond the mere perceptions
of her senses; had in some measure dissipated
the clouds of ignorance that hung over the
forest-child
,
and given her glimpses of the past and the
distant; but above all, he had gratified her strong
national pride, by admitting the natural equality
of all the children of the Great Spirit; and by
allowing
that it was the knowledge of the
Englishman
an
accidental superiority that forced from
the uninstructed Indian the exclamation,
Manittoo
!Manittoo!he
is a God.
CHAPTER VIII.
My heart is wondrous light,
Since this same wayward girl is so reclaimed.
Romeo and Juliet
.
The
next morning opened on Boston with that
boon to all small societies, a new topic of interest
and conversation. The attempt on the prison the
preceding night, was in every one's mouth; and
as the community had been much agitated
concerning
the heresies and trial of Gorton and
his company, they did not hesitate to attribute the
criminal outrage to some of his secret adherents,
who, as the sentence that had passed on the
unfortunate
men, was the next day to take effect, had
made this desperate effort to rescue them. It
was not even surmised by the popular voice,
that the bold attempt had been made on account
of the Indian woman. The magistrates had very
discreetly refrained from disclosing her
connection
with state affairs, as every alarm about the
rising of the Indians, threw the colony, especially
the women and children, into a state of the
greatest
agitation. The imprisonment of
Magawisca
was, therefore, looked upon as a transient
and prudential and domiciliary arrangement, to
prevent the possibility of any concert between
her and the recovered captive, Faith Leslie, who
was known to be pining for her Indian friends.
That the Governor's secret conclusions were
very different from those of the people, was
indicated
by a private order, which he sent to
Barnaby
Tuttle, to remove the Indian maiden from the
upper apartment, to the dungeon beneath the
prison; but by no means to inflict any other
severity
on her, or to stint her of any kindness
consistent
with her safe keeping. Gorton's company
were, on the same day, removed from the prison;
and, as is well known to the readers of the
chronicles
of the times, distributed separately to the
towns surrounding Boston, where,
notwithstanding
they were jealously guarded and watched, they
proved dangerous leaven, and were soon
afterwards
transported to England.
Whatever secret suspicions the Governor
entertained
in relation to Everell Fletcher, his kind
feelings, and the delicate relation in which he
stood to that young man, as the son of his dearest
friend, and the betrothed husband of his niece,
induced him to keep them within his own bosom;
without even intimating them to his partners in
authority, who, he well knew, whatever
infirmities
they, frail men, might have of their own,
were seldom guilty of winking at those of others.
But to return to our heroine, whom we left
convalescing
;
the energies of a youthful and
unimpaired
constitution, and the unwearied care of her
gentle nurse, restored her in the space of two
days, to such a degree of strength, that she was
able to join the family in the parlour at the
evening
meal, to which we cannot give the
convenient
designation of tea, as Asia had not yet
supplied us with this best of all her aromatic
luxuries
.
Hope entered the parlour leaning on Esther's
arm. All rose to welcome her, and to offer their
congratulations, more or less formal, on her
preservation
and recovery. Everell advanced with
the rest, and essayed to speak, but his voice failed
him. Hope with natural frankness gave him her
hand, and all the blood in her heart seemed to
gush into her pale cheeks, but neither did she
speak. In the general movement their reciprocal
emotion passed unobserved, excepting by Esther;
she noted it. After the meal was finished, and
the Governor had returned thanks, in which he
inserted a clause expressive of the general
gratitude
for the mercies that had been vouchsafed
to the maiden near and dear to many present, in
that she had been led safely through perils by
water, by land, and by sickness, Madame
Winthrop
kindly insisted that Hope should occupy her
easy-chair, but Hope declined the honour, and
seating herself on the window-seat, motioned to
her sister to come and sit by her. The poor girl
obeyed, but without any apparent interest, and
without even seeming conscious of the
endearing
tenderness with which Hope stroked back
her hair, and kissed her cheek. What shall we
do with this poor home-sick child? she asked,
appealing to her guardian.
In truth, I know not, he replied. All day,
and all night, they tell me, she goes from window
to window, like an imprisoned bird fluttering
against the bars of its cage; and so wistfully she
looks abroad, as if her heart went forth with the
glance of her eye.
I have done my best, said Mrs. Grafton, now
joining in the conversation, to please her, but
it's all working for nothing, and no thanks. In
the first place, I gave her all her old play-things,
that you saved so carefully, Hope, and shed so
many tears over, and at first they did seem to
pleasure her. She looked them over and over,
and I could see by the changes of her
countenance
as she took up one and another, that some
glimmerings of past times came over her; but as
ill luck would have it, there was among the rest,
in a little basket, a string of bird's eggs, which
Oneco had given her at Bethel. I remembered
it well, and so did she, for as soon as she saw it,
she dropped every thing else, and burst into
tears.
Poor child! said Mr. Fletcher, these early
affections are deeply rooted. Everell, who stood
by his father, turned and walked to the other
extremity
of the apartment; and Hope
involuntarily
passed her hand hastily over her brow; as she
did so, she looked up and saw Esther's eye fixed
on her. Rallying her spirits, I am weak yet,
Esther, she said, and this sudden change from
our still room confuses me. Mrs. Grafton did
not mark this little interlude, and replying to Mr.
Fletcher's last observation, Poor child! do
you call her? I call it sheer foolishness. Her
early affections indeed! you seem to forget
she had other and earlier than for that Indian
boy; but this seems to be the one weed that has
choked all the rest. Hope, my dear, you have
no idea what a non compos mentis she has got
to be. I showed her all my ear-rings, and gave
her her choice of all but the diamonds that are
promised for your wedding gift, dearie, you know,
and do you think, she scarcely looked at them?
while she won't let me touch those horrid blue
glass things she wears, that look so like the
tawnies
,
it makes me all of a nerve to see them. And
then just look for yourself, though I have dressed
her up in that beautiful Lyon's silk of yours, with
the Dresden tucker, she willthis warm weather
tookeep on her Indian mantle in that blankety
fashion.
Well, my dear aunt, why not indulge her for
the present? I suppose she has the feeling of the
natives, who seem to have an almost superstitious
attachment to that oriental costume.
Oriental fiddlestick! you talk like a
simpleton
,
Hope. I suppose you would let her wear
that string of all coloured shells round her neck,
would you not, she asked, drawing aside Faith's
mantle, and showing the savage ornament,
instead
of that beautiful rainbow necklace of mine,
which I have offered to her in place of it?
If you ask me seriously, aunt, I certainly
would, if she prefers it.
Now that is peculiar of you, Hope. Why,
Miss Esther Downing, mine is a string of stones
that go by sevensyellow, topazorange, onyx
red, rubyand so on, and so on. Master
Cradock
wrote the definitions of them all out of a
latin
book for me once; and yet, though it is such
a peculiar beauty, that silly child will not give up
those horrid shells for it. Now, she continued,
turning to Faith, and putting her hand on the
necklace, now that's a good girl, let me take it
off.
Faith understood her action, though not her
words, and she laid her own hand on the
necklace
,
and looked as if obstinately determined it
should not be removed.
Hope perceived there was something attached
to the necklace, and on a closer inspection,
which her position enabled her to make, she saw
it was a crucifix; and dreading lest her sister
should be exposed to a new source of persecution,
she interposed: Let her have her own way at
present, I pray you, aunt: she may have some
reason for preferring those shells that we do not
know; and if she has not, I see no great harm in
her preferring bright shells to bright stones; at
any rate, for the present we had best leave her
to herself, and say nothing at all to her about her
dress or ornaments.
Wellvery well, take your own way, Miss
Hope Leslie.
Hope smiledNay, aunt, she said, I
cannot
be
Miss
Hope Leslie till I get quite well
again.
Oh, dearie, I meant nothing, you know, said
the good lady, whose displeasure never held out
against one of her niece's smiles. If Miss
Esther
Downing, she added, lowering her voice,
had told me to say nothing of dress and
ornaments
,
I should not have been surprised; but it is
an unheard of simpleness for you, Hope. Dress
and ornaments! they are the most likely things
in the world to take the mind off from trouble.
Till I came to this New English colony, where
every things seems, as it were, topsy turvy, I never
saw that woman whose mind could not be
diverted
by dress and ornaments.
You strangely dishonor your memory, mistress
Grafton, or Hope's noble mother, said the elder
Fletcher; methinks I have heard you often say
that Alice Fletcher had no taste for these
vanities
.
No, you never heard me say that, Mr.
Fletcher
.
Vanities!no, never, the longest day I had
to live; for I never called them vanitiesnoI
did say Alice always went as plain as a pike staff,
after you left England; and a great pity it was, I
Vol. II. 14
always thought; for when queen Henrietta came
from France, we had such a world of beautiful
new fashions, it would have cured Alice of moping
if she would have given her mind to it. There
was my lady Penyvre, how different it was with
her after her losses: let's see, her husband, and
her son Edward, heir to the estate; and her
daughter-in-lawthat was not so muchbut
we'll count her; and Ulrica, her own daughter
all died in one week. And for an aggravation,
her coachman, horses, coach and all, went off
London Bridge, and all were drownedkilled
smashed to death; and yet, in less than a week,
my lady gave orders for every suit of mourning
and that is the great use of wearing mourning, as
she said: it takes the mind off from trouble.
Hope felt, and her quick eye saw, that her aunt
was running on sadly at her own expense; and
to produce an effect similar to the painter, when,
by his happy art, he shifts his lights, throwing
defects
into shadow, and bringing out beauties, she
said, You are very little like your friend, lady
Penyvre, dear aunt, for I am certain, if, as you
feared, I had lost my life the other day, all the
mourning in the king's realm would not have
turned your thoughts from trouble.
No, that's truethat's true, dearie, replied
the good lady, snuffling, and wiping away the
tears that had gathered at the bare thought
of the evil that had threatened her. No, Hope,
touch you, touch my life; but then, she added,
lowering her voice for Hope's ear only, I can't
bear to have you give in to this outcry against
dress; we have preaching and prophesying
enough, the Lord knows, without your taking it
up.
Lights were now ordered, and after the bustle,
made by the ladies drawing around the table, and
arranging their work, was over, Governor
Winthrop
said, if your strength is equal to the task,
Miss Leslie, we would gladly hear the particulars
of your marvellous escape, of which Esther has
been able to give us but a slight sketch; though
enough to make us all admire at the wonderful
Providence that brought you safely through.
The elder Fletcher, really apprehensive for
Hope's health, and still more apprehensive that
she might, in her fearless frankness, discredit
herself
with the Governor, by disclosing all the
particulars
of her late experience, which he had
already
heard from her lips, and permitted to pass
uncensured, interposed, and hoped to avert the
evil, by begging that the relation might be
deferred
.
But Hope insisted that she felt perfectly
well, and began by saying, `she doubted not her
kind friends had made every allowance for the
trouble she had occasioned them. She was
conscious
that much evil had proceeded from the rash
promise of secresy she had given.' She forbore
to name Magawisca, on her sister's account, who
was still sitting by her; the Governor, by a
significant
nod, expressed that he comprehended her;
and she went on to say, `that she trusted she had
been forgiven for that, and for all the petulant
and childish conduct of the week that followed it.'
I scarcely recollect any thing of those days, that
then seemed to me interminable, she said, but
that I tried to mask my troubled spirit with a
laughing
face, and in spite of all my efforts I was rather
cross than gay. I believe, Madam Winthrop, I
called forth your censure, and I pray you to
forgive
me for not taking it patiently and thankfully,
as I ought.
Madam Winthrop, all astonishment at Hope's
exemplary humility and deference, graces she had
not appeared to abound in, assured her with
unassumed
kindness, that she had her cordial
forgiveness
;
though, indeed, she was pleased to
say, `Hope's explanation left her little to forgive.'
And you, sir, said Hope, turning to the
Governor
,
you, I trust, will pardon me for selecting
your garden for a secret rendezvous.
Indeed, Hope Leslie, I could pardon a much
heavier transgression in one so young as thee;
and one who seems to have so hopeful a sense
of error, replied the Governor, while the
goodwill
beaming in his benevolent face, shewed how
much more accordant kindness was with his
nature
,
than the austere reproof which he so often
believed the letter of his duty required from him.
Then you allall forgive me; do you not?
Hope asked; and glancing her eye around the
room, it involuntarily rested, for a moment, on
Everell. All but Everell, who did not speak, were
warm in their assurances that they had nothing
to forgive; and the elder Fletcher tenderly
pressed
her hand, secretly rejoicing that her graceful
humility enabled her to start with her story from
vantage ground.
I did not see you, I believe, Esther,
continued
Hope, after we parted at Digby's
cottage
?
Speak a trifle louder, if you please, Miss
Leslie
,
said the Governor. Hope was herself
conscious
that her voice had faltered, at the
recollection
of the definitive scene in Digby's cottage,
and making a new effort, she said in a firmer
and more cheerful tone, you, Esther, were
happily
occupied. I was persecuted by Sir Philip
Gardiner, whose ungentlemanly interference in
my concerns, will, I trust, relieve me from his
society
in future.
Pardon me, Miss Leslie, said the Governor,
interrupting Hope, our friend, Sir Philip, hath
deserved you thanks rather than your censure.
There are, as you well know, duties paramount
to the courtesies of a gentleman, which are, for
the most part, but a vain show: mere dress and
decoration; and he vouchsafed a smile, as he
quoted the words of Mrs. Grafton, Sir Philip
believed he was consulting your happiness, when
he took measures to recover your sister, which
your promise forbade your taking.
Sir Philip strangely mistakes me, replied
14*
Hope, if he thinks any thing could console me
for apparently betraying one who trusted me, to
sorrowful, fearful imprisonment.
There was a pause, during which Mrs.
Winthrop
whispered to Esther, then she knows all
about it?
Yesshe would not rest till she heard all.
Hope proceeded. I believe I am not yet
strong enough to speak on this point. She then
went on to narrate circumstantially all that
took place after she was parted from
Magawisca
,
till she came to Antonio. Cradock,
when she began, had laid aside a little Greek
book, over which he was conning, and had at
every new period of her relation given his chair
a hitch towards her, till he sat directly before
her, on the edge of his chair, his knees
pressed
close together, and his palms resting
upright
on them, his head stooped forward, so as to
be at right angles with his body, and his parting
lips creeping round to his ears, with an expression
of complacent wonder. Thus he sat and looked,
while Hope described her politic acquiescence in
Antonio's error, and repeated her first reply to
him in Italian. At this the old man threw his
head back, and burst into a peal of laughter, that
resembled the neighing of a horse more than any
human sound; and as soon as he could recover
his voice, did not I teach her the tongues? he
asked, with a vehement gesture to the company
did not I teach her the tongues?
Indeed you did, kind master Cradock, said
Hope, laying her hand on his; and many a
weary hour it cost you.
Nevernever onethou wert always a
marvellous
quick witted damsel. He then resumed his
seat and his former attitude, and, closing his eyes,
said in his usual low, deliberate tone, I bless the
Lord that the flower and beauty of my youth
were spent in Padua: a poor blind worm that I
am, I deemed it a loss, but it hath saved her most
precious and sweet life. And here he burst into
a paroxysm of tears and sobbing, almost as
violent
as his laughter had been: his organs seemed
moved by springs which, if touched by an
emotion
,
were quite beyond his control, and only
ceased their operation when their mechanical
force was exhausted.
Hope had little more to relate: she prudently
suppressed the private concerns of Sir Philip's
page, and attributed their accidental meeting to
his having come abroad, as in truth he had, in
quest of his master. When she had finished, the
Governor said, Thou hast indeed been brought
through many dangers, Hope Leslie; delivered
from the hand of thy strong enemy, and thy feet
made like hinds' feet; and I joy to say, that thy
experience of the Lord's mercies seemeth to have
wrought a becoming sobriety in thee. I would
fain pass over that last passage in thy evening's
adventures without remark, but duty bids me say,
thou didst err, lamentably, in permitting, for a
moment, the idol worship of that darkened
papistical
youth.
Worship, sir! said Hope: I did not esteem
it worship; I thought it merely an affectionate
address to one whoand I hope I erred not in
thatmight not have been a great deal better
than myself.
I think she erred not greatly, said Mr.
Fletcher, who at this moment felt too tenderly
for Hope, patiently to hear her rebuked; the
best catholic doctors put this interpretation on the
invocations to saints.
Granted, replied the Governor, but did she
right to deepen and strengthen the superstition
of the Romish sailor?
It does not appear to me, said Mr. Fletcher,
that it was a seasonable moment for meddling
with his superstitions. We do not read that Paul
rebuked the Melitans, even when they said he
was a god. This was but negative authority;
but while the Governor hesitated how he should
answer it, Mr. Fletcher turned to Esther: Miss
Downing, he said, thou art the pattern maiden
of the commonwealth,in Hope's condition,
wouldst thou have acted differently? out of thy
mouth she shall be justified or condemned.
Speak, dear Esther, said Hope; why do
you hesitate? If I were to choose an external
conscience, you should be my rule; though I
think the stern monitor could never be embodied
in so gentle a form. Now tell us, Esther, what
would you have done?
What I should have done, if left to my own
strength, I know not, replied Esther, speaking
reluctantly.
Then, Esther, I will put the question in a form
to spare your humility; I will not ask what you
would have done, but what I ought to have
done?
Esther's strictness was a submission to duty;
and it cost her an effort to say, I would rather,
Hope, thou hadst trusted thyself wholly to that
Providence that had so wonderfully wrought for
thee thus far.
I believe you are quite right, Esther, said
Hope, who was disposed to acquiesce in
whatever
her friend said, and glad to escape from any
further discussion; and, moreover, anxious to
avert Esther's observation from Everell, who,
during
the conversation, had been walking the room,
his arms folded, to and fro, but had narrowly
watched Esther during this appeal; and when
she announced her opinion, had turned
disappointed
away.
Mrs. Grafton now arose with a trifling
apparent
vexation, and, taking Faith by the arm, she
signified her intention to retire to her own
apartment
.
While crossing the room she said, It is
not often I quote scripture, as you all know;
because
,
as I have said before, I hold a text from
scripture
,
or a sample of chintz, to be a deceptive kind
of specimen; but I must say now, that I think
the case of David, in eating the shew bread,
instead
of looking for manna, upholds Hope Leslie
in using the means the Lord chose to place in her
hands.
Having the last word is one of the tokens of
victory
,
and the good lady, content with this,
withdrew
from the field of discussion. Governor
Winthrop retired to his study. Hope followed
him thither, and begged a few moments
audience
;
which was, of course, readily granted.
When the door was closed, and he had seated
himself, and placed a large arm-chair for her, all
the tranquillity which she had just before so well
sustained, forsook her; she sunk, trembling, on
her knees, and was compelled to rest her
forehead
on the Governor's knee: he laid his hand
kindly on her head, what does this mean?
he asked; I like not, and it is not fitting, that
any one should kneel in my house, but for a holy
purpose,rise, Hope Leslie, and explain yourself
rise, my child, he added in a softened tone,
for his heart was touched with her distress;
tyrants
are knelt toand I trust I am none.
No, indeed, you are not, she replied, rising
and clasping her hands with earnest supplication;
and therefore, I hopenay, I believe, you will
grant my petition for our poor Indian friend.
Well, be calmwhat of her?
What of her! Is she not, the generous
creature
,
at this moment in your condemned dungeon?
is she not to be tried to-morrowperhaps
sentenced
to deathand can I, the cause of
bringing
her into this troublecan I look calmly on?
Well, what would you have, young lady?
asked the Governor, in a quiet manner, that
damped our heroine's hopes, though it did not
abate her ardour.
I would have your warrant, sir, she replied
boldly, for her release; her free passage to her
poor old father, if indeed he lives.
You speak unadvisedly, Miss Leslie. I am
no king; and I trust the Lord will never send
one in wrath on his chosen people of the new
world, as he did on those of old. No, in truth, I
am no king. I have but one voice in the
commonwealth
,
and I cannot grant pardons at
pleasure
;
and besides, on what do you found your
plea?
On what? exclaimed Hope. On her
merits
,
and rights.
Methinks, my young friend, you have lost
right suddenly that humble tone, that but now in
the parlour graced you so well. I trusted that
your light afflictions, and short sickness, had
tended
to the edification of your spirit.
I spoke then of myself, and humility became
me; but surely you will permit me to speak
courageously
of the noble Magawisca.
There is some touch of reason in thy speech,
Hope Leslie, replied the Governor, his lips
almost
relaxing to a smile. Sit down, child, and
tell me of these merits and rights, for I would be
possessed of every thing in favour of this unhappy
maiden.
I have not to tell you, sir, said Hope,
struggling
to speak in a dispassionate tone, but only
to
remind
you of what you were once the first to
speak ofthe many obligations of the English to
the family of Mononottoa debt, that has been
but ill paid.
That debt, I think, was cancelled by the
dreadful massacre at Bethel.
If it be so, there is another debt that never has
beenthat scarce can be cancelled.
Yes, I know to what you allude: it was a
noble action for a heathen savage; and I marvel
not that my friend Fletcher should think it a title
to our mercy; or, that young Mr. Everell,
looking
with a youthful eye on this business, should
deem it a claim on our justice. They have both
spoken much and often to me, and it were well,
if Everell Fletcher were content to leave this
matter
with those who have the right to determine it.
Hope perceived the Governor looked very
significantly
,
and she apprehended that he might
think her intercession was instigated by Everell.
I have not seen Everell Fletcher, she said,
till this evening, since we parted at the garden;
and you will do both him and me the justice to
believe, I have not now spoken at his bidding.
I did not think it. I know thou art ever
somewhat
forward to speak the dictates of thy heart,
he continued with a smile; but now let me
caution you both, especially Everell, not to stir
in this matter, any private interference will but
prejudice the Pequod's cause. They have ever
been a hateful race to the English. And as the
old chief and his daughter are accused, and I fear
justly, of kindling the enmity of the tribes against
us, and attempting to stir up a war that would
lay our villages in ruins, it will be difficult to make
a private benefit outweigh such a public crime.
At any rate, the prisoner must be tried for her
life; afterwards, we may consider if it be
possible
,
and suitable, to grant her a pardon. Hope
rose to withdraw: the sanguine hopes that had
sustained her were abated, her limbs trembled,
and her lips quivered, as she turned to say
good-night
.
The Governor took her hand, and said
compassionately,Be not thus disquieted, my
child; cast thy care upon the Lord, He can bring
light out of this darkness.
`And he alone,' she thought, as she slowly
crept to her room. A favourite from her birth,
Hope had been accustomed to the gratification
of her wishes; innocent and moderate they had
been; but uniform indulgence is not a favourable
school, and our heroine had now to learn from
that stern teacher experience, that events and
circumstances cannot be moulded to individual
wishes. She must sit down and passively await
the fate of Magawisca. `She had done all she
could do, and without any effecthad she done
Vol. II 15
all?' While she still meditated on this last clause
of her thoughts, Esther entered the room.
Absorbed
in her own reverie, Hope did not, at first,
particularly observe her friend, and when she did,
she saw that she appeared much disturbed.
Esther
,
after opening and shutting drawers and
cupboards
,
and seeking by these little devices to
conceal
or subdue her agitation, found all unavailing,
and throwing herself into a chair, she gave way to
hysterical sobbings.
This in almost any young lady would have been a
common expression of romantic distress; but in
the disciplined, circumspect Esther, uncontrolled
emotion was as alarming, to compare small
things to great, as if an obedient planet were to
start from its appointed orbit.
Hope hastened to her, and folding her arms
around her tenderly, inquired what could thus
distress her? Esther disengaged herself from her
friend, and turned her face from her.
I cannot bear this, said Hope, I can bear
any thing better than this: are you displeased
with me, Esther?
Yes, I am displeased with youwith myself
with every bodyI am miserable.
What do you mean, Esther? I have done
nothing to offend you; for pity's sake tell me
what you mean? I have never had a feeling or
thought that should offend you.
You have most cruelly, fatally injured me,
Hope Leslie.
Here is some wretched mistake, cried Hope;
for heaven's sake explain, Esther: if I had
injured
you knowingly, I should be of all creatures
most guilty; but I have not. If I have innocently
injured you, speak, my dear friend, I beseech you,
she added, again putting her arm around Esther;
have not you yourself, a thousand times, said
there should be no disguises with friends; no
untold
suspicions; no unexplained mysteries.
Again Esther repressed Hope. I have been
unfairly dealt by, she said. I have been
treated
as a child.
Howwhenwhereby whom?
demanded
Hope impetuously.
Ask me no questions now, Hope. I will
answer
none. I will no longer be played upon.
Oh, Esther, you are cruel, said Hope,
bursting
into tears. You are the one friend that I
have loved gratefully, devotedly, disinterestedly,
and I cannot bear this.
There was a pause of half an hour, during which
Esther sat with her face covered with her
handkerchief
,
and sobbing violently, while Hope
walked
up an down the room; her tender heart
penetrated
to the very core with sorrow, and her
mind perplexed with endless conjectures about
the cause of her friend's emotions.
She sometimes approached near the truth, but
that way she could not bear to look. At last
Esther became quiet, and Hope ventured once
more to approach her, and leaned over her
without
speaking. Esther rose from her chair, knelt
down, and drew Hope down beside her, and in a
low, but perfectly firm voice, supplicated for
grace to resist engrossing passion, and selfish
affections
.
She prayed they might both be assisted
from above, so that their mutual forgiveness, and
mutual love, might be perfected, and issue in a
friendship which should be a foretaste of heaven.
She then rose, and folded her arms around her
friend, saying, I have given way to my sinful
nature
;
but I feel already an earnest of returning
peace. Do not say any thing to me now, Hope
the future will explain all.
There was an authority in her manner, that
Hope could not, and did not, wish to resist. If
you speak to me so, Esther, she said, I would
obey you, even though it were possible obedience
should be more difficult. Now we will go to bed,
and forget all this wearisome evening; but first
kiss me, and tell me you love me as well as ever.
I do, she replied; but her voice faltered;
and governed by the strictest law of truth, she
changed her form of expressionI mean that I
shall again love you as wellI trust better than
everbe content with this, for the present, Hope,
and try me no further.
Once, while they were undressing, Esther said,
but without any emotion in her voice,her face
was averted from Hope,Everell has been
proposing
to me to assist him in a clandestine
attempt
to get Magawisca out of prison.
To get her out! exclaimed Hope, with the
greatest animationto night?
To-night or to-morrow night.
And is there any hope of effecting it?
I thought it not right for me to undertake it,
Esther replied in the same tone, quite calm, but
so deliberate, that Hope detected the effort with
which she spoke, and dared not venture another
question.
They both went to bed, but not to sleep;
mutual
and secret anxieties kept them for a long
time restless, and a strange feeling of
embarrassment
,
as distant as the width of their bed would
allow; but, finally, Hope, as if she could no
longer
bear this estrangement, nestled close to
Esther
,
folded her arms around her, and fell asleep
on her bosom.
Madam Winthrop had very considerately, in
the course of the evening, left Everell and her
niece alone together; and he had availed himself
of this first opportunity of private communication,
to inform her, that after being frustrated in all his
efforts for Magawisca's rescue, he had, at length,
devised a plan which only wanted her
co-operation
to insure it success. Her agency would
certainly
,
he believed, not be detected; and, at any
rate, could not involve her in any disagreeable
consequences.
`Any consequences to herself,' Esther said,
`she would not fear.' Everell assured her, that
he was certain she would not; but he was anxious
15*
she should see he would not expose her to any,
even to attain an object for which he would risk
or sacrifice his own life. He then went on
eagerly
to detail his plan of operations, till Esther
summoned courage to interrupt him. Perhaps
there is not on earth a more difficult duty, than
for a woman to place herself in a disagreeable
light before the man she truly loves. Esther's
affections
were deep, fixed, and unpretending,
capable
of any effort, or any sacrifice, that was not
proscribed by religious loyalty; but no earthly
consideration could have tempted her to waver
from the strictest letter of her religious duty, as
that duty was interpreted by her conscience. It
cost her severe struggles, but after several
intimations
,
which Everell did not understand, she
constrained
herself to say, `that she thought they had
not scripture warrant for interfering between the
prisoner and the magistrates.'
Scripture warrant! exclaimed Everell with
surprise and vexation he could not conceal.
And are you to do no act of mercy, or
compassion
,
or justice, for which you cannot quote a
text from scripture?
Scripture hath abundant texts to authorise
all mercy, compassion, and justice, but we are not
always the allowed judges of their application;
and in the case before us we have an express
rule, to which, if we submit, we cannot err; for
thou well knowest, Everell, we are commanded
in the first of Peter, 2d chapter, to `submit
ourselves
to every ordinance of man, for the Lord's
sake: whether it be to the king, as supreme; or
unto governors, as unto them that are sent by him
for the punishment of evil doers, and for the praise
of them that do well.'
But surely, Esther, there must be warrant, as
you call it, for sometimes resisting legitimate
authority
,
or all our friends in England would not be
at open war with their king. With such a
precedent
,
I should think the sternest conscience would
permit you to obey the generous impulses of
nature
,
rather than to render this slavish obedience
to the letter of the law.
Oh, Everell! do not seek to blind my
judgment
.
Our friends at home are men who do all
things in the fear of the Lord, and are, therefore,
doubtless guided by the light of scripture, and the
inward testimony. But they cannot be a rule for
us, in any measure; and for me, Everell, it would
be to sin presumptuously, to do aught, in any way,
to countervail the authority of those chosen
servants
of the Lord, whose magistracy we are
privileged
to live under.
Everell tried all argument and persuasion to
subdue
her scruples, but in vain; she had some text,
or some unquestioned rule of duty, to oppose to
every reason and entreaty.
To an ardent young man, there is something
unlovely, if not revolting, in the sterner virtues;
and particularly when they oppose those objects
which he may feel to be authorised by the most
generous emotions of his heart. Everell did not
mean to be unjust to Estherhis words were
measured and loyalbut he felt a deep
conviction
that there was a painful discord between
them; that there was, to use the modern German
term, no elective affinity. In the course of their
conversation, he said, you would not, you could
not, thus resist my wishes, if you knew
Magawisca
.
Everell, she replied, those who love you
need not know this maiden, to feel that they
would save her life at the expense of their own,
if they might do it; and then blushing at what
she feared might seem an empty boast, she
added
,
but I do know Magawisca; I have
visited
her in her prison every day since she has been
there.
God bless you for that, Estherbut why did
you not tell me?
Because my uncle only permitted me access
to her, on condition that I kept it a secret from
you.
Methinks that prohibition was as useless as
cruel.
No, Everell; my uncle, doubtless, anticipated
such applications as you have made to-night,
and he was right to guard me from temptation.
`He might securely have trusted you to resist
it,' thought Everell. But he tried to suppress the
unkind feeling, and asked Esther `if she had
any motive in visiting Magawisca thus often,
beyond
the gratification of her compassionate
disposition
?'
Yes, replied Esther, I heard my uncle say,
that if Magawisca could be induced to renounce
her heathenish principles, and promise, instead of
following her father to the forest, to remain here,
and join the catechised Indians, he thought the
magistrates might see it to be their duty to overlook
her past misdemeanors, and grant her Christian
privileges. Esther paused for a moment, but
Everell made no comment, and she proceeded,
in a tone of the deepest humility: I knew I was
a poor instrument, but I hoped a blessing on the
prayer of faith, and the labour of love. I set
before
her, her temporal and her eternal interest
life, and death. I prayed with herI exhorted
herbut, oh! Everell, she is obdurate; she
neither
fears death, nor will believe that eternal
misery
awaits her after death!
To Esther's astonishment, Everell, though he
looked troubled, neither expressed surprise or
disappointment
at the result of her labours, but
immediately
set before her the obvious inference
from it. You see, yourself, he said, by your
own experience, there is but one way of aiding
Magawisca.
It is unkind of you, Everell, she replied,
with a trembling voice, to press me further; that
way, you know, my path is hedged up; and
without saying any thing more, she abruptly left
the room; but she had scarcely passed the
threshold
of the door, when her gentle heart
reproached
her with harshness, and she turned to soften her
final refusal. Everell did not hear her returning
footsteps; he stood with his back to the door;
and Esther heard him make this involuntary
apostrophe. Oh, Hope Leslie! how thy
unfettered
soul would have answered such an appeal!
why has fate cruelly severed us?
Esther escaped hastily, and without his
observation
;
and the scene already described, in the
apartment of the young ladies, ensued.
Everell Fletcher must not be reproached with
being a disloyal knight. The artifices of Sir
Philip Gardiner, the false light in which our
heroine
had been placed by her embarrassments
with Magawiscathe innocent manuvrings of
Madam Winthrop, and finally, the generous
rashness
of Hope Leslie, had led him step by step, to
involve himself in an engagement with Miss
Downing
;
that engagement had just been made
known to her protectors, and ratified by them,
when the denouement of the mysterious
rendezvous
at the garden, explained his fatal mistake.
When he recurred to all that had passed since
his first meeting with Hope Leslie, and
particularly
to their last interview at the garden, when
he had imputed her uncontrollable emotion to her
sensibility in relation to Sir Philip, he had reason to
believe, he was beloved by the only being he had
ever loved. But in what cruel circumstance did
this discovery find him! His troth plighted to one
whose pure and tender heart he had long
possessed
.
There was but one honourable course for him
to pursue, and on that he firmly resolved; to
avoid the presence of Hope Leslieto break the
chain of affection wrought in youth, and rivetted
in manhood, and whose links seemed to him, to
encompass and sustain his very life; in fine, to
forget the pastbut alas! who can convert to
Lethe the sweetest draughts of memory?
Hope's dangerous illness had suspended all his
purposes; he could not disguise his interestand
indeed, its manifestation excited neither surprise
nor remark, for it seemed sufficiently accounted
for by their long and intimate association. While
Hope's life was in peril, even Magawisca was
forgotten; but the moment Hope's convalescence
restored the use of his faculties, they were all
devoted
to obtaining Magawisca's release, and he
had left no means untried, either of open
intercession
,
or clandestine effort; but all as yet was
without effect.
CHAPTER IX.
What trick, what device, what starting hole canst thou
now find out, to hide thee from this open and apparent
shame?
Henry
IVth.
The
day appointed for Magawisca's trial, arose
on Boston one of the brightest and most
beautiful
of summer. There are moments of deep
dejection
and gloom in every one's experience,
when the eye closes against the beauty of light,
when the silence of all those great powers that
surround us, presses on the soul like the
indifference
of a friend, and when their evolving glories
overpower the wearied spirit, as the splendours
of the sun offend the sick eye. In this diseased
state of mind, Everell wandered about Boston,
till the ringing of the bell, the appointed signal,
gave notice that the court was about to open for
the trial of the Indian prisoner. He then turned
his footsteps towards the house where the sittings
of the magistrates were held; and on reaching it,
he found a crowd had already assembled in the
room assigned for the trial.
At one extremity of the apartment was a
platform
of two or three feet elevation, on which sat
the deputies and magistrates, who constituted the
court; and those elders who had, as was
customary
on similar occasions, been invited to be
present as advisory counsel. The New-England
people have always evinced a fondnesss for
asking
advice, which may, perhaps, be explained by
the freedom with which it is rejected. A few
seats were provided for those who might have
claims to be selected from the ordinary
spectators
;
two of these were occupied by the elder
Fletcher, and Sir Philip Gardiner. Everell
remained
amidst the multitude unnoticed and
unnoticing
;
his eye roving about in that vague and
inexpressive manner that indicates the mind holds
no communion with external objects, till he
was roused by a buz of there she comes! and
a call of make room for the prisoner. A lane
was opened, and Magawisca appeared, preceded
and followed by a constable. A man of middle
age walked beside her, whose deep set and
thoughtful eye, pale brow, ascetic complexion, and
spare person, indicated a life of self-denial, and of
physical and mental labour; while an expression
of love, compassion, and benevolence, seemed
like the seal of his Creator affixed to declare him
a minister of mercy to His creatures. Everell was
struck with the aspect and position of the
stranger
,
and inquired of the person standing next to
him, who he was?
The man turned on him a look of astonishment
which expressed, who are you that ask so
strange a question? and replied,That
gentleman
,
Vol. II. 16
sir, is the `apostle of New-England,'
though it much offendeth his modesty to be so
called.
`God be praised!' thought Everell. `Eliot,
(for he was familiar with the title, though not
with the person of that excellent man) my father's
friend! this augurs well for Magawisca.
I marvel, continued his informant, that
Mr. Eliot should, in a manner, lend his
countenance
to this Jezabel. See, with what an air she
comes among her betters, as if she were queen of
us all.
There was certainly nothing of the culprit, or
suitor in the aspect of Magawisca: neither guilt,
nor fearfulness, nor submission. Her eyes were
downcast, but with the modesty of her sexher
erect attitude, her free and lofty tread, and the
perfect composure of her countenance, all
expressed
the courage and dignity of her soul. Her
national
pride was manifest in the care with which,
after rejecting with disdain the Governor's offer
of an English dress, she had attired herself in the
peculiar costume of her people. Her collar
braceletgirdleembroidered moccasins, and
purple mantle with its rich border of bead-work,
had been laid aside in prison, but were now all
resumed and displayed with a feeling resembling
Nelson's, when he emblazoned himself with stars
and orders to appear before his enemies, on the
fatal day of his last battle.
The constable led her to the prisoner's bar.
There was a slight convulsion of her face
perceptible
as she entered it, and when her attendant
signed to her to seat herself, she shook her head
and remained standing. Everell moved by an
irresistible impulse, forced his way through the
crowd, and placed himself beside her. Neither
spokebut the sudden flush of a sun-beam on
the October leaf is not more bright nor beautiful
than the colour that overspread Magawisca's olive
cheek. This speaking suffusion and the tear
that trembled on her eye-lids, but no other sign,
expressed her consciousness of his presence. The
Magistrates looked at Everell, and whispered
together
,
but they appeared to come to the
conclusion
that this expression of his feeling was natural
and harmless, and it was suffered to pass
unreproved
.
The Governor, as chief Magistrate, now rose
and requested Mr. Eliot to supplicate divine
assistance
in the matter they were about to enter
on. The good man accordingly performed the
duty with earnestness and particularity. He first
set forth the wonder-working providence of God
in making their enemies to be at peace with them.
He recounted in the narrative style, then much
used in public devotions, the various occasions on
which they had found their fears of the savages
groundless, and their alarms unfounded. He
touched on divers instances of `kindness and
neighbourlike conduct that had been shown them
by the poor heathen people, who having no law,
were a law unto themselves. He intimated that
the Lord's chosen people had not now, as of old,
been selected to exterminate the heathen, but to
enlarge the bounds of God's heritage, and to
convert
these strangers and aliens, to servants and
children of the most High! He alluded to the
well known and signal mercies received from the
mother of the prisoner, and to that valiant act of
the prisoner herself, whereby she did redeem from
death, and captivity worse than death, the child
the only child, of a sorely bereaved man. He
hinted at the authorities for the merciful requital
of these deeds in the promises of the spies of
Joshua to the heathen woman of Jericho, that
when the Lord had given them the land, they
would deal truly with her, and show kindness to
her, and to her father's house; and in the case of
David's generosity to Mephibosheth, the son of
Jonathan, the son of Saul, wherein he passed by
the evil that Saul had done him, and only
remembered
the favours of Jonathan. He alluded to
the ruined chief, the old father, on whom `the
executed wrath of God had fallen so heavily, that,
as divers testified, the light of reason was quite
put out, and he was left to wander up and down
among the tribes, counselling revenges to which
none listened.' And finally, he dwelt on `the
gospel spirit of forgiveness as eminently
becoming
those who, being set on a hill in the
wilderness
,
were to show their light to the surrounding
nations, and concluded with the prayer that on
this occasion, justice and mercy might be made
publicly to kiss each other.
When he had done, all eyes turned again on
Magawisca, and many who had regarded her with
scorn, or at best, idle curiosity, now looked at her
with softened hearts, and moistened eyes. Not
so Sir Philip, who had his own reasons for being
apprehensive of any advance Magawisca might
make in the favour of her Judges. He
whispered
to a Magistrate near whom he sat, is it
not a singular procedure thus to convert a prayer
into an ex parte statement of the case?
Very singular, replied the good man, with an
ominous shake of the head, but brother Eliot
hath an overweening kindness towards the
barbarians
.
We shall set all right, he added with one
of those sagacious nods, so expressive of soi-disant
infallibility. The Governor now proceeded to
give an outline of the charges against
Magawisca
,
and the testimony that would be adduced to
support them. He suppressed nothing, but gave
a colour to the whole, which plainly indicated his
own favourable dispositions, and Everell felt
lightened
of half his fears. Sir Philip was then
requested
to relate the circumstances that had,
through his instrumentality, led to the taking of
the prisoner, and so much of the conversation
he had heard between her and Miss Leslie, as
might serve to elucidate the testimony of the
Indian
,
who had pretended, by his information, to
16*
reveal a direful conspiracy. Sir Philip rose, and
Magawisca, for the first time, raised her eyes, and
fixed them on him; his met hers, and he quailed
before her glance. As if to test the power of
conscience still further, at this critical moment,
his unhappy page, poor Rosa, pressed through the
crowd, and giving Sir Philip a packet of letters
just arrived from England, she seated herself on
the steps of the platform, near where the knight
stood.
Sir Philip threw the packet on the table
before
the Governor, and stood for a few
moments
silent, with his eyes downcast, in
profound
meditation. The trial was assuming an
unexpected and startling aspect. Sir Philip now
feared he had counted too far on the popular
prejudices
,
which he knew were arrayed against
Magawisca, as one of the diabolical race of the
Pequods. He perceived that all the weight of
Eliot's influence would be thrown into the
prisoner's
scale, and that the Governor was disposed,
not only to an impartial, but to a merciful
investigation
of her case.
Reposing confidently on the extraordinary
favour
that had been manifested towards him by
the magistrates, he had felt certain of being able
to prevent Magawisca's disclosure of their
interview
in the prison, or to avert any evil
consequence
to himself, by giving it the air of a
malignant
contrivance, to be expected from a
vengeful
savage, against one who had been the
providential
instrument of her detection. But he now
felt that this might be a difficult task.
He had at first, as has been seen, enlisted
against Magawisca, not from any malignant
feeling
towards her, but merely to advance his own
private interests. In the progress of the affair,
his fate had, by his own act, become singularly
involved
with hers. Should she be acquitted, he
might be impeached; perhaps exposed and
condemned
by her testimony. Alliances like his
with Rosa, were by the laws of the colony,
punished
by severe penalties. These would be
aggravated
by the discovery of his imposture. At
once perceiving all his danger, he mentally
cursed
the fool-hardiness with which he had rushed,
unnecessarily and unwittingly, to the brink of a
precipice.
He had observed Magawisca's scrutinizing eye
turn quickly from him to Rosa, and he was sure
from her intelligent glances, that she had at once
come to the conclusion, that this seeming page
was the subject of their prison interview. Rosa
herself appeared to his alarmed imagination, to
be sent by heaven as a witness against him. How
was he to escape the dangers that encompassed
him? He had no time to deliberate on the most
prudent course to be pursued. The most obvious
was to inflame the prejudices of Magawisca's
judges, and by anticipation to discredit her
testimony
;
and quick of invention, and unembarrassed
by the instincts of humanity, he proceeded, after
faithfully relating the conversation in the
churchyard
,
between the prisoner and Miss Leslie, to
detail
the following gratuitous particulars.
He said, `that after conducting Miss Leslie to
the Governor's door, he had immediately returned
to his own lodgings, and that induced by the still
raging storm to make his walk as short as possible,
he took a cross-cut through the burial ground;
that on coming near the upper extremity of the
enclosure, he fancied he heard a human voice
mingling with the din of the storm; that he
paused
,
and directly a flash of lightning discovered
Magawisca kneeling on the bare wet earth,
making
those monstrous and violent contortions, which
all who heard him, well knew characterized the
devil-worship of the powwows; he would not
he ought not repeat to christian ears, her
invocations
to the Evil-one to aid her in the execution
of her revenge on the English; nor would he,
more particularly describe her diabolical
writhings
and beatings of her person. His brethren
might easily imagine his emotions at witnessing
them by the sulphureous gleams of lightning, on
which, doubtless, her prayers were sped.'
Sir Philip had gained confidence as he
proceeded
in his testimony, for he perceived by the
fearful and angry glances that were cast on the
prisoner, that his tale was credited by many of his
audience, and he hoped by all.
The notion that the Indians were the children
of the devil, was not confined to the vulgar; and
the belief in a familiar intercourse with evil spirits,
now rejected by all but the most ignorant and
credulous, was then universally received.
All had, therefore, listened in respectful silence
to Sir Philip's extraordinary testimony, and it was
too evident that it had the effect, to set the
current
of feeling and opinion against the prisoner.
Her few friends looked despondent; but for
herself
,
true to the spirit of her race, she manifested
no surprise, nor emotion of any kind.
The audience listened eagerly to the
magistrate
,
who read from his note-book, the
particulars
which had been received from the Indian
informer, and which served to corroborate and
illustrate Sir Philip's testimony. All the evidence
being now before the court, the Governor asked
Magawisca, if she had aught to allege in her
own defence.
Speak humbly maiden, whispered Mr. Eliot,
it will grace thy cause with thy judges.
Say, said Everell, that you are a stranger
to our laws and usages, and demand some one to
speak for you.
Magawisca bowed her head to both advisers,
in token of acknowledgment of their interest,
and then raising her eyes to her judges, she said,
I am your prisoner, and ye may slay me, but
I deny your right to judge me. My people have
never passed under your yokenot one of my
race has ever acknowledged your authority.
This excuse will not suffice thee, answered
one of her judges: thy pride is like the image
of Nebuchadnezar's dreamit standeth on feet
of claythy race have been swift witnesses to
that sure word of prophecy. `Fear thou not, O
Jacob, my servant, for I am with thee, and I will
make a full end of the people whither I have
driven
thee'thy people trulywhere are they?
My people! where are they? she replied,
raising her eyes to heaven, and speaking in a
voice that sounded like deep-toned music, after
the harsh tones addressed to her,my people
are gone to the isles of the sweet south-west; to
those shores that the bark of an enemy can never
touch: think ye I fear to follow them?
There was a momentary silence throughout
the assembly; all seemed, for an instant, to feel
that no human power could touch the spirit of
the captive. Sir Philip whispered to the
magistrate
who last spoke,Is it not awful
presumption
for this woman thus publicly to glory in her
heathen notions?
The knight's prompting had the intended
effect
.
Has this Pequod woman, demanded the
magistrate, never been instructed in the
principles
of truth, that she dares thus to hold forth her
heathenisms before us? Dost thou not know,
woman, he continued, holding up a Bible, that
this book contains the only revelation of a future
worldthe only rule for the present life?
Certainlyrequire the oath of him,
whispered
Everell to Magawisca.
Magawisca bowed her assent to the Governor.
Sir Philip would not probably have been so
prompt in his false testimony, if he had
anticipated
being put on his oath; for he was far enough
from having one of those religious consciences
that regard truth as so sacred that no ceremonies
can add to its authority. But now, his word
being
questioned, it became necessary for him to
recede from it, or to maintain it in the usual
legal form; and, without hesitating, he
advanced
to the table, raised his hand, and went
through the customary form of the oath. The
collectedness and perfect equanimity of
Magawisca
,
to this moment, had seemed to approach
to indifference to her fate; but the persevering
falsehood of Sir Philip, and the implicit faith in
which it was apparently received, now roused her
spirit, and stimulated that principle of retaliation,
deeply planted in the nature of every human
being
,
and rendered a virtue by savage education.
She took a crucifix from her bosomEverell
whispered, I pray thee hide that, Magawisca, it
will ruin thy cause. Magawisca shook her
head, and held up the crucifix.
Put down that idolatrous sign, said the
Governor
.
She hath, doubtless, fallen under popish
enchantments
,
whispered one of the deputies; the
Vol. II. 17
French priests have spread their nets throughout
the western forests.
Magawisca, without heeding the Governor's
command, or observing the stares of astonishment
that her seeming hardihood drew upon her,
addressed
herself to Sir Philip: This crucifix, she
said, thou didst drop in my prison. If, as thou
saidst, it is a charmed figure, that hath power to
keep thee in the straight path of truth, then press
it to thy lips now, as thou didst then, and take back
the false words thou hast spoken against me.
What doth she mean? asked the Governor,
turning to Sir Philip.
I know not, replied the knight, his
reddening
face and embarrassed utterance indicating he
knew that which he dared not confessI know
not; but I should marvel if this heathen savage
were permitted, with impunity, to insult me in
your open court. I call upon the honourable
magistrates and deputies, he continued, with a
more assured air, to impose silence on this
woman
,
lest her uttered malignities should, in the
minds of the good people here assembled, bring
scandal upon one whose humble claims to
fellowship
with you, you have yourselves sanctioned.
The court were for a moment silent: every eye
was turned towards Magawisca, in the hope that
she would be suffered to make an explanation;
and the motions of curiosity coinciding with the
dictates of justice, in the bosoms of the sage
judges themselves, were very like to counteract
the favour any of them might have felt for Sir
Philip. Everell rose to appeal to the court to
permit Magawisca to invalidate, as far as she was
able, the testimony against her, but Mr. Eliot laid
his hand on his arm, and withheld him. Stay,
my young friend, he whispered, I may speak
more acceptably. Then, addressing the court,
he `prayed the prisoner might be allowed liberty
to speak freely, alleging that it was for the
wisdom
of her judges to determine what weight was
to be attached to her testimony;' and glancing
his eye at Sir Philip, he added, the upright need
not fear the light of truth.
Sir Philip again remonstrated; he asked `why
the prisoner should be permitted further to offend
the consciences of the godly? Surely,' he said,
`none of her judges would enforce her demand;
surely, having just sworn before them in the
prescribed
form, they would not require him to repeat
his oath on that symbol of popish faith, that had
been just styled an idolatrous sign.'
This, I think, brother Eliot, is not what thou
wouldst ask? said Governor Winthrop.
Nay, God forbid that I should bring such
scandal upon our land. It is true, I have known
many misguided sons of the Romish church who
would swear freely on the holy word, what they
dared not verify on the crucifix; which
abundantly
showeth that superstition is with such,
stronger
than faith. But we, I think, have no warrant
for using such a testneither do we need it.
The prisoner hath asserted that this symbol
belongeth
to Sir Philip Gardiner, and that he did
use it to fortify his word; if so, the credit of his
present testimony would be mainly altered; and
it seemeth to me but just, that the prisoner should
not only be allowed, but required, to state in full
that to which she hath but alluded.
A whispered consultation of the magistrates
followed this proposition, during which Sir Philip
seemed virtually to have changed places with the
prisoner, and appeared as agitated as if he were
on the verge of condemnation: his brow was
knit, his lips compressed, and his eye, whose
movement seemed beyond his control, flashed
from the bench of magistrates to Magawisca,
and then fixed on Rosa, as if he would fain have
put annihilation in its glance. This unhappy
girl still sat where she had first seated herself;
she had taken off her hat, laid it on her lap, and
rested her face upon it.
There was a vehement remonstrance, from
some of the members of the court, against
permitting
the prisoner to criminate one who had
shown himself well and zealously affected towards
them. And it was urged, with some plausibility,
that the hints she had received of the advantage to
be gained by disqualifying Sir Philip, would tempt
her to contrive some crafty tale that might do
him a wrong, which they could not repair. The
Governor answered this argument by suggesting
that they, being forewarned, were forearmed, and
might certainly rely on their own sagacity to
detect
any imposture. Of course, no individual
was forward to deny, for himself, such an
allegation
,
and the Governor proceeded to request
Magawisca
to state the circumstances to which she
alluded as having transpired in the prison.
Magawisca
now, for the first time, appeared to
hesitate
,
to deliberate, and to feel embarrassed.
Why dost thou falter, woman? demanded
one of her judges; no time shall be allowed
now to contrive a false testimonyproceed
speak quickly.
Fear not to speak, Magawisca, whispered
Everell.
I do fear to speak, she replied aloud; but
it is such fear as he hath, who, seeing the prey
in the eagle's talons, is loath to hurl his
arrow
,
lest, perchance, it should wound the
innocent
victim.
Speak not in parables, Magawisca, said
Governor
Winthrop, but let us have thy meaning
plainly.
Then, replied Magawisca, let me first
crave of thy mercy, that that poor youth, (
pointing
to Rosa,) withdraw from this presence.
All eyes were now directed to Rosa, who,
herself
,
conscious that she had become the object of
attention, raised her head, threw back the rich
feminine
curls that drooped over her face, and
looked
wildly around her. On every side her eye
encountered
glances of curiosity and suspicion;
her colour deepened, her lips quivered, and, like
a bewildered, terrified child, that instinctively flies
to its mother's side, she sprang up the steps,
grasped Sir Philip's cloak, as if she would have
hidden herself in its folds, and sunk down at his
feet. Sir Philip's passions had risen to an
uncontrollable
pitch; Off boy, he cried, spurning her
with his foot. A murmur of shame! cruelty!
ran through the house. The unhappy girl rose to
her feet, pressed both her hands on her forehead,
stared vacantly about, as if her reason were
annihilated
,
then darting forward, she penetrated
through the crowd, and disappeared.
There were few persons present so dull as not to
have solved Magawisca's
parable
, at the instant the
clue was given by Rosa's involuntary movements.
Still, all they had discovered was, that the page
was a disguised girl; and a hope darted on Sir
Philip, in the midst of his overwhelming
confusion
,
that if he could gain time, he might escape
the dangers that menaced him. He rose, and,
with an effrontery that, with some, passed for the
innocence he would fain have counterfeited, said,
'that circumstances had just transpired in that
honourable presence, which, no doubt, seemed
mysterious; that he could not then explain them
without uselessly exposing the unhappy; for the
same reson, namely, to avoid unnecessary
suffering
,
he begged that no interrogatories might, at
the present time, be put to the prisoner, in
relation
to the hints she had thrown out; that if the
Governor would vouchsafe him a private
interview
,
he would, on the sure word of a Christian
man, clear up whatever suspicions had been
excited
by the dark intimations of the prisoner, and
the very singular conduct of his page.'
The Governor replied, with a severe gravity,
ominous to the knight, `that the circumstances
he had alluded to certainly required explanation;
if that should not prove satisfactory, they would
demand a public investigation. In the mean
time, he should suspend the trial of the prisoner,
who, though the decision of her case might not
wholly depend on the establishment of Sir Philip's
testimony, was yet, at present, materially affected
by it.'
`He expressed a deep regret at the interruption
that had occurred, as it must lead,' he said, `to
the suspension of the justice to be manifested
either
in the acquittal or condemnation of the
prisoner
.
Some of the magistrates being called
away from town on the next morning, he found
himself compelled to adjourn the sitting of the
court till one month from the present date.'
Then, said Magawisca, for the first time
speaking, with a tone of impatience, then, I pray
you, send me to death now. Any thing is better
than wearing through another moon in my
prison-house
,
thinking, she added, and cast down her
eye-lids, heavy with tears, thinking of that old
manmy father. I pray thee, she continued,
bending low her head, I pray thee now to set
my spirit free. Wait not for his testimony
she pointed to Sir Philipas well may ye
expect
the green herb to spring up in your trodden
streets, as the breath of truth to come from his
false lips. Do you wait for him to prove that
I am your enemy? Take my own word, I am
your enemy; the sun-beam and the shadow
cannot
mingle. The white man comeththe Indian
vanisheth. Can we grasp in friendship the hand
raised to strike us? Nayand it matters not
whether we fall by the tempest that lays the
forest
low, or are cut down alone, by the stroke of
the axe. I would have thanked you for life
and liberty; for Mononotto's sake I would have
thanked you; but if ye send me back to that
dungeon
the
grave of the living, feeling, thinking
soul, where the sun never shineth, where the stars
never rise nor set, where the free breath of
heaven
never enters, where all is darkness without
and withinshe pressed her hand on her breast
ye will even now condemn me to death, but
death more slow and terrible than your most
suffering
captive ever endured from Indian fires and
knives. She pausedpassed unresisted without
the little railing that encompassed her, mounted
the steps of the platform, and advancing to the
feet of the Governor, threw back her mantle, and
knelt before him. Her mutilated person,
unveiled
by this action, appealed to the senses of the
spectators. Everell involuntarily closed his eyes,
and uttered a cry of agony, lost indeed in the
murmurs of the crowd. She spoke, and all again
were as hushed as death. Thou didst promise,
she said, addressing herself to Governor
Winthrop
,
to my dying mother, thou didst promise,
kindness to her children. In her name, I
demand
of thee death or liberty.
Everell sprang forward, and clasping his hands
exclaimed, In the name of God, liberty!
The feeling was contagious, and every voice,
save her judges, shouted liberty!liberty! grant
the prisoner liberty!
The Governor rose, waved his hand to
command
silence, and would have spoken, but his
voice failed him; his heart was touched with the
general emotion, and he was fain to turn away to
hide tears more becoming to the man, than the
magistrate.
The same gentleman who, throughout the
trial, had been most forward to speak, now rose;
a man of metal to resist any fire. Are ye all fools,
and mad! he cried; ye that are gathered here
together
,
that like the men of old, ye shout `great is
Diana of the Ephesians!' For whom would you stop
the course of justice? for one who is charged
before
you, with having visited every tribe on the
shores and in the forests, to quicken the savages
to diabolical revenge!for one who flouts the
faith once delivered to the saints, to your very
faces!for one who hath entered into an open
league and confederacy with Satan against you!
for one who, as ye have testimony within
yourselves
,
in that her looks and words do so prevail over
your judgments, is presently aided and abetted by
the arch enemy of mankind!I call upon you, my
brethren, he added, turning to his associates,
and most especially on you, Governor Winthrop,
to put a sudden end to this confusion by the
formal
adjournment of our court.
The Governor bowed his assent. Rise,
Magawisca
,
he said, in a voice of gentle
authority
,
I may not grant thy prayer; but what I can
do in remembrance of my solemn promise to thy
dying mother, without leaving undone higher
duty, I will do.
And what mortal can do, I will do, said
Everell, whispering the words into Magawisca's
ear as she rose. The cloud of despondency that
had settled over her fine face, for an instant
vanished
,
and she said aloud,Everell Fletcher,
my dungeon will not be, as I said, quite dark, for
thither I bear the memory of thy kindness.
Some of the magistrates seemed to regard this
slight interchange of expressions between the
prisoner and her champion as indecorous: the
constables were ordered immediately to perform
their duty, by re-conducting their prisoner to jail;
and Magawisca was led out, leaving in the breasts
of a great majority of the audience, a strange
contrariety of opinion and feelings. Their
reason
,
guided by the best lights they possessed,
deciding
against herthe voice of nature crying
out for her.
Before the parties separated, the Governor
arranged
a private interview with Sir Philip
Gardiner
,
to take place at his own house
immediate-after
dinner.
CHAPTER X.
Ye're like to the timmer o' yon rotten wood,
Ye're like to the bark o' yon rotten tree,
Ye'll slip frae me like a knotless thread,
And ye'll crack your credit wi' mae nor me.
Burns
.
At
the period of our history, twelve o'clock was
the hour appointed for dinner: we believe in the
mother countrycertainly in the colony then, as
now, every where in the interior of our states,
this natural division of time was maintained.
Our magistrates did not then claim any
exemption
from the strict rules of simplicity and
frugality
that were imposed on the humble citizens,
and Governor Winthrop's meridian meal, though
it might have been somewhat superior in other
luxuries, had no more of the luxury of time
bestowed
on it, than that of the honest artisans and
tradesmen about him.
In order to explain what follows, it is necessary
to state to our readers, that adjoining the parlour
of Governor Winthrop's mansion, was that sine
qua non of all thrifty housekeepers, an ample
pantry
.
In the door of this pantry, was a glazed
panel, over the parlour side of which, hung a
green curtain. The glass, as glasses will, had
been broken, and not yet repaired; and let
house-wives
take the admonition if they like, on this
slight accident depended life and death.
The pantry beside the door already described,
had another which communicated with the
kitchen
;
through this, Jennet, (who in housewife skill
resembled the neat-handed Phillis of poetic
fame, though, in other respects, prosaic enough)
had entered to perform within the sanctum
certain
confidential services for Madam Winthrop.
It now drew near the hour of two, the time
appointed
for the interview of the Governor with
Sir Philip; the dinner was over, the table
removed
,
and all orderly and quiet in the parlour,
when Jennet, in her retreat, heard Miss Leslie
and Mr. Everell Fletcher enter, and though the
weather was warm, close the door after them. A
slight hint is sufficient for the wary and wise, and
Jennet, on hearing the door shut, forbore to make
any noise, which should apprise the parties of her
proximity.
The young people, as if fearful of being
overheard
without, withdrew to the furthest extremity
from the entry door, and came into the corner
adjoining the pantry. They spoke, though in low
tones, yet in the most earnest and animated
manner
;
and Jennet, tempted beyond what she was
able to bear, drew nigh to the door with a cat's
tread, and applied her ear to the aperture, where
the sounds were only slightly obstructed by the
silk curtain.
Vol. II. 18
While speakers and listener stood in this
interesting
relation to each other, Sir Philip
Gardiner
was approaching the mansion, his bad mind
filled with projects, hopes, and fears. He had,
after much painful study, framed the following
story, which he hoped to impose on the credulity
of the Governor, and through him, of the public.
His sole care was to avoid present investigation
and detection; like all who navigate winding
channels
,
he regarded only the difficulties directly
before
him.
He meant that, in the first place, by way of a
coup de grace, the Governor should understand
he had intentionally acquiesced in the discovery
of Rosa's disguise. He would then, as honest
Varney did, confess there had been some
love-passages
between the girl and himself, in the days
of his folly. He would state, that subsequent
to his conversion, he had placed her in a godly
school in England, and that to his utter confusion,
he had discovered after he had sailed from
London
,
that she had, in the disguise she still wore,
secreted herself on board the ship. He had,
perhaps
,
felt too much indulgence for the girl's
youth, and unconquerable affection for him; but
he should hope that was not an unpardonable sin.
He had been restrained from divulging her real
character on ship-board, from his reluctance to
expose her youth to result, or further temptation.
On his arrival, he war conscious it was a manifest
duty, to have delivered her over to the public
authorities
,
but pitypity still had ruled him. He
scrupledperhaps that was a temptation of the
enemy who knew well to assail the weakest
points; he scrupled to give over to public shame
one, of whose transgressions he had been the
cause. Besides, she had been bred in France a
papist; and he had hopedtrusting, perhaps, too
much in his own strengththat he might convert
her from the error of her ways; snatch the brand
from the burning; he had indeed felt a fatherly
tenderness for her, and weakly indulging that
sentiment
,
he had still, when he found her
obstinately
persisting in her errors, devised a plan to
shelter
her from public punishment; and in
pursuance
of it, he had taken advantage of the
opportunity
afforded him by his visit to Thomas
Morton, to propose to Magawisca, that in case
she should obtain her liberty from the clemency
of her judges, she should undertake to convey
Rosa to a convent in Montreal, of the order to
which she had been in her childhood attached.
He meant to plead guilty, as he thought he
could well afford to do, if he was exculpated on
the other points, to all the sin of acquiescence in
Rosa's devotion to an unholy and proscribed
religion
;
and to the crucifix Magawisca had
produced
,
and which he feared would prove a
confirmation
strong, to any jealousies the Governor
might still harbour against him, he meant to
answer
,
that he had taken it from Rosa to explain
to Magawisca that she was of the Romish
religion
.
With this plausible tale, not the best that could
have been devised, perhaps, by one accustomed
to all the sinuosities of the human mind and
human
affairs, but the best that Sir Philip could
frame in his present perplexity, he bent his steps
towards the Governor's, a little anticipating the
appointed hour, in the hope of obtaining a glimpse
of Miss Leslie, whom he had not seen since their
last interview at the island; and who was still
the bright cynosure by which, through all the
dangers
that beset him, he trusted to guide himself
to a joyous destiny.
Never was he more unwelcome to her sight,
than when he opened the parlour door, and
interrupted
the deeply interesting conversation in
which we left her engaged. She coldly bowed
without speaking, and left him, without making
any apology, in the midst of his flattering
compliments
on the recovery of her health.
Sir Philip and Everell were much on the terms
of two unfriendly dogs, who are, by some
coercion
,
kept from doing battle, but who never meet
without low growls and sullen looks, that intimate
their deadly enmity. Everell paced the room
twice or thrice, then snatched up his hat, left the
house, and sauntered up the street.
No sooner had he disappeared, than Jennet
emerged from her seclusion, her hands uplifted,
and her eyes upturnedOh, Sir Philip! Sir
Philip! she said, as soon as she could get her
voice, a delay never long with Jennettruly
is the heart deceitfuland the lips too. Oh!
who would have thought it?such a daring,
presumptuous
,
and secret sin, too! Where is the
Governor? he must know it. But first, Sir
Philip
,
I will tell youthat will doas you and the
Governor are one in counsel.
`Heaven grant we may be so,' thought Sir
Philip
,
and he closed the door, and turned to Jennet,
eager to hear her communication; for her
earnestness
,
and still more the source whence the
intelligence emanated, excited his curiosity.
Jennet drew very close to him, and
communicated
her secret in a whisper.
At first, the listener's face did not indicate any
particular emotion, but merely that courteous
attention
that a sagacious man would naturally
lend to intelligence which the relator deemed of
vital importance. Suddenly a light seemed to
flash across him; he started away from Jennet,
stood still for a moment, with a look of intense
thought, then turning to his informer, he said,
Mrs. Jennet, I think we had best, for to-day,
confine within our own bosoms the knowledge of
this secret. As you say, Mr. Everell's is a
presumptuous
sin; but it will not be punished unless
it proceeds to the overt act.
Overt act! what kind of act is that?
inquired
Jennet.
Sir Philip explained, and Jennet soon
comprehended
the difference, in its consequences to the
offender, between a meditated, and an executed
crime. Jennet hesitated for a few moments; she
had a sort of attachment to the family she had
long served, much like that of an old cat for its
accustomed haunts, but towards Everell she had
a feeling of unqualified hostility. From his
boyhood
,
he had been rebellious against her petty
domiciliary tyranny, and had never manifested
the slighest deference for her canting pretensions.
Still she was loath in any way to be accessory to
an act that would involve the family, with which
she was herself identified, in any disgrace or
distress
.
Sir Philip divined the cause of her
hesitation
,
and, impatient for her decision, he essayed
to resolve her doubts: Of course, Mrs. Jennet,
he said, you are aware that any penalty Mr.
Everell Fletcher would incur, will not be of a
nature to touch life or limb.
Aythat's what I wanted to know; and that
being the case, it appears to me plain duty to let
him bake as he has brewed. Faithful are the
wounds of a friend, Sir Philip; and this may
prove a timely rebuke to his youth, and to this
quicksilver, fear-nought, Hope Leslie. But you
will take care to have your hand come in in time,
for if there should be any miss in the matter, it
would prove a heavy weight to our consciences.
Oh certainly, certainly, said Sir Philip, with
undisguised exultation, I shall, you know,
command
the springs, and can touch them at
pleasure
.
Now, Mrs. Jennet, will you favour me with
pen and ink; and do me still another favour
and he took a guinea from his purse` expend
this trifle in some book for your private
edification
;
I hear much of a famous one just brought
from England, entitled, `Food for saints, and Fire
for sinners.'
Many thanks, Sir Philip, replied Jennet,
graciously
accepting the gift; such savory treatises
are as much wanted among us just now, as rain
upon the parched earth: it's but a sickly and a
moral time with us. You put me in mind, Sir
Philip, she continued, while she was collecting
the writing materials, you put me in mind of
Mr. Everell's oversight; or, rather, I may say, of
his making me a mark in that unhandsome way
that I can never forget. When he came from
England, there was not, save myself, one of the
familyno, nor an old woman or child, in
Springfield
but what he had some keepsake for; not
that I care for the value of the thingas I told
Digby, at his wedding, when he saluted every
woman
in the room but me. But, then, one does
not like to be slighted.
Sir Philip, by this time, was fortunately
bending
over his paper, and Jennet did not perceive
his smile at her jumble of selfish, and feminine
resentments; and observing that he had at once
become quite abstracted from her, she withdrew,
half satisfied herself that she had acted
conscientiously
in her conspiracy against her young
master
,
and quite sure that she should appear a
pattern
of wisdom and duty.
Sir Philip, mentally thanking heaven that he
had not yet encountered Governor Winthrop,
addressed
a hasty note to him, saying that he had
come to his house, true to his appointment, and
impatient for the explanation, which, he might
say without presumption, he was sure would
remove
the displeasure under which he (Sir Philip)
was at this moment suffering; but that, in
consequence
of a sudden and severe indisposition, the
effect of the distressful agitation of his feelings, he
found himself obliged to return to his lodgings,
and defer their interview till the next day; till
then, he humbly hoped the Governor would
suspend
his judgment. He then directed the note,
and left it on the table, and passed the threshold
of the Winthrop mansion, as he believed, and
hoped, for the last time.
CHAPTER XI.
This murderous shaft that's shot,
Hath not yet lighted; and our safest way
Is to avoid the aim. Therefere to horse,
And let us not be dainty of leave-taking.
Macbeth
.
The
Greeks and Romans had their lucky and
unlucky
days; and whatever name we give to the
alternations
of life, we believe that the experence of
every family, and individual, will attest the
clustering
of joys or woes at marked periods. The
day of Magawisca's trial was eventful, and long
remembered in the annals of the Fletcher family.
Indeed, every one in any way associated with
them, seems to have participated in the influences
of their ruling star. Each member of Governor
Winthrop's household appeared to be moving
in a world of his own, and to be utterly absorbed
in his own projects and hopes.
Miss Downing was for a long time closeted with
her uncle and aunt; then a great bustle ensued,
and emissaries went to and fro, from Madam
Winthrop's apartment; Madam Winthrop
herself
forgot her usual stateliness and dignified
composure
,
and hurried from one apartment to
another
with quick footsteps and a disturbed
countenance
.
The Governor was heard pacing up and
down his study, in earnest conversation with the
elder Fletcher. Everell had gone out, leaving
directions
with a servant to say to his father, or any
one who should inquire for him, that he should
not return till the next day. Hope Leslie resisted
all her aunt's efforts to interest her in a string of
pearls, which she intended for a wedding gift for
Esther; but, Mrs. Grafton said, wreathing them
into Hope's hair, her heart misgave her, they
looked
so much prettier peeping out from among Hope's
wavy locks, than they would on Esther's sleek
hair. The agitation of Hope's spirits was
manifest
,
but (we grieve to unveil her infirmities) that,
in her, excited no more attention than a change
of weather in an April day. She read one
moment
worked
the nextand the next, was
devoting
herself with earnest affection to the
amusement
of her pining sister; then she would
suddenly
break off from her, and take a few turns in the
garden: in short, confusion had suddenly
intruded
within the dominion of order, and usurped
the government of all his subjects.
In the evening the surface of affairs, at least,
bore a more tranquil aspect. The family all
assembled
in the parlour as usual, excepting Miss
Leslie and Cradock, who had retired to the study,
to look over a translation from the Italian, which
Hope just recollected her tutor had never revised.
Faith Leslie sat on a cushion beside the door,
in a state of vacancy and listlessness, into which
she seemed to have hopelessly sunk, after the
first violent emotions that succeeded her return.
The ladies were plying their needles at the table:
Miss Downing, pale as a statue, moved her hand
mechanically, and Mrs. Grafton had just
remarked
,
that she had seen her put her needle twelve
times in the same place, when fortunately for her,
any further notice of her abstraction was averted
by a rap at the outer door, and a servant admitted
a stranger who, without heeding a request that he
would remain in the portico till the Governor
should be summoned, advanced to the parlour
door. He sent a keen scrutinizing glance around
the room, and on every individual in it, and then
fixing his eye on the Governor, he bent his head
low, with an expression of deferential
supplication
.
His appearance was that of extreme
wretchedness
,
and, as all who saw him thought, indicated
a shipwrecked sailor. His face and figure were
youthful, and his eye bright, but his skin was of
a sickly ashen hue. He had on his head a sailor's
woollen cap, drawn down to his eyes in part, as it
seemed, to defend a wound he had received on
his temple, and about which, and to the rim of
his cap that covered it, there adhered clotted
blood. His dress was an over-coat of coarse
frieze cloth, much torn and weather beaten, and
strapped around his waist with a leathern girdle;
his throat was covered with a cotton
handkerchief
,
knotted in sailor-fashion, and his legs and
feet were bare.
To the Governor's inquiry of who are you,
friend? and what do you want? he replied,
in an unknown language, and with a low rapid
enunciation. At the first sound of his voice,
Faith Leslie sprang to her feet, but instantly sunk
back again on the cushion, and apparently
returned
to her former abstraction.
Governor Winthrop eyed the stranger
narrowly
.
I think, brother Fletcher, he said, this
man has the Italian lineaments; perhaps, Master
Cradock may understand his language, as he is
well versed in all the dialects of the kingdoms of
Italy. Robin, he added, bid Master Cradock
come hither.
Master Cradock has gone out, sir, an please
you, some minutes since, with Miss Leslie.
Gone outwith Miss Lesliewhither?
I do not know, sir. The young lady bid me
say she had gone to a friend's, and should not
return
till late. She begged Mrs. Jennet might be
in waiting for her.
This is somewhat unseasonable, said the
Governor, looking at his watch; it is now
almost
nine; but I believe, he added, in kind
consideration of Mr. Fletcher's feelings, we
may trust your wild-wood bird; her flights are
somewhat devious, but her instincts are safer than
I once thought them.
Trust heryes, indeed, exclaimed Mrs.
Grafton, catching the word that implied distrust.
But I wonder, she added, going to the
window
,
and looking anxiously abroad, that she
should venture out this dark night, with nobody
but that blind beetle of a Cradock to attend her;
however, I suppose she is safe, if she but keep on
the main land, as I think you say the wolves come
no more over the neck.
They certainly will not come any where
within
the bounds that our lamb is likely to stray,
said Mr. Fletcher.
The Governor's care again recurred to the
mendicant stranger, who now signified, by
intelligible
gestures, that he both wanted food and
sleep. Every apartment in the Governor's house
was occupied; but it was a rule with him, that
admitted of no exception, that his shelter should
never be denied to the wanderer, nor his
charities
to the poor; and, accordingly, after some
consultation with the executive department of his
domestic government, a flock-bed was ordered
to be spread on the kitchen floor, and a meal
provided
,
on which, we observe en passant, the
stranger did extraordinary execution.
When the result of these charitable
deliberations
was signified to him, he expressed his
gratitude
by the most animated gestures, and,
seeming
involuntarily to recur to the natural organ of
communication, he uttered, in his low and rapid
manner, several sentences, which appeared, from
the direction of his eye, and his repeated bows,
to be addressed to his benefactor.
Vol. II. 19
Enough, enough, said the Governor,
interpreting
his words by a wave of his hand, which
signified to the mendicant that he was to follow
Robin to the kitchen. There we must leave him
to achieve, in due time, an object involving most
momentous consequences, while we follow on the
trail of our heroine, whose excursive habits have
so often compelled us to deviate from the straight
line of narration.
Hope had retired to the study with Master
Cradock, where she delighted her tutor with her
seemingly profound attention to his criticisms on
her Italian author. You see, Miss Hope Leslie,
he said, intent on illustrating a difficult passage,
the point here lies in this, that Orlando
hesitates
whether to go to the rescue of Beatrice.
Ah, stop there, Master Cradock, you speak
an admonition to me. You have yourself told
me, the Romans believed that words spoken by
those ignorant of their affairs, but applicable to
them, were good or bad omens.
True, trueyou do honour your tutor
beyond
his deserts, in treasuring these little
classical
notices, that it hath been my rare privilege to
plant in your mind. But how were my words an
admonition to you, Miss Hope Leslie?
By reminding me of a duty to a friend who
sadly needs my helpand thine too, my good
tutor
.
My help!your friend! It shall be as freely
granted as Jonathan's was to David, or Orpheus'
to Eurydice.
The task to be done, said Hope, while she
could not forbear laughing at Cradock's comparing
himself to the master of music, is not very
unlike
that of Orpheus. But we have no time to
loseput on your cloak, Master Cradock, while I
tell Robin what to say if we are inquired for.
My cloak! you forget we are in the summer
solstice; and the evening is somewhat over
sultry
,
so that even now, with my common
habiliments
,
I am in a drip.
So much the more need to guard against the
evening air, said Hope, who had her own secret
and urgent reasons for insisting on the cloak;
put on the cloak, Master Cradock, and move
quick, and softly, for I would pass out without
notice
from the family.
A Moslem would as soon have thought of
resisting
fate, as Cradock of opposing a wish of his
young mistress, which only involved his own
comfort
,
so he cloaked himself, while Hope flew to the
kitchen, gave her orders, and threw on her hat
and shawl, which she had taken care to have at
hand. They then passed through the hall, and
beyond the court, without attracting
observation
.
Cradock was so absorbed in the extraordinary
happiness of being selected as the confidential
aid and companion of his favourite, that he would
have followed her to the world's end, without
question, if she had not herself turned the
direction
of his thoughts.
It is like yourself, she said, my good tutor,
to obey the call of humanity, without inquiring in
whose behalf it comes; and I think you will not
be the less prompt to follow the dictates of your
own heart, and my wishes, when I tell you that
I am leading you to poor Magawisca's prison.
Ah! the Indian woman, concerning whom I
have heard much colloquy. I would, in truth, be
fain to see her, and speak to her such comfortable
words and counsels, as may, with a blessing,
touch the heathen's heart. You have, doubtless,
Miss Hope, provided yourself with a passport from
the Governor, he added, for almost the first time
in his life looking at the business part of a
transaction
.
Master Cradock, I did not esteem that
essential
.
Oh! but it is; and if you will abide here one
moment, I will hasten back and procure it, he
said, in his simplicity never suspecting that Miss
Leslie's omission was any thing other than an
oversight.
Nay, nay, Master Cradock, she replied,
laying
her hand on his arm, it is too late now: my
heart is set on this visit to the unhappy prisoner
and if you were to go back, Madam Winthrop,
or my aunt, or somebody else, might deem the
hour unseasonable. Leave it all to meI will
manage with Barnaby Tuttle; and when we
return
,
be assured, I will take all the blame, if there
is any, on myself.
No, that you shall notit shall fall on my
grey head, where there should be wisdom, and not
on your youth, which lacketh discretion`and
lacketh nought else,' he murmured to himself;
and, without any further hesitation, he acquiesced
in proceeding onward.
They arrived, without hindrance, at the jail,
and knocked a long time for admittance at
that part of the tenement occupied by our friend
Barnaby, without his appearing. Hope became
impatient, and bidding Cradock follow her, she
passed through the passage, and opened the door
of Barnaby's apartment.
He was engaged in what he still called his `
family
exercise;' though, by the death of his wife,
and the marriage of his only child, he was the sole
remnant of that corporation. On seeing our
heroine
,
he gave her a familiar nod of recognition,
and by an equally intelligible sign, he
demonstrated
his desire that she should seat herself, and
join in his devotions, which he was just closing,
by singing a psalm, versified by himself; for
honest
Barnaby, after his own humble fashion, was
a disciple of the tuneful Nine. Hope assented,
and, with the best grace she could command,
accompanied
him through twelve stanzas of long,
and very irregular metre, which he, obligingly,
gave out, line by line. When this, on Hope's
part, extempore worship was finished, Welcome
19*
here, and many thanks, Miss Leslie, said
Barnaby
,
it's a good sign to find a prepared heart and
ready voice. Service to you, Master Cradock,
you are not gifted in psalmody, I see.
Not in the outward manifestation, but the
inward feeling is, I trust, vouchsafed to me. My
heart hath taken part in the fag end of your
feast.
A pretty similitude truly, Master Cradock,
and a token for good is it when the appetite is
always sharp set for such a feast. But come,
Miss Leslie, raking open the embers, draw up
your chair, and warm your dear little feet. She
looks pale yet after her sickness, ha, Master
Cradock
?
You should not have come forth in the
evening airnot but what I am right glad to see
youthe sight of you always brings to mind your
kindness to the dead and the living. You have
not been here, I think, since the night of Ruthy's
weddingthat puts me in mind that I got a
letter
from Ruthy to-day. I'll read it to you, he
continued, taking off his spectacles, and giving
them a preparatory wipeRuthy is quite handy
with her pentakes after the Tuttles in that:
you know, Miss Leslie, my great-grandfather
wrote a book.
Yes, said Hope, interrupting him, and rising
and I trust his great-grandson will live to write
another.
Sit down, Miss Leslieit may bethose of
as humble a degree as Barnaby Tuttle have
written
books; and writing runs in families, like the
king's eviland Barnaby laughed at his own
witty illustrationbut sit down, Miss Leslie, I
must read Ruthy's letter to you.
Not now, good Barnaby; let me take it home
with me; it is getting late, and I have a favour
to ask of you.
A favour to ask of me!ask any thing, my
pretty mistress, that's in the power of Barnaby
Tuttle to grant. Ah! Mr. Cradock, there's
nobody
knows what I owe herwhat she did for my
wife when she laid on her death-bed, and all for
nothing but our thanks and prayers.
Oh, you forget that your wife had once been
a servant to my dear mother.
Yes, yes, but only in the common way, and
there's few that would have thought of it again.
It's not my way to speak with flattering lips, but
truly, Miss Hope Leslie, you seem to be one of
those that does not to others that it may be
done to you again.
Oh, my good friend Barnaby, you speak this
praise in the wrong time, for I have even now
come, as I told you, to beg a favour on the score
of old friendship.
It shall be doneit shall be done, said
Barnaby
,
snapping his fingers, his most energetic
gesture; be it what it may, it shall be done.
Oh, it is not so very much, but only, Barnaby,
I wish it quickly done, that we may return. I
want you to conduct Master Cradock and myself
to your Indian prisoner, and leave us in her cell
for a short time.
Is that all! certainlycertainly, and anxious
to make up for the smallness of the service by the
avidity of his compliance, Barnaby prepared his
lamp with unwonted activity. Now we are
ready, he said, just show me your permit, and
we'll go without delay.
Hope had flattered herself, that her old friend
in his eagerness to serve her, would dispense with
the ceremony of a passport from the Governor.
Agitated by this new and alarming obstacle, she
commanded her voice with difficulty to reply in
her usual tone. How could I think it
necessary
to bring a permit to you, who know me so
well, Barnaby?
Not
necessary!
that was an odd thought for
such an all-witted damsel as thou art, Miss Hope
Leslie. Not
necessary,
indeed! why I could not
let in the king if he were to come from his throne
the king truly, he is but as his subjects now; but
if the first parliament man were to come here, I
could not let him in without a permit from the
Governor.
Hope walked up and down the room, biting
her lips with vexation and disappointment. Every
moment's delay hazarded the final success of her
project. Poor Cradock now interposed with one
of his awkward movements which, though made
with the best will in the world, was sure to
overturn
the burden he essayed to bear. Be
comforted
,
Miss Hope Leslie, he said, I am not so
nimble as I was in years past, but it is scarce
fifteen
minutes walk to the Governor's, and I will
hasten thither, and get the needful paper.
Ay, ay, so do, said Barnaby, that will set
all right.
No, cried Hope; no, Master Cradock, you
shall not go. If Barnaby cannot render me this
little kindness, there is an end of it. I will give
it up. I shall never ask another favour of you,
Barnaby, and she sat down, anxious and
disappointed
,
and burst into tears. Honest
Barnaby
could not stand this. To see one so much his
superiorone who had been an angel of mercy
to his habitationone who had a right to
command
him in all permitted service, thrown into
such deep distress by his refusal of a favour which,
after all, there could be no harm in granting, he
could not endure.
Well, well, he said, after hesitating and
jingling his keys for a moment, dry up your tears,
my young lady; a `wayward child,' they say, `will
have its way;' and they say too, `men's hearts
melt in women's tears,' and I believe it; come,
come along, you shall have your way.
Hope now passed to the extreme of joy and
gratitude. Bless youbless you, Barnaby, she
said, I was sure you would not be cross to me.
Lord help us, child, no, there's no denying
you; but I do wish you was as thoughtful as Miss
Esther Downing; she never came without a
permit
a
good thing is considerationyou have
made me to do that which I trust not to do again
step aside from known dutybut we're erring
creatures.
Hope had the grace to pause one instant, and
to meditate a retreat before she had involved
others in sinning against their consciences; but
she had the end to be attained so much at heart,
and the faults to be committed by her agents
were of so light a dye, that the scale of her
inclinations
soon preponderated, and she proceeded.
When they came to the door of the dungeon,
Hark to her, said Barnaby; is not that a
voice for psalmody? Magawisca was singing in
her own language, in the most thrilling and
plaintive
tones. Hope thought there could not be
darkness or imprisonment to such a spirit. It is
in truth, Barnaby, she replied, a voice fit to
sing the praises of God. Barnaby now turned
the bolts and opened the door, and as the feeble
ray of his lamp fell athwart the dungeon's gloom,
Hope perceived Magawisca sitting on her flock
bed, with a blanket wrapped around her. On
hearing their voices she had ceased her singing,
but she gave no other sign of her consciousness of
the presence of her visitors.
Miss Leslie took the lamp from Barnaby. How
much time will you allow us? she asked.
Ten minutes.
Ten minutes! oh, more than that I pray you,
good Barnaby.
Not one second more, replied Barnaby,
resolute
not to concede another inch of ground.
There may be question of this matteryou
must consider, my dear young lady.
I willalways in future, I will, Barnaby; now
you may leave me.
Yes, yes, I understand, said Barnaby, giving
a knowing nod. You mind the scripture rule
about the right and the left handsome creature
comfort to be given to the prisoner. I marvel that
ye bring Master Cradock with you, but in truth,
he hath no more eye nor ear than the wall.
Marvel not at any thing, Barnaby, but leave
me, and let my ten minutes be as long as the last
ten minutes before dinner.
Hope, quick as she was in invention and action,
felt that she had a very brief space to effect her
purposed arrangements, and while she hesitated
as to the best mode of beginning, Cradock, who
nothing doubted he had been brought hither as a
ghostly teacher, asked whether he should
commence
with prayer or exhortation?
Neitherneither, Master Cradockdo just
as I bid you; you will not hesitate to help a
fellow
creature out of deep, unmerited distress?
this was uttered in a tone of half inquiry and
half-assertion
,
that enforced by Hope's earnest
imploring
manner, quickened Cradock's slow
apprehension
.
She perceived the light was dawning
on his mind, and she turned from him to
Magawisca
:
Magawisca, she said, stooping over
her, rouse yourselftrust meI have come to
release you. She made no reply, nor
movement
:
Oh! there is not a moment to lose.
Magawisca, listen to mespeak to me.
Thou didst once deceive and betray me,
Hope Leslie, she replied, without raising her
head.
Hope concisely explained the secret
machinations
of Sir Philip, by which she had been made
the unconscious and innocent instrument of
betraying
her. Then, Hope Leslie, she
exclaimed
,
rising from her abject seat, and throwing
off her blanket, thy soul is unstained, and
Everell
Fletcher's truth will not be linked to
false-hood
.
Hope would have explained that her destiny
and Everell's were not to be interwoven, but she
had neither time nor heart for it. You are too
generous, Magawisca, she said, in a tremulous
tone, to think of any one but yourself, nowwe
have not a breath to losetake this ribbon, and
she untied her sash; bind your hair tight with it,
so that you can draw Master Cradock's wig over
your headyou must exchange dresses with him.
Nay, Hope Leslie, I cannot leave another in
my net.
You must not hesitate, Magawiscayou will
be freedhe runs no risk, will suffer no harm
Everell awaits youspeed, I pray you. She
turned to Cradock, now, my good tutor, she
said, in her most persuasive tones, lend me your
aid, quicklyMagawisca must have the loan of
your wig, hat, boots, and cloak, and you must sit
down there on her bed, and let me wrap you in
her blanket.
Cradock retreated to the wall, planted himself
against it, shut his eyes, and covered his ears with
his hands, that temptation might, at every
entrance
,
be quite shut out. Oh! I scruple,
I scruple, he articulated in a voice of the
deepest
distress.
Scruple not, dear Master Cradock, replied
Hope, pulling down one of his hands, and
holding
it between both hers, no harm can, no harm
shall befall you.
Think not, sweet Miss Hope, it's for the
perishing body I am thoughtful; for thy sake I
would bare my neck to the slayer; to thy least
wish I would give the remnant of my days; but
I scruple if it be lawful for a Christian man to
lend this aid to an idolater.
Oh! is that all? we have no time to answer
such scruples now, but to-morrow, master
Cradock
,
I will show you that you greatly err; and
as she said this, she proceeded, without any
further
ceremony, to divest the old man of his wig,
which she very carefully adjusted on Magawisca's
head. Both parties were passive in her hands,
Magawisca not seeming to relish much better
than Cradock, the false character she was
assuming
.
Vol. II. 20
Such was Cradock's habitual deference to
his young mistress, that it was morally impossible
for him to make any physical resistance to her
movements: but neither his conscience, nor his
apprehensions for her, would permit him to be
silent
when he felt a conviction that she was
doing
,
and he was suffering, an act that was a plain
transgression of a holy law.
Stay thy hand, he said, in a beseeching
voice, and let not thy feet move so swiftly to
destruction
.
Just raise your foot, while I draw off this
boot, Master Cradock.
He mechanically obeyed, but at the same time
continued his admonition: Was not
Jehoshaphat
reproved of Micaiah the prophet, for going
down to the help of Ahab?
Now the other foot, Master Cradockthere,
that will do. Draw them on, Magawisca, right
over your moccasinsquick, I beseech you.
Was not the good king Josiah reproved in the
matter of Pharaoh-nechoh?
Oh, Magawisca! how shall I ever make your
slender shoulders and straight back look any
thing like Master Cradock's broad, round
shoulders
?
One glance of Barnaby's dim old eyes will
detect you. Ah! this will doI will bind the
pillow on with the sheet. While she was
uttering
the device, she accomplished it. She then
threw Magawisca's mantle over her expanded
shoulders, and Cradock's cloak over all; and,
finally, the wig was surmounted by the old man's
steeple-crowned hat. Now, she said, almost
screaming with joy at the transformation so
suddenly
effected, now, Magawisca, all depends on
yourself: if you will but contrive to screen your
face, and shuffle a little in your gait, all will go
well.
The hope of libertyof deliverance from her
galling imprisonmentof escape beyond the
power
and dominion of her enemies, had now taken
full possession of Magawisca; and the thought
that she should owe her release to Everell and to
Hope, who in her imagination was identified with
him, filled her with emotions of joy, resembling
those a saint may feel, when she sees in vision the
ministering angels sent to set her free from her
earthly prison: I will do all thou shalt
command
me, Hope Leslie; thou art indeed a spirit of
light, and love, and beauty.
True, true, true, cried Cradock, losing, in
the instincts of his affection, the opposition he
had so valorously maintained, and his feelings
flowing back into their accustomed channel,
Thou woman in man's attire, it is given to thee to
utter truth, even as of old, lying oracles were wont
to speak words of prophecy.
Hope had not, as may be imagined, stood still
to listen to this long sentence, uttered in her
tutor's
deliberate, entrecoup manner, but in the
meanwhile she had, with an almost supernatural
celerity of movement, arranged every thing to
present the same aspect as when Barnaby first
opened the door of the dungeon. She drew
Cradock
to the bed, seated him there, and wrapped
the blanket about him as it had enveloped
Magawisca
.
Oh! I hear Barnaby, she exclaimed;
dear Master Cradock, sit a little straighter
therethat will doturn a little more side ways,
you will not look so broadtherethat's
better
.
Miss Hope Leslie, ye have perverted the
simple-minded
.
Say not another word, Master Cradock; pray
do not breathe so like a truimpet; ah, I see it is my
fault. She readjusted the blanket, which she
had drawn so close over the unresisting creature's
face as almost to suffocate him. Now,
Magawisca
,
sit down on this stoolyour back to the
door, close to Master Cradock, as if you were
talking
with him. All was now arranged to her
mind, and she spent the remaining half instant in
whispering consolations to Cradock: Do not let
your heart fail you, my good kind tutorin one
hour you shall be relieved. Cradock would have
again explained that he was regardless of any
personal risk, but she interrupted him: Nay,
you need not speak; I know that is not your
present
care, but do not be troubled; we are
commanded
to do good to allthe rain falleth on the
just and the unjustand if we are to help our
enemy's ox out of the pit, much more our enemy.
This best of all thy kind services shall be
requited
.
I will be a child to thy old agehush
there's Barnaby.
She moved a few steps from the parties, and
when the jailer opened the door, she appeared to
be awaiting him: Just in season, good Master
Tuttle; my tutor has nothing more to say, and I
am as impatient to go, as you are to have me
gone.
It is only for your own sake that I am
impatient
,
Miss Hope; let us make all haste out.
He took up the lamp which he had left in the
cell, trimmed it, and raised the wick, that it might
better serve to guide them through the dark
passage
.
Hope was alarmed by the sudden increase
of lightlend me the lamp, Barnaby, she
said, to look for my glovewhere can I have
dropped it? It must be somewhere about here.
I shall find it in a minute, Master Cradock, you
had best go on while I am looking.
Magawisca obeyed the hint, while Hope in her
pretended search, so skilfully managed the light,
that not a ray of it touched Magawisca's face.
She had passed BarnabyHope thought the
worst danger escaped. Ah, here it is, she said,
and by way of precaution, she added, in the most
careless tone she could assume, I will carry the
lamp for you, Barnaby.
No, no, thank you, Miss Leslie, I always like
to carry the light myself; and besides, I must
20*
take a good look at you both before I lock the
door. It is a rule I always observe in such
cases, lest I should be left to `brood the eggs the
fox has sucked.' It is a prudent rule I assure you,
always to be sure you take out the same you let in.
Here, Master Cradock, turn round, if you please,
to the light, just for form's sake.
Magawisca had advanced several steps into the
passage, and Hope's first impulse was to scream
to her to run, but a second, and happier thought
prevailed, and taking her shawl, which was
hanging
negligently over her arm, she contrived in
throwing it over her head, to sweep it across
Barnaby's
lamp, in such a way as to extinguish the
light beyond the possibility of recovery, as
Barnaby
proved, by vainly trying to blow it again into
a flame.
Do not put yourself to any further trouble
about it, Barnaby, it was all my fault; but it
matters
not, you know the wayjust give me your
arm, and Master Cradock can take hold of my
shawl, and we shall grope through this passage
without any difficulty.
Barnaby arranged himself as she suggested, and
then hoping her sudden action had broken the
chain of his thoughts, and determined he should
not have time to resume it, she said,When you
write to Ruth, Barnaby, be sure you commend me
kindly to her; and tell her, that I have done the
baby linen I promised her, and that I hope little
Barnaby will prove as good a man as his
grandfather
.
Oh, thank ye, Miss Hope, I trust, by the
blessing
of the Lord, much better; but they do say,
added the old man, with a natural ancestral
complacency
,
they do say he favours me; he's got
the true Tuttle chin, the little dog!
You cannot tell yet whether he is gifted in
psalmody, Barnaby?
La, Miss Hope, you must mean to joke. Why
little Barnaby is not five weeks old till next
Wednesday
morning, half past three o'clock. But
I'm as sure he will take to psalmody as if I knew;
there never was a Tuttle that did not.
Our heroine thus happily succeeded in beguiling
the way to the top of the staircase, where a
passage
diverged to the outer door, and there with
many thanks, and assurances of future gratitude,
she bade Barnaby good night; and anticipating any
observation he might make of Cradock's silence,
she said, my tutor seems to have fallen into one
of his reveries; but never mind, another time he
will remember to greet and thank you.
Barnaby was turning away from the door, when
he recollected that the sudden extinction of the
candle had prevented his intended professional
inspection. Miss Hope Leslie, he cried, be
so good as to stay one moment, while I get a
light; the night is so murky that I cannot see,
even here, the lineaments of Master Cradock's
complexion.
Pshaw, Barnaby, for mercy's sake do not
detain
us now for such an idle ceremony; you see the
lineaments
of that form, I think; we must have
been witches indeed, to have transformed
Magawisc's
slender person into that enormous bulk;
but one sense is as good as anotherspeak,
Master
Cradock, she added, relying on Magawisca's
discretion. Oh, he is in one of his silent fits,
and a stroke of lightning would scarcely bring a
sound from him, so good night, Barnaby, she
concluded, gently putting him back and shutting
the door.
`It is marvellous,' thought Barnaby, as he
reluctantly
acquiesced in relinquishing the letter of
his duty, `how this young creature spins me round,
at her will, like a top. I think she keeps the key
to all hearts.'
With this natural reflection he retired to rest,
without taking the trouble to return to the
dungeon
,
which he would have done, if he had really
felt one apprehension of the fraud that had been
there perpetrated.
At the instant the prison door was closed,
Magawisca divested herself of her hideous
disguise
,
and proceeded on with Hope, to the place
where Everell was awaiting them, with the
necessary
means to transport her beyond the danger of
pursuit. But while our heroine is hastening
onward
,
with a bounding step and exulting heart,
we must acquaint our readers with the cruel
conspiracy
that was maturing against her.
CHAPTER XII.
Sisters! weave the web of death:
Sisters! cease; the work is done.
The Fatal Sisters
.
The
conversation overheard by the faithless
Jennet, and communicated with all its particulars
to Sir Philip Gardiner, was, as must have been
already conjectured by our readers, the
contrivance
for Magawisca's liberation. It appeared
by her statement, that Hope and Magawisca
unattended
,
would, at a late hour of the evening,
pass through an uninhabited and unfrequented
part of the town near the water-side, and that
Everell, with assistants, would be in waiting for
them at a certain landing-place. Before they
reached there, Sir Philip knew there were many
points where they might be intercepted, without
the possibility of Everell's coming to their rescue.
Sir Philip was entangled in the meshes of his
own weaving; extrication was possiblenay, he
believed probable; but there was a fearful chance
against him. He had now to baffle well-founded
suspicionsto disprove factsto double his
guard over his assumed and tiresome character
and after all, human art could not secure him
from accidents, which would bring in their train
immediate disgrace and defeat. His passion for
Miss Leslie had been stimulated by the
obstacles
which opposed it. His hopes were certainly
abated by her indifference; but self-love, and its
minister vanity, are inexhaustible in their
resources
;
and Sir Philip trusted for better success in
future to his own powers, and to feminine
weakness
;
for he, like other profligates, believed that
there was no woman, however pure and lofty
her seeming, but she was commanded
By such poor passion as the maid that milks,
And does the meanest chares;
yet this process of winning the prize was slow,
and the result, alas! uncertain.
Jennet's information suggested a master-stroke
by which he could at once achieve his object; a
single coup de main by which he could carry the
citadel he had so long and painfully besieged. If an
evil spirit had been abroad on a corrupting mission,
he could not have selected a subject more eager to
grasp temptation than Sir Philip; nor a fitter
agent than Jennet, nor have contrived a more
infernal
plot against an innocent and aidless
lady, than that which we must now disclose.
Chaddock (whose crew had occasioned such
danger and alarm to Miss Leslie) was stillriding in
the bay with his vessel. Sir Philip had
formerly
some acquaintance with this man. He knew
him to be a desperate fellowthat he had once
been in confederacy with the bucaniers of
Tortuga
the
self-styled brothers of the coast, and
he believed that he might be persuaded to enter
upon any new and lawless enterprise.
Accordingly, from Governor Winthrop's he
repaired
to Chaddock's vessel, and presented such
motives to him, and offered such rewards, as
induced
the wretch to enter heartily into his
designs
.
Fortunately for their purposes, the vessel
was ready for sea, and they decided to commence
their voyage that very night. All Miss Leslie's
paternal connexions were on the royal sideher
fortune was still in their hands, and subject to
their control. If the lady's reluctance to
accept
his hand was not subdued before the end of
the voyage, (a chance scarcely worth
consideration
)
Sir Philip said, she must then submit to
stern necessity, which even a woman's will could
not oppose. After their arrival in England, he
meant to abandon himself to the disposal of
fortune
;
but he promised Chaddock, that he, with
certain other cavaliers, whom he asserted had
already meditated such an enterprise, would, with
the remnant of their fortunes, embark with him,
and enrol themselves among the adventurers of
Tortuga.
It may be remembered by our readers, that early
in our history, some glimmerings of a plot of this
nature appear, from a letter of Sir Philip's, even
then to have dawned on his mind; but other
purposes had intervened and put it off till now,
when it was ripened by sudden and fit
opportunity
.
The detail of operations being all settled by
these worthy confederates, Sir Philip, at
nightfall
,
went once more to the town, secretly
withdrew
his baggage from his lodgings, and bidding
Rosa, who, in sorrow and despair, mechanically
obeyed, to follow, he returned to the vessel,
humming, as he took his last look at the scene
where he had played so unworthy a part,
Kind Boston, adieu! part we must, though 'tis pity,
But I'm made for mankindall the world is my city.
Sir Philip, in his arrangements with Chaddock,
excused himself from being one of the party who
were to effect the abduction of Miss Leslie.
Perhaps the external habits of a gentleman, and
it may be, some little remnant of human kindness,
(for we would not believe that man can become
quite a fiend,) rendered him reluctant to take a
personal part in the cruel outrage he had planned
and prepared. Chaddock himself commanded
the enterprise, and was to be accompanied by
four of the most daring of his crew.
The night was moonless, and not quite clear.
It is becoming dark, extremely dark, Captain,
Sir Philip said, in giving his last instructions,
but it is impossible you should make a mistake.
Miss Leslie's companion, as I told you, may be
disguisedshe may wear a man's or woman's
apparel, but you have an infallible guide in her
height: she is at least a half head taller than Miss
Leslie. It may be well, when you get to the
wharf, to divide your party, agreeing on the
signal
of a whistle. But I rely on your skill and
discretion
.
You may rely on it, replied the hardy
desperado
.
He who has boarded Spanish
Galleons
,
stormed castles, pillaged cities, violated
churches, and broken open monasteries, may be
entrusted with the capture of a single
defenceless
girl.
Sir Philip recoiled from trusting his prey in the
clutches of this tiger; but there was no
alternative
.
Have a care, Chaddock, he said, that
she is treated with all due and possible
gentleness
.
Ay, ay, Sir Philipkill, but not wounda
smile of derision accompanied his words.
You have pledged me the honour of a
gentheman
,
said Sir Philip, in an alarmed tone.
Aythe only bond of free souls.
Remember
,
Sir Philip, he added, for he perceived the
suspicion the knight would fain have hidden in his
inmost soul, remember our motto, `Trusted, we
are truesuspected, we betray.' I have pledged
my honour, better than parchment and sealif
you confide in it.
Oh, I doentirelyimplicitlyI have not
the shadow of a doubt, my dear fellow.
Chaddock turned away, laughing
contemptuously
at the ineffectual hypocrisy of Sir Philip,
Vol. II 21
and ordered his men, who were to be left in charge
of the vessel, to have every thing in readiness to
sail at the moment of his return. And whither
bound, Captain? demanded one of his sailors.
To hell, was his ominous reply. This
answer
,
seemingly accidental, was long
remembered
and repeated, as a proof that the unhappy
wretch was constrained, thus involuntarily, to
pronounce
his approaching doom.
Once more, before he left the vessel, Sir
Philip
addressed him: Be in no haste to return,
he said; the lady was not to leave Governor
Winthrop's before half-past eightshe may meet
with unforeseen detentionsyou will reach the
dock a few minutes before nine. Take your
stations
as I have directed, and fortune cannot
thwart us, if you are patientwait till ten
eleven
twelve,
or one, if need be. Again, I
entreat
there may be no unnecessary haste; I shall
have no apprehensionsI repose on your
fidelity
.
Dn him, muttered Chaddock, as he
turnaway
,
he reposes on my fidelity!while he has
my vessel in pledge.
Sir Philip remained standing by the side of the
vessel, listening to the quick strokes of the oars,
till the sounds died away in the distance, then he
spoke aloud and exultingly, shine out my good
star, and guide this prize to me.
Oh! rather, exclaimed Rosa, who stood
unobserved
beside him, rather, merciful heaven,
let thy lightnings blast her, or thy waves swallow
her. Oh, God! she continued, sinking on her
knees, and clasping her hands, shield the
innocent
save
her from the hand of the destroyer.
Sir Philip recoiled, it seemed to him there was
something prophetic in the piercing tones of the
unhappy girl, and, for a moment, he felt as if her
prayer must penetrate to heaven, but soon
collecting
courage, hush that mockery, Rosa, he
said, your words are scorpions to me.
Rosa remained for a few moments on her
knees, but without again giving voice to her
feelings
,
then rising, and sobbing as she spoke, I
thought, she said, no prayer of mine would
ever go upward again. I have tried to pray, and
the words fell back like stones upon my heart;
but now I pray for the innocent, and they part
from me winged for heaven. She folded her
arms, looked upwards, and continued to speak as
if it were the involuntary utterance of her
thoughts: How wildly the stars shoot their
beams through the parting clouds! I have
sometimes
thought that good spirits come down on
those bright rays to do their messages of love.
They may even now be on their way to guard a
pure and helpless sisterGod speed them!
Sir Philip's superstitious fears were awakened:
What do you mean, Rosa? he exclaimed;
what, are you talking of stars! I see nothing
but this cursed hazy atmosphere, that hangs like
a pall over the water. Stars indeed! are you
mad, Rosa?
Rosa replied, with a touching simplicity, as if
the inquiry were made in good faith, Yes
betimes
I think I am mad. Thoughts rush so fast,
so wildly through my poor headand then, again,
all is vacancy. Yes, she continued, as if
meditating
her case, I think my brain is touched;
but thisthis, Sir Philip, is not madness. Do
you not know that all the good have their
ministering
spirits? Why, I remember reading in the
`Legends of the Saints,' which our good Abbess
gave me, of a chain, invisible to mortal senses,
that encompassed all the faithful, from the bright
spirits that wait around the throne of heaven, to
the lowliest that walk upon the earth. It is of
such exquisite temper that nought but sin can
harm it; but if that but touch it, it falls apart like
rust-eaten metal.
Away with these fantastic legends, inventions
of hypocritical priests and tiresome old women.
You must curb these foolish vagaries of your
imagination
,
Rosa. I have present and urgent work
for you; do but this good service for me, and I
will love you again, and make you as happy as
you were in your
brightest
days.
You make me
happy,
Sir Philip! Alas! alas!
there is no happiness without innocence; if that
be once lost, like the guilty Egyptian's pearl, you
told me of, melted in the bowl of pleasure,
happiness
cannot be restored.
As you please, girlif you will not be happy,
you may play the penitent Magdalen the rest of
your life. You shall select your own convent,
and tell your beads, and say your prayers, and be
as demure and solemn as any seeming saint of
them all. I will give you a penance to begin
with,nay, I am serioushear me. In spite of
your prayers, and visions, and silly fancies, Miss
Leslie must soon be here; the snare is too well
prepared to be escaped. After this one violence,
to which she and cruel fate have driven me, I will
be a true knight, as humble and worshipful as any
hero of chivalry.
But she does not now love you, and do you
not fear she will hate you for this outrage?
Ay, but there is a potent alchymy at work for
us in the hearts of you women, that turns hate to
love. You shall yet hear her say, like the lady of
Sir Gawaine, `Oh! how it is befallen me, that
now I love him whom I before most hated of all
men living.' But you must aid me, Rosathis
proud queen must have her maid of honour.
And I must be the poor slave to do her
bidding
!
said Rosa, impatiently, interrupting
him, and all other feelings giving way to the rising
of womanly pride.
Nay, not so, Rosa, replied Sir Philip; and
added, in a voice which he hoped might soothe
her petulance, render to her all maidenly
service
;
for a little while do the tasks of the
bondwoman
,
and you shall yet have her wagesnay,
21*
start notyou remember the good Patriarch's
affections manifestly leaned to the side of
Hagar
.
Yes, yesand I remember too what her fate
wasthe fate of all who followin her footstepsto
be cast out to wander forth in a desert, where there
is not one sign of God's bounty left to them.
She burst into tears, and added, I would give
my poor life, and a thousand more, if I had them,
to save Hope Leslie, but I will never do her
menial
service.
Sir Philip continued to offer arguments and
entreaties
,
but nothing that he said had the least
effect on Rosa; he could not extort a promise
from her, nor perceive the slightest indication of
conformity to his wishes. But trusting that when
the time came she would of necessity submit to
his authority, he relinquished his solicitations, and
quitting her side, he paced the deck with hurried
impatient footsteps.
There is no solitude to the good or bad.
Nature
has her ministers that correspond with the
world within the breast of man. The words,
my kingdom is within you, are worth all the
metaphysical discoveries ever made by unassisted
human wisdom. If all is right in that
kingdom
,
beautiful forms and harmonious voices
surround us, discoursing music; but if the mind
is filled with guilty passionsrecollections of sin
and purposes of evil, the ministering angels
of nature are converted into demons, whose
monstrous rout are heard to howl like stable
wolves. Man cannot live in tranquil
disobedience
to the law of virtue, inscribed on his soul
by the finger of God. Our torments cannot
become our elements. To Sir Philip's
disordered
imagination the heavy mist seemed like an
infolding shroudthere was a voice of sullen
menace in the dashing of the waves against the
vesselthe hooting of the night-bird was
ominous
and
Rosa's low sobs, and the horrid oaths
of the misruled crew, rung in his ears like evil
prophecies.
Time wore away heavily enough till ten, the
earliest moment he had calculated on the return
of the boat, but after that it appeared to stand
stock-still. He ordered the signal lights attached
to the mast to be doubledhe strained his eyes
in the vain attempt to descry an approaching
object
,
and then cursed the fog that hemmed in his
sight. Suddenly a fresh breeze came off the
shore, the fog dispersed, and he could discern the
few lights that still glimmered from the
habitations
of the town, but no boat was seen or heard.
What folly, he repeated to himself a hundred
times, to be thus impatient; they certainly have
not failed in their object, or relinquished it, for in
that case they would have been hereit is
scarcely
time to expect them yet; but, as every one
must have experienced, when awaiting with
intense
anxiety an expected event, the suggestions
of reason could not calm the perturbations of
impatience
.
For another hour he continued to
stride the deck, approaching the light at every
turn to look at his watch. The sailors now
began
to fret at the delay. Every thing was
ready, they said, good luck had sent them a
fair breeze, and the tide had just turned in their
favor. And in Sir Philip's favour too, it
appeared
,
for at this moment the longed-for boat was
both heard and seen rapidly nearing the vessel.
He gazed towards it, as if it contained for him a
sentence of life or deathand life it was, for he
soon perceived a female form wrapped in
Chaddock's
watch-cloak.
The boat came to the side of the vessel.
Has the scoundrel dared to put his arm around
Hope Leslie? thought the knight, as he saw the
captain's arm encircling the unfortunate girl;
but a second reflection told him that this, which
seemed even to him profanity, was but a
necessary
precaution! He dared not trust hershe
would have leaped into the waves rather than
have come to meungracious girl!
What hath kept you? called out one of the
sailors.
The devil and Antonio, replied the captain.
We left him with the boat, and while we were
grappling the prize he ran away. I had to be
chains and fetters to the prisonerwe had not
hands to man our oars, so we waited for the
fellow
,
but he came not, and has, doubtless, ere
this, given the alarm. Weigh your anchor and
spread your sails, boysstarting with this wind
and tide we'll give them a devil of a chace, and
bootless at last.
While this was saying, the unhappy victim was
lifted up the side of the vessel, and received in
Sir Philip's arms. She threw back the hood that
had been drawn over her head, and attempted to
speak, but was prevented by her shawl, which
the ruffians had bound over her face to prevent
the emission of any sound. Sir Philip was shocked
at the violence and indignity she had suffered.
Did I not order you, Chaddock, he said, to
treat the lady with all possible respect?
Dn your orders, replied the captain, was
I to let her scream like forty sea-mews, and raise
the town upon us.
A thousandthousand pardons! whispered
Sir Philip, in a low imploring voice, and then
aloud to Chaddock, but after you left the town,
captain, you surely should have paid more respect
to my earnest and repeated injunctions.
Dn your injunctions. John Chaddock is
yet master of his vessel and boat too. I tell
you when the fishing-smacks hailed us, that even
with that close-reefed sail, she made a noise like
a creaking mast in a gale.
Oh forgiveforgive, whispered Sir Philip,
this horriblenecessary outrage. Lean on me,
I will conduct you away from these wretchesa
room is prepared for youRosa shall attend you
you are queen hereyou command us all.
Forgive
forgiveand
fear nothing. I will not
remove
your skreen till you are beyond the lawless
gaze of these fellowshere, Roslin! he called,
for he still kept up the farce of Rosa's disguise
in the presence of the ship's company, here,
Roslin!take the lamp, and follow me.
Rosa obeyed, her bosom heaving with
struggling
emotions, and her hand trembling so that
she could scarcely hold the lamp. Bear the
light up, and more steadily, Roslin. Nay, my
beloved
adored
mistress, do not falter; hasten
forwardin one minute more we shall be below,
in your own domain, where you may admit or
exclude me at pleasure. Do not struggle thus
you have driven me to this violenceyou must
forgive the madness you have caused. I am your
slave for life.
They had just passed down the steps that
served
as a companion way, when Sir Philip observed
on his right hand, an uncovered barrel of
gun-powder
.
It had been left in this exposed
situation
by a careless fellow, entrusted with the
preparation
of the fire arms for the expedition to
the town. Have a care, cried Sir Philip to
Rosa, who was just coming down the stairs; stay
where you aredo not approach that gunpowder
with the light. He heard a footstep above.
Here, friend, he called, lend us a hand; come
down and cover this powder. We cannot
discretely
move an inch. The footsteps ceased,
but there was no reply to the call. I cannot
leave Miss Leslie, continued Sir Philip, she
leans on me as if she were fainting. Set down
your lamp, Rosa, and come yourself, and cover
the barrel.
Rosa did not set down the lamp, but moved
forward one or two steps with it in her hand, and
then paused. She seemed revolving some
dreadful
purpose in her mind. Her eyes glanced wildly
from Sir Philip to his helpless victimthen she
groaned aloud, and pressed her hand upon her
head as if it were bursting.
Sir Philip did not observe herhe was intent
upon his companion. She is certainly
fainting
,
he said, it is the close air and this cursed
shawl. He attempted to remove it, but the
knot by which it was tied baffled his skill, and he
again shouted to Rosa, Why do you not obey
me? Miss Leslie is suffocatingset down the
lamp, I say, and call assistance. Damnation!
he screamed, what means the girl? as Rosa
made one desperate leap forward, and shrieking,
it cannot be worse for any of us! threw the
lamp into the barrel.
The explosion was instantaneousthe
hapless
,
pitiable girlher guilty destroyerhis
victim
the
crewthe vessel, rent to fragments,
were hurled into the air, and soon engulfed in
the waves.
CHAPTER XIII.
And how soon to the bower she loved, they say,
Returned the maid that was borne away
From Maquon, the fond and the brave.
Bryant
.
After
Miss Leslie's escape from Oneco on the
island, he remained for some time unconscious of
her departure, and entirely absorbed in his
efforts to quicken the energy of reviving life in
his father; and when he discovered that his
prisoner had left him, he still deemed her as
certainly
within his power on the sea-girt island, as
if she had been enclosed by the walls of a prison.
He felt that his father's life depended on his
obtaining
an asylum as soon as possible, and he
determined
to abandon his plan of going to
Narragansett
,
and instead, to cross the bay to Moscutusett,
the residence of the son and successor of
Chicetabot
,
an avowed ally of the English, but really, in
common with most of the powerful chiefs, their
secret enemy.
If, availing himself of the sheltering twilight of
the morning, he could convey his father safely to
the wigwam of his friend, Oneco believed he
might securely remain there for the present. In
the mean time, he should himself be at liberty to
contrive and attempt the recovery of his wife.
The instrumentality of Hope Leslie might be
important
to effect this object, and she also might
remain in safe custody with the Indian chief.
Thus having digested his plans, before the
morning dawned, and by the sufficient light of
the moon, he went in quest of his prisoner,
but was destined, as our readers know, to be
disappointed
.
He encountered Chaddock's crew, much in the
situation in which they were first discovered
by Miss Leslie, for after having been baffled in
their pursuit of her, they returned and
recomposed
themselves to await the light of day, when
they might give a signal to some boat to take
them off the island.
Oneco apprehending that in the prosecution of
his search over the island, he might meet with
some straggler from this gang, very prudently
disguised
himself in certain of the cast-off garments
belonging to the men, which would enable him to
escape, at least, immediate detection. This
disguise
,
though useless then, proved afterwards of
important service to him.
Compelled by the approach of day to abandon
his search, he returned to his canoe, placed his
father in it, and rowed him to Sachem's-head,
where he was kindly received and cherished,
though with the utmost secresy, for the Indians
had long ere this been taught, by painful
experience
,
Vol. II. 22
to guard against the most dispiriting of
all dangersa danger to which the weak, in the
neighbourhood of a powerful and comparatively
rich foe, are always exposedthe treachery of
their own people.
The chief of Moscutusett obtained, from day
to day, intelligence of whatever transpired in
Boston; and in this way Mononotto was apprised
of the imprisonment and probable fate of
Magawisca
.
This was the last drop in his cup of
bitterness
;
worse, far worse, than to have borne on
his body the severest tortures ever devised by
human cruelty. Magawisca had obtained an
ascendency over her father's mind by her
extraordinary
gifts and superior knowledge. He loved
her as his childhe venerated her as an
inspired
being. He might have endured to have
had her cut off by the chances of war, but to have
her arraigned before the tribunal of his enemies,
as amenable to their lawsto have her die by the
hands of the executioner, as one of their own felon
subjects, pierced his national pride as well as his
affection, and he resigned himself to
overwhelming
grief. Oneco sorrowed for himself, and he
sorrowed for the old man's tears, but he felt
nothing
very deeply but the loss of his white
bird.
All his ingenuity was employed to devise the
means of her escape. After having painted
his face, hands, and legs, so as effectually to
conceal his tawny hue, he appeared a foreign
sailor, in Madam Winthrop's parlour. All
succeeded better than his most sanguine
expectations
.
He contrived to give every necessary hint
to Faith Leslie; and so happily veiled his
language
by his indistinct and rapid utterance, that
Governor Winthrop, familiar as he was with the
sound of the Indian dialects, did not suspect him.
The family retired immediately after their evening
devotions: he laid himself down on the bed that had
been hospitably spread for him, and soon feigned
himself asleep. He watched the servants make their
last preparations for bedthe lights were
extinguished
,
and the fire raked up, though enough still
glimmered through the ashes, to afford him a
competent
light when he should need it. The
menials
withdrewtheir footsteps had hardly ceased
to vibrate on his ear, when his wife, impatient of
any further delay, stole from her aunt's side, threw
on her dress, and with the light bounding tread of
a fawn, passed down the stairs, through the hall,
and into the kitchen. Oneco started up, and in
a transport of joy would have locked her in his
arms, when JennetJennet, our evil genius,
appeared
.
She, like some other disagreeable
people
,
seemed to be gifted with ubiquity, and always
to be present where happiness was to be
interrupted
,
or mischief to be done.
She stood for an instant, her hands uplifted in
silent amazement, hesitating whether to alarm the
family with her outcries, or more quietly to give
them notice of the character of their guest.
Oneco put a sudden end to her deliberations.
He first darted to the door and closed it; then
drew a knife from his bosom, and pointing it at
Jennet's heart, he told her in very bad English,
but plainly interpreted by his action, that if she
moved or uttered a sound, his knife should taste
her life-blood.
Jennet saw determination in his aspect, and
she stood as still as if she were paralyzed or
transfixed, while Oneco proceeded to tell her,
that to make all sure, she should go with him to
his canoe. He bade her calm her fears, for then
he would release her, provided that in the mean
time, she made no effort, by voice or movement,
to release herself.
There was no alternative, but she did beg to
be allowed to go to her room to get her bonnet
and shawl. Oneco smiled deridingly at the weak
artifice by which she hoped to elude him; but
deigning no other reply to it, he caught a shawl
which hung over a chair, threw it over her, and
without any further delay, compelled her to follow
him.
Oneco took care to avoid the danger, slight
though it was, of encountering any passengers, by
directing his way through an unfrequented part
of the town. Impatience to be beyond the bounds
of danger, and the joy of escape and reunion,
seemed to lend wings to Jennet's companions,
while she followed breathless and panting,
enraged
at her compelled attendance, and almost
bursting with spite, to which she could not give
its natural vent by its customary outlet the tongue,
the safety-valve of many a vexed spirit.
They had arrived very near to the cove where
Oneco had moored his canoe. He good naturedly
pointed towards it, and told Jennet that there she
should be released. But the hope of release by
a mode much more satisfactory to her feelings,
inasmuch as it would involve her companions in
danger, had dawned on Jennet. She had just
perceived some men, (how many she could not
tell, for the night was then dark) who were,
unobserved
by Oneco, stealing towards them. She
withdrew a few inches, as far as she dared from
his side, lest he should execute sudden vengeance
with the weapon which he still held in his hand.
Her conjectures were now converted to certainty,
and she already mentally exulted in the
retaliation
she should inflict on her companions, but
alas!
Esser vicino al lido
Molti fra naufragar;
or, to express the same truth by our vernacular
adage,There's many a slip between the cup
and the lip. The men did approach, even to
her side, and without listening to her protestations
of who she was, and who her companions were
without even hearing them, they seized on her, and
suffering the other parties to escape without any
annoyance, they bound her shawl over her head
22*
and face, and as our readers have already
anticipated
,
conveyed her to that awful destiny,
which she had herself indirectly prepared.
It may excite some surprise that Chaddock,
forewarned as he had been, that the lady whom
he was to intercept would have no male attendant,
should not have hesitated when he saw Oneco.
But that may be explained by Oneco wearing the
dress of the ship's crew, and the natural
conclusion
on Chaddock's part, that Antonio, whom he
had left in the boat, had come on shore, and
probably just joined these females. Chaddock's
only care was, to select the shortest of the two
women, and obscure as the night was, their
relative
height was apparent.
CHAPTER XIV.
Basta cosi t'intendo
Gi ti spiegasti a pieno;
E mi diresti meno
Se mi dicessi pi.
Metastasio
.
We
trust we have not exhausted the patience
of our readers, and that they will vouchsafe to go
forth with us once more, on the eventful evening
on which we have fallen, to watch the safe
conduct
of the released prisoner.
The fugitives had not proceeded many yards
from the jail, when Everell joined them. This
was the first occasion on which Magawisca and
Everell had had an opportunity freely to
interchange
their feelings. Everell's tongue faltered
when he would have expressed what he had felt
for her: his manly, generous nature, disdained
vulgar professions, and he feared that his
ineffectual
efforts in her behalf had left him without any
other testimony of the constancy of his friendship,
and the warmth of his gratitude.
Magawisca comprehended his feelings, and
anticipated
their expression. She related the scene
with Sir Philip, in the prison; and dwelt long on
her knowledge of the attempt Everell then made
to rescue her. That bad man, she said, made
me, for the first time, lament for my lost limb.
He darkened the clouds that were gathering
over my soul; and, for a little while, Everell, I did
deem thee like most of thy race, on whom kindness
falls like drops of rain on the lake, dimpling its
surface
for a moment, but leaving no mark there
but when I found thou wert true, she continued in
a swelling, exulting voicewhen I heard thee in
my prison, and saw thee on my trial, I again
rejoiced
that I had sacrificed my precious limb for
thee; that I had worn away the days and nights
in the solitudes of the forest musing on the
memory
of thee, and counting the moons till the
Great Spirit shall bid us to those regions where
there will be no more gulfs between us, and I may
hail thee as my brother.
And why not now, Magawisca, regard me as
your brother? True, neither time nor distance
can sever the bonds by which our souls are united,
but why not enjoy this friendship while youth, and
as long as life lasts? Nay, hear me, Magawisca
the present difference of the English with the
Indians, is but a vapour that has, even now,
nearly
passed away. Go, for a short time, where you
may be concealed from those who are not yet
prepared to do you justice, and thenI will
answer
for itevery heart and every voice will unite
to recall you; you shall be welcomed with the
honour due to you from all, and always cherished
with the devotion due from us.
Oh! do not hesitate, Magawisca, cried
Hope, who had, till now, been only a listener to
the conversation in which she took a deep
interest
.
Promise us that you will return and dwell
with usas you would say, Magawisca, we will
walk in the same path, the same joys shall shine
on us, and, if need be that sorrows come over us,
why, we will all sit under their shadow together.
It cannot beit cannot be, replied
Magawisca
,
the persuasions of those she loved, not, for a
moment, overcoming her deep invincible sense of
the wrongs her injured race had sustained. My
people have been spoiledwe cannot take as a
gift that which is our ownthe law of vengeance
is written on our heartsyou say you have a
written
rule of forgivenessit may be betterif ye
would be guided by itit is not for usthe Indian
and the white man can no more mingle, and
become
one, than day and night.
Everell and Hope would have interrupted her
with further entreaties and arguments: Touch
no more on that, she said, we must partand
for ever. Her voice faltered for the first time,
and, turning from her own fate to what appeared to
her the bright destiny of her companions, my
spirit will joy in the thought, she said, that you
are dwelling in love and happiness together.
Nelema
told me your souls were matedshe said
your affections mingled like streams from the
same fountain. Oh! may the chains by which
He, who sent you from the spirit land, bound you
together, grow brighter and stronger till you
return
thither again.
She pausedneither of her companions spoke
neither could speakand, naturally,
misinterpreting
their silence, have I passed your bound
of modesty, she said, in speaking to the maiden
as if she were a wife?
Oh, no, Magawisca, said Everell, feeling a
strange and undefinable pleasure in an illusion,
which, though he could not for an instant
participate
,
he would not for the world have
dissipated
oh,
no, do not check one expression, one
word, they are your last to us. `And may not
the last words of a friend, be, like the sayings of
a death-bed, prophetic?' he would have added,
but his lips refused to utter what he felt was the
treachery of his heart.
To Hope it seemed that too much had already
been spoken. She could be prudent when any
thing but ner own safety depended on her
discretion
.
Before Magawisca could reply to Everell,
she gave a turn to the conversation: Ere we
part, Magawisca, she said, cannot you give me
some charm, by which I may win my sister's
affections
?
she is wasting away with grief and
pining.
Ask your own heart, Hope Leslie, if any
charm could win your affections from Everell
Fletcher?
She paused for a reply. The gulf from which
Hope had retreated, seemed to be widening
before
her, but, summoning all her courage, she
answered
with a tolerably firm voice, yesyes,
Magawisca, if virtue, if duty to others required it,
I trust in heaven I could command and direct my
affections.
We hope Everell may be forgiven, for the joy
that gushed through his heart when Hope
expressed
a confidence in her own strength, which
at least implied a consciousness that she needed
it. Nature will rejoice in reciprocated love,
under
whatever adversities it comes.
Magawisca replied to Hope's apparent
meaning
:
Both virtue and duty, she said, bind
your sister to Oneco. She hath been married
according to our simple modes, and persuaded by
a Romish father, as she came from Christian
blood, to observe the rites of their law. When
she flies from you, as she will, mourn not over
her, Hope Lesliethe wild flower would perish
in your gardensthe forest is like a native home
to herand she will sing as gaily again as the
bird that hath found its mate.
They now approached the place where Digby,
with a trusty friend, was awaiting them. A light
canoe had been provided, and Digby had his
instructions
from Everell to convey Magawisca to
any place she might herself select. The good
fellow
had entered into the confederacy with hearty
good will, giving, as a reason for his obedience to
the impulse of his heart, `that the poor Indian
girl could not commit sins enough against the
English to weigh down her good deed to Mr.
Everell.'
Everell now inquired of Magawisca whither he
should direct the boat: To Moscutusett, she
said; I shall there get tidings, at least, of my
father.
And must we now part, Magawisca? must
we live without you?
Oh! no, no cried Hope, joining her
entreaties
,
your noble mind must not be wasted
in those hideous solitudes.
Solitudes! echoed Magawisca, in a voice in
which some pride mingled with her parting
sadness
.
Hope Leslie, there is no solitude to me;
the Great Spirit, and his ministers, are every
where present and visible to the eye of the soul
that loves him; nature is but his interpreter; her
forms are but bodies for his spirit. I hear him in
the rushing windsin the summer breezein the
gushing fountainsin the softly running streams.
I see him in the bursting life of springin the
ripening
maizein the falling leaf. Those
beautiful
lights, and she pointed upward, that shine
alike on your stately domes and our forest homes,
speak to me of his love to all,think you I go to
a solitude, Hope Leslie?
No, Magawisca; there is no solitude, nor
privation
,
nor sorrow, to a soul that thus feels the
presence of God, replied Hope. She paused
it was not a time for calm reflection or
protracted
solicitation; but the thought that a mind so
disposed to religious impressions and affections,
might enjoy the brighter light of Christian
revelation
a
revelation so much higher, nobler, and
fuller, than that which proceeds from the voice of
naturemade Hope feel a more intense desire
than ever to retain Magawisca; but this was a
motive Magawisca could not now appreciate, and
she could not, therefore, urge: I cannot ask
you, she said, I do not ask you, for your sake,
but for ours, to return to us.
Oh! yes, Magawisca, urged Everell, come
back to us and teach us to be happy, as you are,
without human help or agency.
Ah! she replied, with a faint smile, ye need
not the lesson, ye will each be to the other a full
stream of happiness. May it be fed from the
fountain of love, and grow broader and deeper
through all the passage of life.
The picture Magawisca presented, was, in the
minds of the lovers, too painfully contrasted with
the real state of their affairs. Both felt their
emotions
were beyond their control; both silently
appealed
to heaven to aid them in repressing
feelings
that might not be expressed.
Hope naturally sought relief in action: she took
a morocco case from her pocket, and drew from
it a rich gold chain, with a clasp containing hair,
and set round with precious stones:
Magawisca
,
she said, with as much steadiness of voice as
Vol. II. 23
she could assume, take this token with you, it
will serve as a memorial of us both, for I have
put in the clasp a lock of Everell's hair, taken
from his head when he was a boy, at Bethelit
will remind you of your happiest days there.
Magawisca took the chain, and held it in her
hand a moment, as if deliberating. This is
beautiful, she said, and would, when I am far
away from thee, speak sweetly to me of thy
kindness
,
Hope Leslie. But I would ratherif I
could demean myself to be a beggarshe
hesitated
,
and then added, I wrong thy generous
nature in fearing thus to speak; I know thou wilt
freely give me the image when thou hast the
living
form.
Before she had finished, Hope's quick
apprehension
had comprehended her meaning.
Immediately
after Everell's arrival in England, he
had, at his father's desire, had a small miniature
of himself painted, and sent to Hope. She
attached
it to a ribbon, and had always worn it.
Soon after Everell's engagement to Miss
Downing
,
she took it off to put it aside, but feeling, at
the moment, that this action implied a
consciousness
of weakness, she, with a mixed feeling of
pride, and reluctance to part with it, restored it
to her bosom. While she was adjusting
Magawisca's
disguise in the prison, the miniature slid
from beneath her dress, and she, at the time,
observed
that Magawisca's eye rested intently on it.
She must not now hesitateEverell must not see
her reluctance, and yet, such are the strange
contrarieties
of human feeling, the severest pang she felt
in parting with it, was the fear that Everell would
think it was a willing gift. Hoping to shelter all
her feelings in the haste of the action, she took
the miniature from her own neck, and tied it
around Magawisca's. You have but reminded
me of my duty, she said; nay, keep them both,
Magawisca, do not stint the little kindness I can
show you.
Digby had at this moment come up to urge no
more delay; and we leave to others to adjust
the proportions of emotion that were indicated
by Hope's faltering voice, and an irrepressible
burst of tears, between her grief at parting, and
other and secret feelings.
All stood as if they were rivetted to the ground,
till Digby again spoke, and suggested the danger
to which Magawisca was exposed by this delay.
All felt the necessity of immediate separation,
and all shrunk from it as from witnessing the last
gasp of life. They moved to the water's edge,
and, once more prompted by Digby, Everell and
Hope, in broken voices, expressed their last
wishes
and prayers. Magawisca joined their hands,
and bowing her head on them,The Great
Spirit guide ye, she said, and then turning away,
leaped into the boat, muffled her face in her
mantle
,
and in a few brief moments disappeared for
ever from their sight.
Everell and Hope remained immoveable,
gazing
on the little boat till it faded in the dim
distance
;
for a few moments, every feeling for
themselves was lost in the grief of parting for
ever from the admirable being, who seemed to
her enthusiastic young friends, one of the noblest
of the works of Goda bright witness to the
beauty, the independence, and the immortality of
virtue. They breathed their silent prayers for
her; and when their thoughts returned to
themselves
,
though they gave them no expression,
there was a consciousness of perfect unity of
feeling
,
a joy in the sympathy that was consecrated
by its object, and might be innocently indulged,
that was a delicious spell to their troubled
hearts.
Strong as the temptation was, they both felt
the impropriety of lingering where they were,
and they bent their slow, unwilling footsteps
homeward. Not one word during the long
protracted
walk was spoken by either; but no
language
could have been so expressive of their
mutual
love and mutual resolution, as this silence.
They both afterwards confessed, that though they
had never felt so deeply as at that moment, the
bitterness of their divided destiny, yet neither had
they before known the worth of those principles
of virtue, that can subdue the strongest passions
to their obedience. An experience worth a
tenfold
suffering.
As they approached Governor Winthrop's, they
observed that instead of the profound darkness
and silence that usually reigned in that
exemplary
mansion at eleven o'clock, the house
seemed
to be in great bustle. The doors were open,
and they heard loud voices, and lights were
swiftly
passing from room to room. Hope inferred,
that notwithstanding her precautions, the
apprehensions
of the family had probably been excited
in regard to her untimely absence, and she
passed
the little distance that remained with dutiful
haste. Everell attended her to the gate of the
court, and pressing her hand to his lips, with an
emotion that he felt he might indulge for the last
time, he left her and went, according to a
previous
determination, to Barnaby Tuttle's, where,
by a surrender of himself to the jailer's custody,
he expected to relieve poor Cradock from his
involuntary
confinement.
23*
CHAPTER XV.
Quelque rare que soit le vritable amour il l'est encore
moins que la vritable amiti.
Rochefoucauld
.
Hope Leslie
met Mr. Fletcher at the threshold
of the door. He was sallying forth with hasty steps
and disordered looks. He started at the sight of
her, and then clasping her in his arms, exclaimed,
My child! my child! my precious child!
At the sound of his voice the whole family
rushed from the parlour. Praised be the
Lord for thy deliverance, Hope Leslie, cried
Governor Winthrop, clasping his hands with
astonishment
.
Mrs. Grafton gave vent to her
feelings
in hysterical sobbings, and inarticulate
murmurs
of joy. Madam Winthrop said,I thought
it was impossibleI told you the Lord would be
better to you than your fears: and Esther
Downing
embraced her friend with deep emotion,
whispering
as she did so, the Lord is ever better to
us than our fears, or our deservings.
It was obvious to our heroine, that all this
excitement
and overflowing of tenderness could not
be occasioned merely by her unseasonable
absence
,
and she begged to know what had caused
so much alarm.
The Governor was beginning, in his official
manner, a formal statement, when, as if the
agitations
of this eventful evening were never to end,
the explosion of Chaddock's vessel broke in upon
their returning tranquillity, and spread a panic
through the town of Boston.
The occurrence of the accident, at this
particular
moment, was fortunate for Magawisca, as it
prevented a premature discovery of her escape;
a discovery by which the Governor would have
felt himself obliged to take measures for her
recapture
,
that might then have proved effectual.
The explosion of course withdrew his attention
from all other subjects, and both he and Mr.
Fletcher went out to ascertain whence it had
proceeded, and what ill consequences had
ensued
.
In the mean time, Hope learned the following
particulars from the ladies. The family had
retired
to bed at the accustomed time, and about
half an hour before her return, were alarmed by
a violent knocking at the outer door. The
servant
first awakened let in a stranger, who
demanded
an immediate audience of the Governor,
concerning matters of life and death. The
stranger
proved to be Antonio, and his
communication
,
the conspiracy with which our readers are
well acquainted, or rather, as much of it as had
fallen within the knowledge of the subordinate
agents. Antonio declared, that having within
the harbour of Boston been favoured with an
extraordinary
visitation from his tutelar saint,
who had vouchsafed to warn him against his sinful
comrades, he had determined from the first, that
he would, if possible, prevent the wicked designs
of the conspirators; and for that purpose, had
solicited to be among the number who were sent
on shore, intending to give notice to the Governor,
in time for him to counteract the wicked project:
he averred that after quitting the boat, he had
heard the screams of the unhappy girl, when she
was seized by the sailors; he had been spurred to
all possible haste, but unhappily, ignorant of the
town, he had strayed out of his way in coming
from the cove, and finally, had found it almost
impossible to rouse any of the sleeping
inhabitants
to guide him to the Governor's.
Antonio knew the name of the author of this
guilty project to be Sir Philip Gardiner, and its
victim, Miss Leslie. These names were fearful
hints to the Governor, and had prevented his
listening
with utter incredulity to the tale of the
stranger. As the easiest means of obtaining its
confirmation or refutation, a messenger was
despatched
to Sir Philip's lodgings, who almost
instantly
returned with the intelligence, that he, his
page, and baggage, had clandestinely
disappeared
during the evening. This was a frightful
coincidence
;
and while the Governor's orders that
all the family should be called were executing, he
made one further investigation.
He recollected the packet of letters which Rosa
had given to her master during the trial. Sir
Philip had laid them on the table, and forgetting
them in the confusion that followed, the
Governor
had taken possession of them, intending to
restore
them at the first opportunity. He felt
himself
now, not only authorised to break the seals,
but compelled to that discourtesy. The letters
were from a confidential correspondent, and
proved, beyond a doubt, that Sir Philip had
formerly
been the proteg, and ally of Thomas
Morton, the old political enemy of the colony;
that he was a Roman catholic; of course, that
the Governor and his friends had been duped by
his religious pretensions; and in short, that he
was an utter profligate, who regarded neither the
laws of God nor man.
And into the power of this wretch the friends
of Miss Leslie were left, for a few agonizing
moments
,
to believe she had fallen; and their joy at
her appearance was, as may be believed,
commensurate
with their previous distress.
Some of the minor incidents of the evening now
transpired. One of the servants reported that
the young sailor had disappeared; and Mrs.
Grafton
suddenly recollected to have observed that
Faith Leslie was not with her when she was
awakened, a circumstance she had overlooked in
her subsequent agitation. By a single clew an
intricate
maze may be threaded. Madam Winthrop
now recalled Faith Leslie's emotion at the first
sound of the sailor's voice, and the ladies soon
arrived
at the right conclusion, that he was in reality
Oneco, and that they had effected their escape
together. Jennet (if Jennet had survived to hear
it, she never would have believed the tale,) the
only actual sufferer, was the only one neither
missed nor inquired for. Good Master Cradock
was not forgotten; but his friends were satisfied
with Miss Leslie's assurance that he was safe, and
would, probably, not return before the
morning
.
The final departure of her sister cost Hope
many regrets and tears. But an inevitable event,
of such a nature, cannot seriously disturb the
happiness
of life. There had been nothing in the
intercourse
of the sisters to excite Hope's
affections
.
Faith had been spiritless, woe-begone
a soulless bodyand had repelled, with sullen
indifference
,
all Hope's efforts to win her love.
Indeed
,
she looked upon the attentions of her
English
friends but as a continuation of the unjust
force by which they had severed her from all she
held dear. Her marriage, solemnized as it had
been by prescribed Christian rites, would
probably
have been considered by her guardian, and
his friends, as invalidated by her extreme youth,
and the circumstances which had led to the union.
But Hope took a more youthful, romantic, and,
perhaps, natural view of the affair; and the
suggestions
of Magawisca, combining with the dictates
of her own heart, produced the conclusion that
this was a case where `God had joined together,
and man might not put asunder.'
All proper (though it may be not very
vigorous
)
measures were taken by Governor
Winthrop
,
on the following day, to discover the
retreat
of the fugitives; but the secret was
faithfully
kept while necessary to their security.
The return of his children, and, above all, of
Magawisca
,
seemed to work miracles on their old
father
:
his health and strength were renewed, and,
for a while, he forgot, in the powerful influence
of her presence, his wrongs and sorrows. He
would not hazard the safety of his protector, and
that of his own family, by lingering a single day
in the vicinity of his enemies.
Before the dawn of the next morning, this little
remnant of the Pequod race, a name at which, but
a few years before, all within the bounds of the
New-England coloniesall, English and
Indians
,
`grew pale,' began their pilgrimage to the far
western forests. That which remains untold of
their story, is lost in the deep, voiceless obscurity
of those unknown regions.
The terrors her friends had suffered, on
account
of our heroine, induced them to overlook
every thing but the joy of her safety. She was
permitted to retire with Esther to their own
apartment
,
without any inquisition being made into
the cause of her extraordinary absence. Even
her friend, when they were alone together, made
no allusion to it, and Hope rightly concluded that
she was satisfied with her own conjectures as to
its object.
Hope could scarcely refrain from indulging the
natural frankness of her temper, by disclosing,
unsolicited
,
the particulars of her successful
enterprise
;
and she only checked the inclinations of
her heart from the apprehension that Esther
might deem it her duty to extend her knowledge
to her uncle, and thus Magawisca might be again
endangered. `She certainly conjectures how
it is,' thought Hope, making her own mental
comments on Esther's forbearance; `and yet she
does not indicate the least displeasure at my
having
combined with Everell to render the
delightful
service that her severe conscience would not
allow her to perform.' `She never spoke to me
with more tendernesshow could I ever suspect
her of jealousy, or distrust?she is incapable of
eithershe is angelicfar, far more deserving
of Everell than I am.'
At this last thought, a half stifled, but audible,
sigh escaped her, and reached her friend's ear.
Their eyes met. A deep, scorching blush
suffused
Hope's cheeks, brow, and neck. Esther's
face beamed with ineffable sweetness and
serenity
.
She looked as a mortal can look only when
the world and its temptations are trampled
beneath
the feet, and the eye is calmly, steadily,
immovably
fixed on heaven. She folded Hope in
her arms, and pressed her fondly to her heart, but
not a word, tear, or sigh escaped her. Her soul
was composed to a profound stillness, incapable
of being disturbed by her friend's tears and sobs,
the involuntary expression of her agitated,
confused
,
and irrepressible feelings.
Hope turned away from Esther, and crept into
her bed; feeling, like a condemned culprit,
self-condemned
.
It seemed to her that a charm had
been wrought on her; a sudden illumination had
flashed from her friend's face into the most secret
recesses of her heart, and exposedthis was
her most distressful apprehensionto Esther's
eye, feelings whose existence, till thus revealed to
another, (and the last person in the world to
whom they should be revealed,) she had only, and
reluctantly, acknowledged to herself.
Deeply mortified and humbled, she remained
wakeful, weeping and lamenting this sudden
exposure
of emotions that she feared could never be
explained or forgotten, long after her friend had
encircled her in her arms, and fallen into a sweet
and profound sleep.
We must leave the apartment of the generous
and involuntary rivals, to repair to the parlour,
where Governor Winthrop, after having
ascertained
that Chaddock's vessel had been blown
up by the explosion, was listening to Barnaby
Tuttle's relation of the transaction at the prison.
The simple jailer, on learning from Everell's
confessions how he had been cajoled, declined
increasing
his responsibilities by making the
exchange
Everell proposed, but very readily acceded
Vol. II. 24
to his next proposition, namely, that he should be
permitted to share the imprisonment of Cradock.
On entering the dungeon, they found the good
old man sleeping as soundly on Magawisca's
pallet, as if he were in his own apartment; and
Everell rejoicing that he had suffered so little, in
the good cause to which it had been necessary to
make him accessory, and exulting in the success
of his enterprise, took possession of his dark and
miserable cell, with feelings that he would not
have bartered for those of a conqueror mounting
his triumphal car.
Barnaby had a natural feeling of vexation at
having been outwitted by Hope Leslie's
stratagems
;
but it was a transient emotion, and not
strong enough to check the habitual current of
his gratitude and affection for her, nor did it at
all enter into his relation of the facts to the
Governor
.
On the contrary, his natural
kind-heartedness
rendered the statement favourable towards
all parties.
He did not mention Magawisca's name without
a parenthesis, containing some commendation of
her deportment in the prison. He spoke of Hope
Leslie, as the thoughtless child, or, the
feeling
young creature. Master Cradock was, the
poor witless old gentleman; and for Mr.
Everell, it was not within the bounds of human
nature, in his peculiar case, not to feel as he did;
and as to himself, he was but an old dotard, ill
fitted to keep bars and bolts, when a childthe
Lord and the Governor forgive her!could guide
him with a wisp of straw.
Nothing was further from Barnaby Tuttle's
thoughts, than any endeavour to blind or pervert
a ruler's judgment; but the Governor found
something
infectious in his artless humanity. Besides,
he had one good, sufficient, and state reason for
extenuating the offence of the young
conspirators
,
and of this he made a broad canopy to
shelter
his secret and kind dispositions towards them.
A messenger had that day arrived, from the chief
of the Narragansetts, with the information that a
war had broken out between Miantunnomoh and
Uncas, and an earnest solicitation that the
English
would not interfere with their domestic
quarrels.
To our ancestors, it appeared their melancholy
policy to promote, rather than to allay these
feuds among the tribes; and a war between these
rival and powerful chieftains assured, while it
lasted
,
the safety of the English settlements. It
became
,
therefore, very important to avoid any act
that might provoke the universal Indian
sentiment
against the English, and induce them to
forego their civil quarrel, and combine against the
common enemy. This would be the probable
effect of the condemnation of the Pequod girl,
whose cause had been espoused by several of the
tribes: still, on a further investigation of her case,
the laws might require her condemnationand
the puritans held firmly to the principle, that
good must be done, though evil ensue.
Governor Winthrop perceived that
Magawisca's
escape relieved them from much and
dangerous
perplexity; and though Everell Fletcher's
interposition had been unlawful and indecorous,
yet, as Providence had made him the instrument
of certain good, he thought his offence might be
pardoned by his associates in authority.
He dismissed Barnaby, with an order to appear
before him with his prisoners, at six o'clock the
following morning. At that hour he assembled
together such of the magistrates and deputies as
were in Boston, deeming it, as he said, proper to
give them the earliest notice of the various
important
circumstances that had occurred since
the morning of the preceding day.
He opened the meeting with a communication
of the important intelligence received from the
Narragansett chief; intimated the politic uses to
which the wisdom of his brethren might apply it;
then, after some general observations on the
imperfection
of human wisdom, disclosed at full the
iniquitous character and conduct of Sir Philip
Gardiner; lamented in particular, that he had
been grievously deceived by that crafty son of
Belialand then dwelt on the wonderful
interposition
of Providence in behalf of Hope Leslie,
which clearly intimated, as he said, and all his
auditors acknowledged, that the young maiden's
life was precious in the sight of the Lord, and
was preserved for some special purpose. He
called their attention to the light thrown on the
testimony of Sir Philip against the Indian
prisoner
by his real characterand last of all, he
communicated
the escape of Magawisca, and the
means by which it had been accomplished, with
this comment simply, that it had pleased the Lord
to bring about great good to the land by the rash
act of two young persons, who seemed to have been
wrought upon by feelings natural to youth; and
the foolishness of an old man, whose original
modicum of sense was greatly diminished by age,
and excess of useless learning; for, he said,
Master
Cradock not only wrote Greek and Latin, and
talked Hebrew like the Rev. Mr. Cotton, but he
was skilled in Arabic, and the modern tongues.
The Governor then proceeded to give many
and plausible reasons, with the detail of which it
is not necessary to weary the patience of our
readers
,
why this case, in the absence of a precise
law, should be put under the government of
mercy
.
His associates lent a favourable ear to these
suggestions. Most of them considered the offence
very much alleviated by the youth of the two
principal parties, and the strong motives that
actuated
them. Some of the magistrates were
warm friends of the elder Fletcher, and all of
them might have been quickened in their
decision
,
by the approach of the breakfast hour; for
as modern philosophy has discovered, the mind
24*
and sensibilities are much under the dominion of
these periodical returns of the hours of refection.
The conclusion of the whole matter was, that
Miss Leslie and Master Cradock should receive
a private admonition from the Governor, and a
free pardon; and that Mr. Everell Fletcher should
be restored to liberty, on condition that, at the
next sitting of the court, he appeared in the
prisoner's
bar, to receive a public censure, and be
admonished as to his future carriage. To this
sentence Everell submitted at the proper time,
with due humility, and a very becoming, and,
as said the elders, edifying modesty.
Throughout the whole affair, Governor Winthrop
manifested those dispositions to clemency, which
were so beautifully illustrated by one of the last
circumstances of his life, when being, as is
reported
of him, upon his death-bed, Mr. Dudley
pressed him to sign an order of banishment of
an heterodox person, he refused, saying,
I have
done too much of that work already
.
Everell and Master Cradock, who had awaited
in an adjoining apartment the result of these
deliberations
,
were now informed of the merciful
decision of their judges, and summoned to take
their places at the breakfast-table. While all this
business was transpiring, Hope Leslie, wearied
by the fatigues, agitations, and protracted vigil
of the preceding night, was sleeping most
profoundly
.
She awoke with a confused sense of
her last anxious waking thoughts, and naturally
turned to look for Esther, but Esther had already
risen. This excited no surprise, for it must be
confessed that our heroine was often anticipated
in early-rising, as in other severe duties, by her
friend. Admonished by a broad sun-beam that
streamed aslant her apartment, that she had
already
trespassed on the family breakfast hour, she
rose, and despatched her toilet duties. Her
mind was still intent on Esther, and suddenly
she missed some familiar objects: Esther's
morocco
dressing-case and Bible, that always laid
at hand on the dressing-table. Hope was at that
moment adjusting her hair; she dropped her
combcast a hasty survey around the room.
Esther's trunks, bandboxes, every article
belonging
to her had disappeared. What could this
mean? Some solution of the mystery might
have dawned from the recollections of the
preceding
night, but impatient for a full explanation,
she seized her whistle, opened the door, and blew
for Jennet, till its shrill notes had penetrated
every recess of the house. But no Jennet
appeared
;
and without waiting to adjust her hair,
which she had left in what is called disorder, but
according to the natural and beautiful order of
nature, and with a flushed cheek and beating
heart she hastily descended to the parlor, and
dispensing
with the customary morning salutations,
eagerly demandedWhere is Esther?
The family were all assembled at the
breakfast-table
.
Her sudden appearance produced
an apparent sensationevery eye turned towards
her. Mrs. Grafton would have impulsively
answered
her question, but she was prevented by
an intimation from Madam Winthrop. Everell's
eye, on seeing her, flashed a bright intelligent
glance, but at her interrogatory it fell, and then
turned on Madam Winthrop inquiringly,
indicating
that he now, for the first time, perceived
that there was something extraordinary in the
absence of her niece.
Hope still stood with the door half open, her
emotions in no degree tranquillized by the
reception
of her inquiry.
Governor Winthrop turned to her with his usual
ceremony. Good morning, Miss Hope Leslie
be good enough to close the doorthe wind is
easterly this morning. You are somewhat tardy,
but we know you have abundant reason; take
your seat, my childapologies are
unnecessary
.
Madam Winthrop beckoned to Hope to take
a chair next her, and Hope moved to the table
mechanically, feeling as if she had been
paralyzed
by some gorgon influence. Her question
was not even adverted tono allusion was made
to Esther. Hope observed that Madam
Winthrop's
eyes were red with weeping, and she also
observed that in offering the little civilities of the
table, she addressed her in a voice of unusual
kindness.
She dared not look again at Everell, whose
unexpected
release from confinement would, at any
other time, have fully occupied her thoughts; and
her perplexity was rather increased by seeing her
guardian's eyes repeatedly fill with tears while
they rested on her with even more than their
usual fondness.
Impatient, and embarrassed as she was, it
seemed to her the breakfast would never end;
and she was in despair when her aunt asked for
her third, and her fourth cup of chocolate, and
when the dismissal of the table awaited old
Cradock's
discussion of a replenished plate of fish,
from which he painfully and patiently abstracted
the bones. But all finite operations have their
periodthe breakfast did end, the company rose,
and all left the parlour, one after another, save
the two Fletchers, Madam Winthrop, and our
heroine.
Hope would have followed her auntany
further
delay seemed insupportable, but Madam
Winthrop took her hand, and detained her.
Stay, my young friend, she said, I have an
important communication which could not be
suitably made till this moment. She took a
sealed letter from her pocket. Nay, Hope
Leslie
,
grow not so suddenly pale, no blame is
attached
to theenor to thee, Mr. Everell Fletcher,
who art even more deeply concerned in this
matter
.
Both the Governor and myself have duly
weighed all the circumstances, and have most
heartily approved of that which she hath done,
who near and dear as she is to us in the flesh, is
still nearer and dearer by those precious gifts and
graces that do so far exalt her (I would offend
none present,) above all other maidens. Truly,
if many do virtuously, Esther excelleth them
all.
Hope was obliged to lean against the wall for
support. The elder Fletcher looked earnestly at
Madam Winthrop, as if he would have said
for Heaven's sake do not protract this scene.
Perhaps she understood his glanceperhaps she
took counsel from her own womanly feelings.
This letter, my young friends, she said, is
addressed to you both, and it was my niece's
request that you should read it at the same
time.
Madam Winthrop kindly withdrew. Everell
broke the seal, and both he and Hope, complying
faithfully with Miss Downing's injunction, read
together, to the very last word, the letter that
follows
:
To my dear and kind friends, Everell Fletcher
and Hope Leslie
.
When you read these lines, the only bar to
your earthly happiness will be removed. With
the advice and consent of my honoured uncle and
aunt, I have taken passage in the Lion, which,
as you know, is on the eve of sailing for London.
With God's blessing on my present purposes, I
shall remain there, with my father, till he has
closed his affairs in the old world, and then come
hither again.
Do not think, my dear friends, I am fleeing
away, because, as matters stand between us, I
cannot abide to stay here. For your sakes, for I
would not give you needless pain, I go for a little
while. For myself, I have contentment of mind.
It hath pleased God to give me glimpses of
christian
happiness, the foundations of which are not
laid on the earth, and therefore cannot be
removed
or jostled by any of the cross accidents of
life.
There have been some notable errors in the
past. We have all erred, and I most of all. My
error hath been exceeding humbling to the pride
of woman; yours, Hope Leslie, was of the
nature
of your dispositionrash and generous; and
you, Everell, (I speak it not reproachfully, but as
being truth-bound,) have not dealt with gospel
sincerity. I appeal to thine own heartwould
it not have been better, as well as kinder, to have
said, Esther, I do not love thee, than to have
permitted me to follow my silly imaginings, and
thereby have sacrificed my happiness for this
worldand thineand Hope Leslie's?for I
think, and am sure, you never did me the wrong to
believe I would knowingly have taken thy hand
without thy affectionsall of them (at least such
measure as may be given to an earthly friend,)
being poor and weak enough to answer to the
many calls of life.
It is fitting, that, having been guided to a safe
harbour by the good providence of God, we should
look backnot reproachfullyGod forbidbut
with gratitude and humility, on the dark and
crooked passages through which we have passed.
Neither our virtueI speak it humblynor our
happiness, have been wrecked. Ye will in no
wise wonder that I speak thus assuredly of your
happiness, but, resting your eye on the past, you
might justly deem that, for myself, I have fallen
into the `foolishness of boasting'not so. In
another strength than mine own, I have overcome,
and am of good cheer, and well assured that, as
the world hath not given me my joy, the world
cannot take it away.
For the rest, I shall ever rejoice that my
affections
settled on one worthy of themone for
whom I shall hereafter feel a sister's love, and
one who will not withhold a brother's kindness.
And to thee, my lovingmy own sweet and
precious
Hope LeslieI resign him. And may He,
who, by his signal providence, hath so
wonderfully
restored in you the sundered affections of your
parents, knitting, even from your childish years,
your hearts together in lovemay He make you
his own dear and faithful children in the Lord.
Thushoping for your immediate union, and
worldly well-beingever prays your true and
devoted
friend,
Esther Downing
.
Hope Leslie's tears fell, like rain drops, on her
friend's letter; and when she had finished it,
she turned and clasped her arms around her
guardian's neck, and hid her face on his bosom.
Feelings for which words are too poor an
expression
,
kept all parties for some time silent. To
the elder Fletcher it was a moment of happiness
that requited years of suffering. He gave Hope's
hand to Everell: Sainted mothers! he said,
raising his full eyes to heaven, look down on
your children, and bless them! And, truly,
celestial spirits might look with complacency,
from their bright spheres, on the pure and perfect
love that united these youthful beings.
Mr. Fletcher withdrew, and we, following his
example, must permit the curtain to fall on this
scene, as we hold it a profane intrusion for any
ear to listen to the first confessions of
reciprocated
,
happy love.
Events have already meted `fit retribution' to
most of the parties who have figured in our long
story. A few particulars remain.
There was one man of Chaddock's crew left
alive to tell the tale; the same whose footsteps, it
may be recollected, Sir Philip heard, and on
whom he had vainly called for assistance. This
man was lingering to observe the principal actors
in the tragedy, when the explosion took place,
Vol. II. 25
and, with the rest, was blown into the air; but
he escaped with his life, gained the boat, and
came, the next day, safely to the shore, where he
related all he knew, to the great relief of the
curiosity
of the good people of Boston.
Strict search was, by the Governor's order,
made for the bodies of the unhappy wretches who
had been so suddenly sent to their doom.
Jennet's was one of the first found: the shawl
that had been bound over her head still
remained
,
the knot which defied Sir Philip's skill having
also resisted the lashing of the waves. When
this screen was removed, and the body identified,
the mystery of her disappearance was at once
explained
.
Death wipes out all scores. And
even Jennet,
dead,
was wrapped in the mantle of
charity; but all who had known her living,
mentally
confessed that Death could not have been
more lenient in selecting a substitute for the
precious
life he had menaced.
Poor Rosa's remains were not
Left to float upon their wat'ry bier
Unwept, and welter to the parching wind.
Her youth, her wrongs and sufferings, combined
with the pleadings of Hope Leslie, obtained for
her the rites of a separate and solemn burial.
Tears, of humility and pity, were shed over her
grave; a fit tribute, from virtuous and tender
woman
,
to a fallen, unhappy sister.
All the bodies of the sufferers were finally
recovered
,
except that of Sir Philip Gardiner; and
the inference of our pious forefathers, that Satan
had seized upon that as his lawful spoil, may not
be deemed, by their skeptical descendants, very
unnatural.
We leave it to that large, and most indulgent
class of our readers, the misses in their teens, to
adjust, according to their own fancy, the
ceremonial
of our heroine's wedding, which took place
in due time, to the joy of her immediate friends,
and the entire approbation of all the inhabitants
of Boston, who, in those early times, manifested
a friendly interest in individual concerns, which
is said to characterise them to the present day.
The elder Fletcher remained with his children,
and permitted himself to enjoy, to the full, the
happiness which, it was plain, Providence had
prepared
for him. The close of his life was as the
clear shining forth of the sun after a stormy and
troubled day.
Dame Grafton evinced some mortification at
the discovery of the fallibility of her judgment in
relation to Sir Philip Gardiner; but she soon
dubbed
him Sir
Janus;
a name that implied he had
two faces, and her sagacity was not at fault if she
judged by the one presented to her. Her trifling
vexation was soon forgotten in her participation
in her niece's felicity, and in her busy
preparations
for the wedding; and after that event, she
was made so happy by the dutiful care of Hope
and Everell, that she ceased to regret Old
England
,
till, falling into her dotage, her entreaties,
combining with some other motives, induced
them to visit their mother country, where the old
lady died, and was buried in the tomb of the
Leslies
,
the church burial service being performed by
the bishop of London. Her unconsciousness of
this poetic justice must be regretted by all who
respect innocent prejudices.
We hope that class of our readers, above
alluded
to, will not be shocked at our heroine's
installing
Master Cradock as a life-member of her
domestic establishment. We are sure their kind
hearts would reconcile them to this measure if
they could know with what fidelity, and sweetness,
and joy to the good man, she performed the
promise
she gave in Magawisca's prison, that she
would be a child to his old age.' If they are
still discontented with the arrangement, let them
perform an action of equal kindness, and they
will learn from experience that our heroine had
her reward.
Digby never ceased, after the event had
verified
them, to pride himself on his own
presentiments
,
and his wife's dreams. A friendship
between
him, and Everell and Hope subsisted
through their lives, and descended, a precious
legacy
,
through many generations of their
descendants
,
fortified by favours, and gratitude, and
reciprocal
affection.
Barnaby Tuttle, and his timely compliance
with her wishes, were not forgotten by our
heroine
.
Persuaded by her advice, and enabled by
an annual stipend from her to do so, he retired
from his solitary post of jailer, and passed his old
age comfortably with his daughter Ruth,
versifying
psalms, and playing with the little Tuttles.
After the passage of two or three years, Miss
Downing returned to New-England, and renewed
her intercourse with Everell and Hope, without
any other emotions, on either side, than those
which belong to warm and tender friendship.
Her personal loveliness, Christian graces, and the
high rank she held in the colony, rendered her an
object of very general attraction.
Her hand was often and eagerly sought, but she
appears never to have felt a second engrossing
attachment. The current of her purposes and
affections had set another way. She illustrated
a truth, which, if more generally received by her
sex, might save a vast deal of misery: that
marriage
is not
essential
to the contentment, the
dignity
,
or the happiness of woman. Indeed,
those who saw on how wide a sphere her
kindness
shone, how many were made better and
happier by her disinterested devotion, might have
rejoiced that she did not
Give to a party what was meant for mankind.